title,selftext,subreddit
Had my first openly flirtatious texting with a guy I know from work.,"I flirted with a guy from work over texting.  I got a slight (very slight) flirty vibe from him.  A female co-worker who I’m out to also got a gay/bi vibe from the guy. He flirted back a bit, then told another female coworker I “was being hilarious.”   

Doesn’t look like anything will come of it, but it felt good being a little more open and out with my sexuality. ",pansexual
I made a video about being pan &amp; I lost a lot of subscribers. So I wanted to share it with people who it might help! 💖,,pansexual
A Brief History of Hawaii's Ancient Gay Culture,,pansexual
Frustrated,Me and my husband (both pan) are splitting up. Getting back out there. Find myself going mainly for females. At first everything seems great and then it ALWAYS turns out that they were just drunk or something and I’ll never hear from them again or they’ll just not answer. I hate when they say “I’m sorry I was drunk girls always make out when their drunk” ,pansexual
Am i bi or pan?,"[18 M] For about 3 years I've identified as Bi. Everyone i ever had a crush on was cis so it just seemed the most accurate term. But now im in college, and thats getting thrown out of wack. My first big crush has been on an Enby person who recently came out as MTF transgender. I still have the crush and find them amazing in personality and in looks but im confused about my own sexuality after all of this. What am I?!",pansexual
Cyberus is a growing 16+ server that exists to network LGBT+ content creators and to promote gay media in hopes of creating a richer artistic community !,,pansexual
is there a meme subreddit like r/gaaaaaaayyyyyyyyyyyy or r/traaaaaaannnnnnnnnns for pansexual folks,,pansexual
I came out at work and I'm scared.,"I'm mostly worried because I work at a rehab facility for teens.  One of the girls was talking about her sexuality with another gay staff member and the kid asked me if I was straight and then immediately told another staff member I wasn't when she asked what we were talking about. These kids will lie about anything so I really hope this doesn't bite me in the butt down the road and I'm gonna stay in view of cameras always. 

Sorry for the weird vent I could use some support my state isn't very accepting and I've seen my trans gf get turned down jobs before while they hire literally anyone to do the work so that's what scares me despite the fact we have other gay and bi staff. ",pansexual
I'm pansexual?,I recently discovered that I was pansexual as me and my friend were talking and I was already out as Bi but he asked me if I would go out with anyone of any gender if it was based on personality and I said yeah. Does this mean I'm a pansexual?,pansexual
So I came out as Pan to basically my entire facebook including some of my family.,,pansexual
Private and content,"For as long as I can remember, I've never been sexually/romantically attracted to any one sex or gender. I have always found myself, in the correct circumstances, being (sexually and/or romantically) attracted to a full spectrum of individuals. I am sharing this after reading all kinds of empowering and inspiring stories about people coming out and the relief they feel.

&amp;#x200B;

I have always been a very private person when it comes to my feelings, sexually and romantically. I often hide them out of fear of being hurt. I've been physically and emotionally abused, and it's hard for me to move past, so I often only divulge my sexuality to very close friends/close romantic partners. I was a very headstrong child and once tried to come out to my parents, however, they wrote it off as teenage rebellion. Since that time, I've hidden my sexuality/romantic interests from my family (just as I've hidden my physical and emotional abuse). I've always considered myself the black sheep of the family, and the lone wolf of my own friend group.

&amp;#x200B;

I have an extraordinarily hard time opening up to anyone regarding this matter (in addition to several others), however, I prefer to remain secretive about it, because I feel that this kind of mystery gives me some kind of power over my life that I would lose without it. I still represent for the pansexual community and I outspokenly fight for our community and attend political rallies in an overtly Republican state. But I prefer not to discuss my own romantic/sexual interests even within my ally/friend group, and I'm happy with this.",pansexual
Question to pansexuals,"I've been a bit confused about pansexuals. I'm not pan, I'm ace but I've been wondering:

What's different from bisexual? Like do you like transgenders but aren't transgenders suppose to be one certain gender? I'm a bit confused. 


",pansexual
Makeup,"Do think it’s attractive or sexy when a guy wears makeup? This can be any style/type, from full drag to just nail polish or lipstick.",pansexual
Back and Forth on Attraction,"I am a cis woman who is dating a straight cis man and we've been together for about a year now. I love him to death and I never thought I'd meet my perfect match so early in life (I'm in my early 20s). When I went on a date with him, I was feeling out for all different types of people on dating apps and was pretty set on finding a beautiful woman to date cause that was my preference at the time. Well the date with my current boyfriend was magical and like meeting a soulmate and now we're very happy together. I still get these urges to be in a relationship with a woman despite how happy I am with him...is this normal?",pansexual
Looking for resources,"Are there any regional resources for finding other pan guys that are looking for friends to talk to and help navigate the local community? I’m not looking for casual hookups but I’m already in an open committed relationship with my long time partner, so any other relationship I’m in would have to accept that part of me. I know it sounds like I just want the best of both worlds but I really do want to explore this side of me without getting hurt or hurting someone else. I don’t know if I’m being selfish or naive or what, but any advice would be great. I’m a bit lost and overwhelmed. ",pansexual
Our colors,,pansexual
"Welcome to a Friendly, All Inclusive Discord Peer Support Server! We are LBGT friendly! :)","Welcome to a Friendly, All Inclusive Discord Peer Support Server! We are LBGT friendly! :)

[https://discord.gg/Ej8Zzym](https://discord.gg/Ej8Zzym)

☆ ☆ ☆ We are a diverse group of people wanting to create a positive space to support and chat with friends. ☆ ☆ ☆

☆ Dedicated peer to peer support channels for support

☆ Chill chats to hang out in

☆ Over 1,000 awesome members to relax with

☆ Amazing staff

☆ Great emojis and a lit voice chat

☆ Looking for partners &amp; promoters

[https://discord.gg/Ej8Zzym](https://discord.gg/Ej8Zzym)

☆ ☆ ☆ Join for the people, stay for the fun ☆ ☆ ☆",pansexual
So if there is a bi haircut is there a pan haircut?????,,pansexual
Advice,"In the next couple of weeks I’m going to probably try to go out and have my first non-het experience. I will have a couple of friends and maybe my current partner with me, but I’m clueless about everything relating to same-sex dating and dynamics and even regular interactions since I’ve been in the same monogamous relationship for the last decade",pansexual
I am pan,,pansexual
Decided to stop hiding,"Hey everyone! I’m a long time anonymous Reddit follower but I’ve made an account partly to join this sub. As the title says, I’ve decided to stop hiding who I am. I’m a 23yr (about to turn 24) guy that has spent almost 10 years in the closet to most people. The only people that have ever known have been my immediate family and a very small group of trusted friends. Hiding my sexuality has done nothing but chip away at me and make my depression worse. As part of working to correct myself, I’ve started an anti-depressant, started up therapy and am choosing to start being open. I’ve seen how much support and love comes from the people on here and I’m hoping that too will help me to move forward. Anyway, here I am and I’m looking forward to being a real part of this community instead of staying in fear of the world.",pansexual
Looking for friends... seriously that’s it.,"I’ve tried Discord, but it’s either a bunch of younger people, who are awesome, but I’m much older and don’t feel comfortable talking to someone who is, to me at least, a kid, or the server is  a bunch of silence. I’m looking for someone or a group of older pan/bi guys that I can talk to. I’ve never had a non-heterosexual relationship but have tried at least once. I’m currently in a committed het relationship and I love my partner but things are different now, and if we split or move to a fully open relationship then I think it’s time to really embrace this side of me, and give it an honest, hard look. ",pansexual
got a new beanie :D,,pansexual
:),,pansexual
"Wish me luck? Today I come out to my two closest friends (married couple, one straight, one bi).","They know me as straight or mostly straight, but i was not open with myself about this till this year. So, when I finally was honest with myself I just never told them yet. I wanted to wait till I had an experience with a guy first, to know it was not just thoughts, but actions felt right too.. maybe? I dunno. Anyway, this week I had my first M2M experience and while not great, it made it clear to me that yup, I am a pancake. Parts don't matter, just the person, connection, or moment. So, now that a ""test run"" has been completed and nothing changed, It is time to tell them. I feel like I have been lying to them. It is eating me up inside. They are my world. So, today is the day I get to see them, I am leaving soon and will drive the 2 1/2 hours to where they live. 

When I first get there i will be setting up my PS4 to borrow their insanely fast internet (compared to my DSL), to download RDR2 pre-load. Then before we go out to dinner/cabaret show we have plans for, I am going to have a talk with them. They both know I need to talk to them, but I don't think they know what of. Well... one of them might due to a text message error a month ago when an online gay friend was asking what apps i downloaded and when i responded it was in the wrong window. 0_o I covered it up tying it in to something else that seemed believable, but who knows. 

Even though I know they love me, that they will always accept me for who I am, and that even one of them is bi... I feel scared. I feel nervous. 

I can't really be open about it where i live and the people around me day to day, but they are the only ones IRL I can come out too. So I know as soon as i can get this over with i will feel a tad.. freer? 

It is going to be a long day even though it should not be a bad one.

I keep mulling over like different speeches in my mind on how to tell them, but so far nothing sticks.

I bought this cute little pan gamer pin a bit back, and while i can't put it on the front of my vest i normally wear, i hooked it to the underside. So I can flip that side of the vest over a little and show them the pin to start the convo maybe... i dunno. 

Thoughts? Ideas? Things to say? Questions i should be prepared for? Anyone got any advice? 

Someone wish me well?
",pansexual
A friend LGBTQA discord server for anime and gaming as well as other hobbies!, [https://discord.gg/NhbJqDY](https://discord.gg/NhbJqDY) This is a new server I just created for everyone in the LGBTQA+ community! We have channels for all your interests even though we are anime and gaming focused. We also have trans specific channels and support/venting channels. We're growing steadily now! ,pansexual
Ideas to come out creatively,"Wish me luck , I will be coming out to my family . I am very scared but also I need good ideas to come out ",pansexual
WE pansexuals LOVE PANS,how many pans did you lick today? :P,pansexual
Identity question,"If you are sexually attracted to a person irrespective of gender or gendered traits, would that be pan or bi? That is where I find myself. I like certain men, certain women, certain androgines(?), and certain non-binaries. I just find certain PEOPLE sexually attractive, and sometimes it’s not even for physical characteristics.",pansexual
Where is my authentic pan pride gear?!,"I went to Atlanta Pride over the weekend and I was bummed that through all of the booths selling queer swag all over the park (and there were a lot) I didn't see one pansexual specific shirt. I think I saw one bi shirt. I know these shirts are sold online, but I wanted to support a business that truly supports the lgbtq+ community. Please help: send me to some legit online stores that have fun pan gear! &amp; I don't just mean Google it and give me the results. Have any of you ordered from somewhere &amp; had a good experience? Do you have a friend who sells cool stuff? Help me out, Pans! ",pansexual
They got the colour order wrong but whatever,,pansexual
My girlfriend just told me she was pan,"I dont mind, and i love her, but for some reason it shook me a little. I also fucked up by asking if she still wouldve loved me if she wasnt pan and i think it hurt her. Im dumb. Any advice?",pansexual
Is it possible to identify as both bi and pan?,"So I'm a cis dude who came out as bi this year. I'm happy to be labelled bi, and thought of as such. But maybe I'm pan? To be frank, I don't really think of someone's gender identity as something that would hold me back from being attracted to them if I liked them as a person.

I can't really talk about this with anybody really. People were supportive of me being bi, but outside of LGBT+ and ally circles there's a lot of ignorance about non-binary genders around people I know.

Anyway, that was a lot of words to basically say this: I identify as bi, but am using this post to officially also come out as pan. A forward slash sexuality, if you will (bi / pan).
Is this ok? Or am I just being weird? It wouldn't surprise me if it was the latter.",pansexual
"I'm more pan than bi, but I like bi.","Don't really know if it's worth it to clarify to all my friends. Plus, my SO and I kinda have a nice bi/pan dynamic going. That, and I really like the bi color scheme+aesthetic.  Bi is easy to explain, easy to say. I like it, and I kind of want to run with it, even if it technically doesn't totally apply to me. 

I don't have any issues with pan, and I refer to myself as such when I need to be clear about my preferences, but for general times I use bi. I might just start using pan someday, but I'm going with this for the time being.

&amp;#x200B;

I guess... thoughts? ",pansexual
Afraid to come out,I'm sure I'm not the only one who is too afraid to ever come out. How do others cope with holding it in? ,pansexual
I think I'm pan?,"Hi everyone! I think I'm pan, but I might be bi. I know I'm attracted to men and women, but I haven't met many people who identify as non-binary or any nonconforming gender, so I really have no idea about my preference in that area. I would date anyone regardless of gender if I felt attraction to them. Though before I can see if I feel a strong attraction to people I usually have to get to know them first. Do you guys think I'm pan?",pansexual
I wanted to be obscure...,,pansexual
The Pansexual Team,,pansexual
Natural pan rainbow today in Hawai'i (crosspost /r/Hawaii),,pansexual
"My coming out went well, I think.",,pansexual
Trans kik group,"Hi everyone,

I am a mod for a trans group on kik and we're looking to expand our already amazing family!

We welcomes all genders, body types, and orientations. We're primarily over 30, and looking to add members that can relate to our group, can communicate, carry a conversation, and can engage in a group that *not sex or fetish based.*  

We're not a fetish, lifestyles, sex, trolling, lurking group, or one that's full of nudes, hard up guys trolling for sex, and inactivity. We're legit, welcoming and friendly, active, and actually have an engaging community.

If you're looking for something different, kik me directly @ jamieannmason with an intro - age, location, and something about you. *Messages not containing that are simply deleted. Face pictures are required for your kik profile and when you join the room..*

Thanks everyone:)

&amp;#x200B;

Jamie",pansexual
I’m out to two family members and I’m not the only one anymore,"I don’t want to give too many details as this isn’t 100% my story anymore and it’s not my place to share someone else’s.

I came out to my mom a few weeks ago.  I had a pan flag on and sent “I love you.”  She thought I was just being accepting, lol.  We talked about it and everything was good.

Someone else in my family sent me an image yesterday that basically called me out.  They’re LGBT too and they’ve known I was for a while.  I’m a bit obvious if you look for it.

I’ve been anxious about this stuff since I thought I was the only one.  Another family member was out, but they’ve since passed.  They were the first person I willingly came out to in my family.

I don’t know, I feel happy.  I feel a lot safer.  I plan on coming out to my grandma today.  I’m so happy I don’t have to hide this important piece of me anymore.",pansexual
Am I pan?,"So I've never really thought about my sexuality and what I identify as. I always kind of thought I was Bi but it never felt right. I am attracted to both genders and also people who identify as ""other."" What I'm trying to say is that gender doesn't really come into the picture if I am attracted to someone. Does this mean I am pan?",pansexual
Happy National Coming Out Day! 🌺🌻🌊,,pansexual
Question For You Fellow Pans!," 

Hi! I'm a Transgender woman who's 20 years old. I'm not out yet. This makes me feel extremely lonely. Even though I have friends and my family who all really love me, I feel lonely. They all see me and treat me as a GUY...which I'm not...I'm not blaming them or anything. But not being treated like the woman I am triggers my dysphoria and also makes me feel so lonely. I also cant solve this by just coming out...as there are quite a few reasons to why I cant come out. :/

I dont know what to do...I want to talk to people, make friends and even find love but as a WOMAN. Since, I'm not out...I cant do that irl. Online, I dont want to share my pics as I'm not that confident and also as I look male :(

Is there anyone else out there that feels the same? Is there any out there that is lonely, wants to talk, make friends/find love like me? :/",pansexual
Resilience Among Trans and Gender Diverse Adults. Survey,,pansexual
A friend of mine came out today,She came out as pan romantic and demi-sexual. I'm pretty ignorant of these concepts so I was just curious if anyone here could help provide understanding. Are these two concepts mutually exclusive?,pansexual
I came out ot my mom a couple of days ago,"I came out as bi/pan to my mom a couple of days ago; it took a lot of sarcasm, convincing, and bringing up my all-inclusive erections, but she knows now",pansexual
Hi All ^~^,"First time ever using reddit, can I get a warm welcome, maybe some people to talk to? \^\~\^ thank you all!",pansexual
A bisexual redditor just helped me discover I'm pansexul! Hello frens.,"I'm so happy! Two years of trying to figure this out have suddenly come to a close. Finally, I know how to describe this! ",pansexual
If I made a group on groupme for pan people would anyone be interested in joining,,pansexual
"Yes, you're pansexual.","Yes, you're also bisexual.

Mods, can we make a sticky post? Or a weekly thread? All these individual posts are getting old.",pansexual
Accidental or Intentional Pan Pride?,,pansexual
I think I’m pansexual?,"At 26 years old, I think I’m realizing that I identify as being pansexual. 

A few weeks ago I was asked if I was bi. I responded that I didn’t identify as being bisexual, but that I am attracted to some women. That I see sexuality as being fluid. That I love being with men, but I’ve also been with women and also love it. 

Then I really started to think about myself, my sexuality, preferences...

I called my best friend. When I told her about the guy asking if I was bi and me being confused how to respond, she said with much ease, as if it was so obvious, that I was pansexual. I never really knew what the term meant, so I obviously turned to google. She described it as being a lover of all beings, and not being attracted to any particular gender and seeing gender as binary. 

After trying to do some research, I think I can confidently say I identify as being pansexual.

So...why do I feel so confused? Conflicted?



",pansexual
Do I try explaining or just deal with it?,I’m a high school sophomore and I’m pansexual. The problem is that my xc teammates know the word pansexual though no idea what it is. It’s so annoying they aren’t even close and yet they still talk about it on a weekly basis. I don’t want to deal with the ignorance though if I try to explain it I might have to out myself to prove why I know the actual definition and my team gossips way too much so I don’t need the whole school knowing I’m pan so what do I even do?,pansexual
Romantically Attracted to Men and Sexually Attracted to Women,"I'm a girl and I have had crushes on guys my whole entire life, but have always been repulsed by images of dicks and naked men. I have only had one romantic crush on another girl, but I always end up looking at girls butts and other things such as masturbating to girls. It seems to me that I am romantically attracted to men but sexually attracted to women. Does anybody else here have the same thing or know what it is called because it is causing me a lot of confusion.",pansexual
Hi,"Hi. So, I'm Pansexual, I know, kind of a surprise on this subreddit. This past month I've kind of come out to some of my close friends by making a gay subreddit. (r/gayfrogscult) My user flair kind of gives it away, and owning a gay subreddit doesn't help either. Anyway, not all of my close friends know, some of them aren't the smartest. Should I officially come out to them via text or something or just kind of post this onto the subreddit as well so the less smart ones can figure it out? I'll probably end up doing both anyway. This was a nice rant.

Peace out Pans.",pansexual
So I found out my Nana supports me.,"So a little context about my family; My mother whilst she is pretty chill about the whole LGBTQ thing only thinks there are three sexualities and has debated with me about it a few times. My Dad on the other hand has turned me being Pansexual into a Dad joke; it's wearing thin but it's his way of coping i guess so he's valid. My siblings just shrug it off as they don't actually care who i fall for and that just puts a cherry on my sundae.

My biggest concern though has always been my Nana; as she grew up in a rather strict family.

Anyway this morning I found out that my sister outed me to my Nana over dinner last night (She told me she would do it if i didn't do it by September, it's now October). Turns out she just laughed and said ""I know"". 

I am now expecting pans colour flag cookies when she comes to visit my daughter and I this weekend.",pansexual
Update: I feel so unwelcome in LGBTQ spaces,"So the mods of r/bisexual stickied a post saying to stop with the anti pan sentiment. I appreciate this gesture.


However as expected, a good portion of the comments devolved into ""my experience with pan people is *insert negative interaction here*"" and ""but what about when pan people do xyz""?


This just solidified my understanding that we can't have a pan positive post there without some kind of complaint about us. Not even on a post defending us and asking for mutual respect.


I detailed some of my concerns in the comments, and they were down voted. I even had a fellow pan person claim I was doing the same thing I was complaining about, completely ignoring the context of my comment (I asked if it'd be ok if I complained about bi people as they in the sub complain about pan people). I tried to phrase my comments as honest while as respectful as possible.


I guess in that sub, pan people are some kind of annoyance bogeyman. For a sub that claims to include pan people, they sure seem to be apathetic about our concerns. I know the mods can only do so much, but the culture of the sub is disappointing.


I tried.


Note to Bi people : I support you. And I will always stand up for you when I see hateful generalizations and negativity. I only wish you'd do the same for me. ",pansexual
Thought I was cis?,"Hello, all!

I'm a cis woman, pansexual, and sapphic.

But I've been wondering about something for a while now but I've always had the desire

to dress and emulate the late great Michael Jackson.

But it's just not the desire to dress like him.

I've wanted to step in his shoes, to be like him.

There's the desire, to dress and emulate him, while charming girls.

Currently, I have a specific person in mind, I'd like to charm her, adopting

MJ's charisma and confidence and dressing similarly.

Also, I've noticed that ever since I started dating women back in 2016, I've also

had the desire to take the protector role in a relationship and being a top.

(I've had two brief relationships where I wanted to protect them, like a guy would

protect his woman in a straight relationship. This is the best way I can describe this-

I apologize if it sounds odd).

I think I could be a switch, but being a ""top"" with a woman or femme-identified individual

makes me really happy more than being their bottom. Just the idea of pleasing them and

making them happy, really makes me happy.

The opposite is true when I'm with a male-identified person, that I feel like I'm easily the ""bottom"". 

So, am I still cis? Or some variation of cis and gender non-conforming? Or something else?",pansexual
Came across this in an old journal of mine today,,pansexual
"It’s only a little thing, but I’m starting to show on the outside how I feel on the inside...",,pansexual
"I’m posting because I’m not sure exactly what pansexuality is. I may be one, I’m not sure. I wouldn’t describe myself as gay or bi, but I do like to look at good looking men’s bodies. I admire them. I’m not sexually attracted to them, if a man were to offer I wouldn’t mind. I guess I’m just confused",,pansexual
If I made a group on groupme for pan people would anyone be interested in joining,,pansexual
Had my first crush on a boy this weekend.,"... and I can't stop smiling about it. After beginning to unpack my sexual desires and hangups over the past month or two and finally becoming comfortable with identifying as pansexual, I got my first crush - sure, I've been attracted to other men before, and have said things like ""yeah, I'd be way into them /if i were that way/' but this is the first time, since letting my desires go there, that they actually went.  


He's super cute. He's sweet. He takes good care of the people around him. He's also a lot younger than me, I have no idea if he's queer or not, and he's essentially a seasonal coworker - I see him maybe once or twice a year, so I didn't initiate anything. But just the feeling alone made me giddy.",pansexual
"It finally hit that my dad will forever see me as someone undeserving of gods love, someone going to hell, and it hurts","I don’t know where else to post this, so hi.  Venting because I need to somehow go to bed in 40 minutes and it’s bothering me.

Semi-important background - I was raised Mormon, my mom still is (though less so) and my dad switched to something more extreme via an online preacher.  Think: Obama is the antichrist and Trump was picked by god sort of person.  My uncle on my moms side was gay, and I was able to come out as bi to him before he died (from bipolar disorder 1 and a bad situation, I have bipolar disorder 2, which is a nice added touch because I don’t know if I feel so upset and panicky because of that).  I’m exmo and bounce between atheism and Wicca.  I don’t really care if anyone thinks I’m going to hell or whatever, but it’s that my dad thinks I deserve to be punished for eternity for stupid things or things I can’t control.


I was often told gay people go to hell.  Uncle J is bad and evil and going to hell to *burn*.  When my aunt found out by going through my search history on her computer I got the, “well you can still marry a boy so it’s ok!”  I was 13.

I plan on eventually coming out to my mom.  We were talking about something on that topic and I asked what she’d do if I wasn’t straight.  She said she would love me still, but she’d need to process it.  I think that’s becoming more normal and the right way to deal with that.  I’m still scared to death, but I want to someday come out to her.

My dad is a completely different story.  My parents know I go to SAFE (LGBT+ club on campus).  I got lots of comments about it, mostly from my dad and his mom.  I have a little pride flag.  I’ve pointed out how excited I was when I saw gay flags in windows in my dorm.  And lord did I hint it.  I think my mom and my grandma have their ideas, and I wouldn’t be surprised if my aunt told my mom.  But my dad has made it time and time again that it is a terrible thing.  He didn’t take me being diagnosed with bipolar disorder (basically saying I don’t have it and that my sibling with BPD doesn’t have BPD, also got ganged up on with life insurance lady and him that I should just take vitamins since my vitamin D and B12 were low [they’re better now] and not the medication that keeps me somewhat sane).  What is he going to do if/when he finds out I’m pan?  Surely I can’t come out to everyone and have him not find out.

At this point it feels like every important aspect of me my dad would hate me for.  At least the rest of my family would only have an issue with me not being at least something christian.

I don’t know.  My dad isn’t a kind person to begin with.  I just wish it didn’t bother me.",pansexual
What am I,"I know this is probably the wrong subreddit to post this under but anywho...

Basically I love my femininity and my body and everything about being a woman. But I really want a dick (and I’m pansexual).
I like the “male” roles in sex and I like being the stereotypical “male” (being chivalrous etc.)  in my relationship. 
I’m just confused...  ",pansexual
It happened again [Rant] [Crushes],"I have another crush on a straight girl, yay... On Friday I talked to her a bunch and joked and stuff.  She’s super nice to everyone and we have the same sense of humor. She’s also really pretty and I love her hair. Ok that’s the end of my little crush gush.",pansexual
I feel so unwelcome in LGBTQ spaces,"Does anyone else feel so unwelcome as a pan person in LGBTQ spaces, subreddit, Instagram accounts, etc?


In r/bisexual a good 60+% of posts mentioning pan people are rudely generalizing us and projecting some biphobic experiences onto pan people and identity as a whole. And nobody questions it. I tried talking to the mods but imo they didn't seem to care much 


I always see pan people described as ""snowflake bisexuals"" by other LGBTQ people. Recently on Instagram there was a cute post featuring some LGBTQ flags and people got upset that pan was included. Pan was specifically targeted


Basically I just feel so unwelcome. If pan people generalized other LGBTQ people like they did us, it'd be called out immediately. But when they rant about us and generalize, it's ok??? ""pan people are just snowflake biphobic transphobes"" is a constant sentiment I see spewed by other LGBTQ people and upvoted and I just feel like I'm being stabbed in the back by those I want to support and befriend. 

",pansexual
I found out I was Pansexual in IKEA,"That's it, that's the entire story. One day I went to IKEA to get a wardrobe and I saw someone who I was immediately attracted to. I didn't know their gender or anything. I was so confused. They actually came up to me and told me my hoodie was cool, so that was nice, maybe they noticed I was staring at them? But yeah thanks IKEA for my sexuality and a bomb ass wardrobe. Anyone else got some weird stories of how they found out?",pansexual
"Hello, I’m new here:)","Hello everyone! I just wanted to say hi and how happy I am that there is a sub for pansexual people out there. You all seem like awesome, supportive people!

Personally I’ve been spending the past year or so trying to figure out if I’m Pan, bi, or gay. After breaking up with a long term boyfriend and healing from that I can finally start figuring this out. There have been plenty of indicators in my
life saying hey! You’re attracted to anyone! Though so far it’s been hard and confusing trying to be more apart of the LGBTQ community as I often feel that people question my “gayness” or don’t seem to understand the confusion of being unable to decipher what gender I’m attracted to. I’ve only dated one person so far in life, so I don’t really have a concrete example to definitively say. Not that I feel that should determine sexuality, it would just be nice to say, I’ve tried it all and know what I’m attracted to. So reading through this sub is really exciting as i feel more connected with this group than others! Thank you guys for that! I’m looking forward to learning more about the pan community.  And if you made it to the end of this message, I’m impressed:) ",pansexual
[Survey] Effects of heteronormativity and compulsory heterosexuality in pansexuals,"I'm currently doing research into heteronormativity and compulsory heterosexuality. I am writing about my experiences in accepting my lesbianism and my research has mainly focused on lesbians so far, but I am interested to know how the effects are felt throughout the LGBQ spectrum. Any contributions would be greatly appreciated. Many thanks :)

[https://goo.gl/forms/QcPewJLYuC622Y6A3](https://goo.gl/forms/QcPewJLYuC622Y6A3)",pansexual
It's visibility day!!,"It's Bi Visibility day!! Positive representation matters, not only in bi communities but in pan communities as well! That is why we are working on a study to measure the impact of positive representation on bi/nonmonosexual communities. Check out this survey on bi representation : [https://umassboston.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV\_6WOsZl1i2BrfRfD](https://umassboston.qualtrics.com)/. Happy Visibility day everyone!

*Processing img xenv08rea2o11...*",pansexual
My husband came out to me,"My husband came out to me as pansexual. It doesn’t bother at all as I am myself. Before we were together I had been with men women everything. I was honest and straight forwaybefore the relationship started. He had never mentioned it to me. Now after being married he decided to tell me. He wants to experience being with a man. I had also expressed to him I did not want an open relationship before we were together. Im trying to be as supportive as I can be because I want him to have experiences. I suggested we do it together. It wasn’t god enough. Then I decided I would give him a pass and do his thing. Still not good enough. He’s now telling me being pansexual means even though we’re married we can be with whoever we want. He says I’m not being fair and I’m wrong and I should let him go off and do whatever he wants. I’m dumbfounded. Advice?!


UPDATE***

So I now have gotten him to confess that he manipulated me into thinking I’ve changed so much and that I was crazy (have not changed at all) because he wanted me to be different. He told me that I now make him feel embarrassed for coming out to me because I wasn’t immediately okay with what he wanted. I love him so much and don’t want to leave. But idk what to do. I’m terrified of being alone. He also told me that it’s not that if he’s letting me do whatever I want (which I never asked for or acted upon) that it’s not fair for him to have rules. ",pansexual
Came out to a friend for first time,"I came out to my only friend that I know is nonhomophobic for sure this week. After my parents found out about me being pan via searching my computer without my permission, finding online chats a month ago, and were not accepting, I had been stuck viewing coming out as a sad thing.

  


I decided to come out to my friend voluntarily and it was amazing. He was super accepting and comforting; he is such a great guy.

  


Where I am in North Carolina, and the community I am involved in due to having very Christian parents are not accepting, and he is really the only person I could be confident would still think of me the same.

  


Since I go to a private Christian school, I do run serious risk of being expelled if the administration of the school finds out about my sexuality, but my friend ensured me he would never tell a soul.

  


Every time I think about him knowing this secret I kept for so long and not rejecting me makes me smile involuntarily with happiness. I'm so glad I mustered up the courage to tell him.

  


A memory I will forever remember is him hugging me after reassuring me he thinks no different of me, and just feeling a trust and warmth between him and me I had not felt with anyone in years,y quiet sobs of joy squeezing the hug harder periodically.

  


Thank you all for being here. Knowing that I am not alone or some weird/insane person has kept me sane for all this time. While I have lurked this sub, your existence brought peace to my inner turmoil. Thank you and stay awesome.

  


  


tl;dr: I came out to my one accepting friend I have and it was great",pansexual
Is there really a point?,I'm in my teens and I've identified as bi for something over a year now. I've only ever come out to my best friend irl. For the past couple of months I've been feeling like bi isn't really the best label for me and at this point I'm basically 100% sure I'm pan. But I've been wondering if there's really a point to identifying (and coming out) as pan if in the area I live in most people don't even know/refuse to believe it's possible to be bi so me being pan would confuse them even more. I think even that friend I came out to wouldn't really understand and accept me as he was very sceptical of my sexuality when I came out to him (he kept asking me if I'm sure I'm not or if I'm sure I'm not straight and that kinda stuff). Everyone in my family and most people I know aren't really too fond of LGBTQ+ people and some even hate them. So my question is: Is there really a point?,pansexual
Question for y’all who understand your sexuality/sexual orientation in general more than I do!,"I’m 23 and have been trying to figure out my sexuality for years! I’ve tried out a few labels (bisexual, queer, etc) but nothing quite seemed to fit, especially when I’d talk to people who identified with those. 
Recently my boyfriend suggested I might be pan, but I am having trouble figuring out if that’s what I am.

A little bit about me-
I have been attracted, emotionally and sexually, to cis men and women as well as trans men and women and people who sit elsewhere on the spectrum, but I have a strong preference for people who have a penis. Like I said, I have been attracted to people with a vagina, but they have been few and far between. Gender identity has zero sway in my attraction, though. 
Does this seem consistent with someone who is pan or if I were pan would I not have as strong of a preference in the persons sex?
Thank you for any insight!",pansexual
"We know it's not gender, so what physical characteristics attract you?","I'll start. And of course when I say ""anyone"", I mean a living human person whose age falls roughly within my half-plus-seven boat. 

Anyone who moves with graceful confidence has a high likelihood of being sexy to me. Specifically confidence, not arrogance. 

People who can and do pull off wearing black leather. Yes, please.

Red hair. It just is.

[https://youtu.be/IyVPyKrx0Xo](https://youtu.be/IyVPyKrx0Xo)",pansexual
Came out to close friend today... who was HORRIFIED I’m pan. But the reason why 🤣😭😭,"“So..... you may have suspected this but.... I’m Pan! :)”

*look of confusion comes over friend... he’s searching my eyes hoping my body language says that I’m joking... he realizes I’m not joking... horror replaces confusion... hardcore judgement*

“You’re not.... serious.... are you?.....”

“Dude.... I thought you were cool with LGBT+.....”

“Yeah but i don’t support fucking dogs and children.”

*I burst out laughing and it takes me a full 3 minutes to gather myself enough to communicate to my besty the definition of pan*

*he is SO relieved and joins in the laughter* 

Apparently someone gave him the wrong definition of pan~7 years back and he’s been hardcore judging specific pan people ever since 😂😭

Had to share with you guys lmao

(Sorry for clickbait title, but that’s the best way I can think to phrase this lol)

Edit: I showed him this thread and he says “i don't recall being horrified or saying ""Yeah but i don’t support fucking dogs and children.”” 

But his face said other about horrified and although he’s right I took creative liberty and added children, he definitely did say dogs!",pansexual
Wow. I think I am pansexual? Kind of asking.,"I identify as bisexual but somehow I do not really think that is correct. Personality is what I am attracted to. Could not care less what the person looks like or how they identify. So that would make me pansexual, right??",pansexual
I like like like her,"How can I tell them I like them? I'm pansexual, and she doesn't know. But she knows I'm interested and open about any gender because she found out about my archives. Please help. ",pansexual
So I found out I’m pansexual ahnzzkkskdnx,,pansexual
Learn something every day.,,pansexual
I think I like both,"I’m not sure if this is the right place to put this, but here goes.
I’m a female sophomore and I’ve been dating this guy who I’ve thought of as the love of my life. We’ve been through the best and the worst. He’s the best guy I could ever hope to have and I don’t wish to leave him. 
But a few weeks ago I got asked to homecoming by a girl. She’s really pretty, but I turned her down because of my boyfriend.  I’ve been thinking about her a lot lately. And I’ve been noticing other girls at my school.  I don’t know what’s the matter with me, I don’t want to leave the best boyfriend ever. 
Do I like girls? Should I tell my boyfriend? It’ll break his heart.
",pansexual
Just came out to my bff 🅱️ois,,pansexual
Paid relationship education program + free STI testing for male couples!,"Hey! My name is Arielle and I'm a queer researcher and relationship skills coach at Northwestern University. I want to give y'all some info about 2GETHER, a project we have going on for cisgender male couples.

2GETHER is a paid research study that involves a relationship education program-- where you and your partner can learn healthy relationship skills like communication, healthy sexuality, emotional support, and other ways to strengthen your relationship. We have a national online program and an in-person program for people who live in Chicago.

There will be follow-up surveys and free at-home STI testing before and after the 2GETHER program. Because we're a university, all data we collect is protected by IRB and federal regulations. If you and your partner are eligible to take part, you'll see a consent form, which has more info about your privacy rights.

Fun bonus: as a thank you for completing all parts of 2GETHER, each partner will receive $250!

Want to find out if you qualify, or learn more? Check out our eligibility screener: [https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY](https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY)

Even more info on our website: [http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/](http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/)

IRB #STU00202802, STU00202939",pansexual
"Is it normal to be pansexual but more attracted to a specific gender, rather than equal attraction?",I identify as pansexual but I am attracted to males more than others,pansexual
パンセクシュアリティ！Flag of JaPAN. ;-),,pansexual
Why can't this subreddit have an icon?,Can't we make the pan flag the icon for the sub?,pansexual
"Hai, y'all! 😃 I'm 28, genderqueer, pansexual, panromantic, single living in Austin, TX I seek to connect with queer, non-binary, trans people of all colors and other people from the online GSRM (gender, sexual, and romantic minorities) community 🌈🎉🎊",,pansexual
bleh,"yo, im a sad pansexual and i'm glad to be apart of this community :)) okay bye

",pansexual
A question about preference and sexuality.,"Hello there :) 

I was laying awake and doing some thinking as I often do and asked myself a question that I wasn't able to come up with a satisfactory answer to so I was hoping to get some help from the good people of Reddit!

I've considered myself Pan for a few years now. I've never looked at gender when considering a partner and have been with individuals of varying gender and sexuality. I myself was born and identify as male, I like to be the more dominant and masculine one in a relationship so while I do not look at gender I do often go for people that are more submissive and I guess ""feminine"". 

This may be a totally stupid question but am I correct to consider myself Pansexual if I am attracted to people with more feminine personalities and features regardless of what gender they actually identify as?

Thanks in advance for any answers &lt;3

Edit: Wording.",pansexual
Intros,"Hello! I have no idea what to say here, I am Pan. And I am like super awkward and don’t know how reddit works haha",pansexual
I was messing with the rgb on my keyboard yesterday and came up with this,,pansexual
"Well, that escalated quickly. (my first pansexual experience)","Hey all, I've only known the term pansexual a little over a year. I'm a 41(M) and I've lived my entire life as a hetero man, spending the past ten years in a monogamous relationship with a woman, the last five of them very happily married. I've been an ally as much as I'm able to LGBTQ+ communities since a teenager, my wife is queer, and while I've never had a problem identifying people across the gender spectrum as people I'm attracted to, I never gave myself permission to consider that attraction as sexual - it was always an aesthetic appreciation, mixed in with a bit of emotion. TL;DR, I was vanilla as fuck.  


But, I've been unpacking a lot of depression and anxiety over the past few months, and through that unpacking, I've allowed myself to be open to whatever sexual thoughts came through - and realized that I am sexually driven to a lot more variety than I'd given myself credit for. Through this process, my wife and I also made the decision to open our relationship - she wanted to pursue a relationship with a trans woman what she saw could likely turn sexual. I was trepidatious at first, but one of the pillars of our relationship is trusting eachother, but never owning eachother.  


Anyhow, unburdening myself from this sexual anxiety has certainly paid dividends in my mood, and this weekend was the first time I was able to spend time with my wife and her partner without any of my emotional hangups being a stumbling block for everyone in the room resulting in us all in bed together the following morning, having some of the best sex that at least I've ever had. It was my first time with anyone new since I've been in this relationship, my first threesome where everyone walked away happy, my first time expressing attraction to anyone non-binary, and my first sexual experience with a (physically) male body. Lot of firsts, but it was amazing. I don't think I could have ever anticipated being in that place even two months ago.  


And of course a single experience doesn't exactly make me pansexual, or maybe it does, I still have a lot more to explore, but in the meantime I'm in good company for the journey.",pansexual
Check out this interview with this pansexual &amp; agender young artist hoping to bring representation to queer Asian American women!,,pansexual
The 26 is looking for someone to share their experiences/stories surrounding their pansexual identity!,,pansexual
Do inanimate objects count?,,pansexual
If I made a groupme for pan people would people here be interested?,,pansexual
The colors are all there but not necessarily in order,,pansexual
Today shed some light.. NSFW,"Earlier today at a liquor store that was full of hot broads exchanging looks back and forth with me, my eyes locked in on a guy. He almost looked relieved and gazed back at me. I decided that I'd stand by him to see what vibe there was. The lines of people were insanely long. I told him i wasn't gonna wait through these people and said maybe next time. 3 steps out the door he's out the door and we talk for awhile. He said he was glad i had been checking him out because he had been doing the same on the sly to me. He thought for sure I would've talked to one woman in particular who was hot. I told him I set would've but I wanted him instead. He said oh not as bad as he did me. He said to follow him as he lived close. We get to his place, he introduces me to his gf (I thought wth?) He strips right there as did I.. Hes hairy af which is my biggest pet peeve I'm shaved. He sucks my cock for a few minutes and says to keep it hard he needs the restroom. So his gf who's pretty hot decides she'll continue..well I went totally flaccid. I had no interest in her at all..first time that's happened..its because I wanted him. When he came out I noticed he shaved his cock. His gf said ""damn baby you wouldn't shave for me"" He told her sorry but he and I as soon as we exchanged glances at the liquor store we wanted each other period. He grabbed both our clothes and we went to his man cave like room. He said that all he's done with guys is gotten blowjobs from several. Said he couldn't even think of reciprocating. Drops to his knees and sucks my cock while I talked all dirty. He just took it harder and deeper. Told him I was gonna cum and he pulls my ass in his face flush on my torso. I unloaded a lake and he kept going! I pulled away and pulled him up. I said let's move to couch. On couch I told him that I'm sure I'm pansexual..because I was attracted to him as soon as I saw him. He said when I walked in his eyes went from a chick to me..I told him I went limp when his girl thought she would would take over..he laughed and said WoW..he grabbed my clothes and said we were going to the bedroom. Once there she was playing with a toy in their California king size bed. I lie down on other side and tell him to 69 on top. Then I said to face the other way as I was sure it would be too hard for him blow me as I'd blow him. He tells the girl she can watch or do whatever..so he's in my mouth moaning very loudly and she says about my exposed cock ""WoW thing's huge!"" And proceeds to ride it and both of them are screaming. He cums forever and wobbles off. As soon as he did my cock went totally limp. She said that's cool she'd gotten off. She walked out leaving he and I. He asked if it was okay..I said don't ask go for what know. He starts making out with me and damn that was incredible. I caught my breath and he says ""Omfg you are a boss! I wanna do the whole program with you so you are now the Dom"" hours later he said he's not sure if he's pan or not. I told him hard to tell. Asked if he ever had the experience at the liquor store any other time. He said not even as he never locked eyes with a male before. The guys who blew him usually joined him in tag teaming his gf. But it was The two guys doing her. Then one time dude asks to blow him and he said no..guy says in 2 min if he didn't like it then hed stop. Said the guy was pretty good. Then it happened with different guys a couple dozen he said. One went by and wanted them to 69..my guy said hell no..but he could receive..my guy said 5 min and he was totally not diggin it.. He said he felt weird with the instant attraction as he's never had that happen with another male. So we went for it again..damnit this guy was something! I had to do finally go home..he walked me out and i get in the vehicle. His nosy neighbors were outside he asks me quietly to step out and he locks our mouths and neighbors froze! He told them that I'm the cause of all the noises they heard. Just now he texts ""what happens if I get feelings for you?"" I said we'll cross that bridge when we get to it and we'll deal with it. I asked what did his gf say about it all. He said as long as he fucks her like they have been she's okay with it..hope he keeps that up",pansexual
"I’m just a confused teen, help me.","I’m trying my best to keep this as short as possible, since I have a tendency to ramble on and add way more detail than needed. 

I’m only 14, and I just need some support. I have only come out as pansexual to my closest friends and my sister. That’s it. At the moment, I have a little crush on a non binary friend. In the past, I have dated a boy, and have had many crushes on boys before that; all of which were sexual attractions. However, I have also had small crushes on girls; all of which were asexual attractions. So would I still be considered a pansexual, even though I can’t get sexually attracted to certain people? I am so confused and also so new to this.


Edit: thank you guys for your advice. I’m just going to wait on it and see if I have the same feelings when I’m older. For now, if people ask me about sexuality, I’ll just tell them I am not 100% sure.",pansexual
Acknowledging pan &amp; poly... where to meet like minds?,"I'm a male in my mid 40's, and my closest friends and exes know I'm pan and poly -- a couple were in plural or open relationships with me, though some time ago. But now, years later and having matured (hopefully), I want to get to know others who are open and like-minded -- not necessarily specifically for hook-ups, but for friendship and support, and to see how they themselves have negotiated this voyage of self discovery. 

I originally identified as bi, until I realized my attraction to transgendered and non-binary individuals as well -- hence the embracing of my pan identity.

Where can one meet people and like minds of similar persuasion? I don't drink, so gay bars seem implausible, and though a friend suggested Tinder, I don't know that I'm specifically looking to ""smash"" (his nomenclature)... at least, not immediately.

Does anyone have any tips, suggestions or resources? 

Thanks for the assistance. Though some friends know, I'm not out to my family, and it can feel kind of lonely stuck here in my head sometimes. Thanks again.",pansexual
Curiousity About Variety,"I have settled early in my life for a relationship I'm perfectly happy with, I absolutely adore my fiancé and am prepared to spend the rest of my life with them. I've only had two serious relationships in my life, both with males. However, obviously I am subscribed to this subreddit because I'm an open pansexual, and I'm wondering if anyone else is in a similar situation and if they can give any advice

I have never been with a female bodied person, and am wondering about the experience. I intend to remain entirely monogamous so experimenting isn't up for debate. For now, I like to look up lesbian content and read books/listen to podcasts/watch porn/etc, but I wonder if there are different ways people handle preference shifts in their monogamous pansexual relationships (by that I mean the gradual drift in preferring males/females/andros/etc that just happens over time for many of us)",pansexual
"Looking to expand LGBT+ research, with an opportunity for gift cards!","Mods: I've tried to check all the rules about posting a survey, but if I've missed or misinterpreted one, please let me know and remove!

Hello friends! 
 
My name is Kelci Davis and I am a research assistant working with Dr. Jaime Anderson at Sam Houston State University.  We are conducting a research study about the lives and experiences of sexual orientation minorities (e.g., individuals who identify as homosexual, bisexual, pansexual, asexual, etc.). As you may know, research in the LGBT+ community is often sparse and we hope to gain a greater understanding of the community for both researchers and the general public. I am emailing to ask if you would be willing to take about 45 minutes to complete a survey for this research project.  If you identify as a sexual orientation minority, speak English, and are between the ages of 18-28, you qualify to participate! Upon completion of this survey, you will also be entered in to a raffle for a 10% chance at receiving a $5 Amazon gift card. Participation is completely voluntary and your answers will be anonymous.
 
If you are interested, please click on the link for the survey and additional information: https://shsu.co1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_3kiU0BBsajFd9pX

If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact me (kelcidavis@shsu.edu) or Dr. Jaime Anderson (jla068@shsu.edu).

Thank you for your time - please consider sharing this to your members, friends and others!
 
Kelci C. Davis, B.S.
Graduate Research Assistant
Sam Houston State University
",pansexual
Working on a Pan-Pride PC build. Just got the case back from the powder coater and re-assembled!,,pansexual
Hello Fellow Pans,"Just wanted to say hi because I’m new here, both to the sexuality and the subreddit. I identify as pansexual but I am 100% in the closet. 

I used to say that I was polysexual, but after some more research I think pansexual fits me better. 

I was wondering whether other pans had some life advice? ",pansexual
Came out to my family,[19/m] I fully came out to my family a few days ago. It feels fucking amazing to have that weight lifted off of me. It was a bit awkward but in the end they hugged me and said that they supported me no matter what. I feel lucky to have such supportive parents. My brother was the first one I came out to and he gave me the courage to finally tell my parents so I owe him a great gratitude. I know that I am lucky that my parents were so understanding but at the same time I'm just happy that they are the way they are.,pansexual
Little confused.,"I am a male that has had relationships with both male and female. I am dating a female at this current moment in time but before her I was speaking to a guy that I meet up with once. With this guy I could feel some feeling towards him but he hasnt spoken to me for about two weeks so I have been meeting this girl. Now, I like her but I don't have feelings for her like I did with the guy I met. 

Should I wait and go on a few more dates with the girl? I mean, we are currently on the fourth date. 

What are your thoughts? ",pansexual
Showcasing my nerdiness as well as my pansexuality!,,pansexual
The SO surprised me with a wonderful (supportive) gift today! :D,,pansexual
Should girls be allowed to go topless like guys,"Yes is the obvious answer, but not because boobs aren't sexual but because mens chests are sexual too, everyone finds different bodys sexy so the rules should be the same for everyone. Girls, boys, intersex, non binary everyone should where what they like if thats a sweat shirt or nothing at all. It doesn't matter what you wear or what gender I'll still think you're attractive. ",pansexual
Hi there,"I'm pansexual.

Just thought I'd let you know.


...


*awaits incoming dad-jokes*",pansexual
Please help,"Hi I joined this community to get advice to coming out to my family, my brain tells me it's a bad choice and that it's my hormones acting please leave advice in the comments, am stressed and worried ",pansexual
Ima make heelys the transport of our people,They are the ultimate sign of pansexuality. Should i make a video backing up these points?,pansexual
I’m really confused,"Ok so I’ve always thought I was straight except for like a gay phase when I was 13, now for the most part I like girls, I prefer girls.

But then shadman made a picture of a trap called pink. I know not appropriate, but it made me realize that is hot. 

Now I look at transgirls and I see them just as attractive as cis girls. But when it comes to guys, I’ve only had a crush on like one guy recently i seem to be very specific about them. But like traps in real life or anime I’m all game.

So the morale of this is does this make me Pansexual?",pansexual
Hey guys. Looking for friends!,"Hi! My name is Thomas. I’m 16 and i’m pansexual as well as polyamorous. I’m not the most social guy, even if i’ve been getting better lately. I really like having people to talk to about stuff. This seems like a really chill community so I was hoping I could meet some chill people here :)

I’m really accepting of people and really just a chill dude. Nice enough I suppose. Really open about meeting new people! 

My discord is: Gummymyers126#4068 or just message me here if you don’t have a discord. ",pansexual
A little spacey pansexual/polyamorous flag I whipped up :&gt;,,pansexual
I have an idea.,"I have an idea.


That idea is complete unity, respect, and solidarity between bisexuals, polysexuals, and pansexuals.



I as a pan person am so tired of seeing anti pansexual sentiment in the queer community, unfortunately often from Bi people. I see ""pansexuals"" referenced as a regressive group who exist solely due to the misrepresentation and erasure of Bi people. I see pansexuals labelled as inherently transphobic/biphobic. I see pansexuals dismissed as ""special snowflakes"".


I as a pan person am so tired of seeing anti bisexual sentiment in the queer community, unfortunately often from pan people. I see bisexuals defined in ways they object to. I see bisexuals labelled as inherently transphobic. I see bisexuals erased and ignored.


I propose a revolution of sorts. This will include understanding that both pansexual and bisexual (and Polysexuals for that matter) are equally valid, real, and belong in the queer community. This will include not labelling bisexuals as regressive or transphobic. This will include not mocking pansexuality or pansexuals for their orientation. This will include understanding that while bisexual, pansexual, and polysexual may overlap in their usage and definitions, that the most important aspect is the human element: our experiences, and our truths.


I propose that instead of bickering over terms, we unite. We all hold very similar problems. We are dismissed by cishet and queer people alike. We are mocked, we are bullied. We have more in common than we know. And while we may have differences in attraction, or in the experiences that led us to the breath of fresh air that is finding a term to fit those experiences, we are stronger together.



Pansexuals are valid.
Polysexuals are valid.
Bisexuals are valid.


We own language. Language does not own us.


I may not understand, as a pan person, why someone is bisexual or Polysexual. And they may not understand pansexuality. But I trust that they know themselves and their lives. I only ask that they do the same for me, and that other pan people do the same for them.


What do you think? ",pansexual
Hi 👋🏻,Just thought I’d say hi 👋🏻 I’ve just discovered this subreddit - yay! Looking forward to chatting to you all 💗💛💙,pansexual
Episode 2: keeping secrets,,pansexual
Thinking about coming out to my parents.,"Thinking about coming out to my very religious mom and army Dad. I don’t know how to tell them. I already told my other siblings [f24],[f22],[f20],[m17] and they we fine and welcoming to me. I don’t know what my parents will do about it. I need help!",pansexual
Hi,Wassup.,pansexual
Who wears the pants picturestory,,pansexual
"I went to Michael's today to get what I needed for a pan pride bracelet, when I stumbled upon this pan-tastic pencil case.",,pansexual
"Since r/bisexual has lemon bars as their official welcoming gift food, I vote that we adopt pancakes as our official food.","When a new person joins r/bisexual we welcome them with ""welcome to the bi side, have a lemon bar"" (a reference to ""come to the dark side, we have cookies). 

Thus I propose pancakes be adopted as the official food of pansexuality because 1. It's in the name and 2. Pancakes are goood

Edit: pan pizzas are probably better (see comments); they're also customizable",pansexual
I'm not sure that I'm pan,"I'm sexually attracted to both genders but I've only ever had sexual experiences with women, though I see sex as a means to an end and love the mind and not the body, am I pansexual or some crazy hetero guy after something else?",pansexual
Hey! I’m new here!,Hey! I’m [f22] and I recently found I was pansexual! I’m proud to be pansexual. I’m in a relationship with a [mtf23] and I love her to death. It’s nice to be able to come out of the closet. I haven’t told my parents yet. Both are very religious. This is the first time I’m coming out of the closet on here! ,pansexual
"I made this lil wallpaper in 5 mins, hope you guys enjoy!",,pansexual
Edit of previous wallpaper w/ no flag,,pansexual
People mislabeling your sexuality; do you correct them?,"Hey guys. Long time Reddit lurker, finally bit the bullet and made an account recently. On mobile so I apologize if this isn’t formatted correctly. 

Grew up in a very liberal community and have always been fortunate to have open minded, accepting friends and family but never personally met another person who identifies as pansexual. In the last few years I’ve gradually gravitated towards sexual experiences with men (I identify as male) and recently entered a serious relationship with a really incredible guy. 

For anybody in a similar situation, do people/friends close to you often refer you you as gay? I’ve had gay and straight friends alike label me (ie “It’s a good thing you’re gay.” Etc) in innocuous ways. And while I personally don’t really care about labels, there’s a part of me that feels like a part of my identity is being erased. I’ll likely be with my current boyfriend indefinitely, but in my mind, that still doesn’t change how I identify. 

Just curious to hear anybody else’s thoughts or if anyone else has dealt with this before! ",pansexual
My Pansexual Diary N° 3 Not so Cool things on the coming out road,"My Pansexual Diary N° 3

Not so Cool things on the coming out road

By Rive Jon.

\*\*warning\*\* the following article is based on my personal experience, in this article I will talk about feminism, toxic masculinity, gender identity, gender expression and other things you may disagree with or by trigger by. and if you keep reading this is under your own will and I’m not considered responsible for how you fell about it, consider yourself warn 

A lot of good and nice things have come out of my coming out experience, but I have to be brutally honest with you my friends, I also had to face a lot of unbelievable nastiness and the “diversity” of those things had been overwhelming at times, actually it has made me re think a lot of my positions in regards of gender issues, toxic masculinity and a lot of things a used to do as a heterosexual cisgender male, but that’s is something to write about in another articles, even 2 more; this article is about some of the thing I had to face as a Pansexual and I’m sure that everyone can relate with my position.

Before we dive into the “not cool” let me reveal a bit more about my past.  Back in the day I had a lot of misconceptions in regard of gender identity and sexual orientation, despite my psychological background I was the kind of person that would say “personally I don’t agree but I respect your choice”, looking back at it I realized how many levels of wrong there is in it, beginning by realizing that the “personally” is a really condescending thing to say; second: is not a choice, I don’t chose whom I fell attracted to like a chose my cloths, and thinking that adding the “I respect” don’t make the sentence a good thing to say, but here’s is a catch;  I wasn’t trying to be disrespectful I was just ignorant, I didn’t had bad intentions, just didn’t have information, and now that I’m in the other side of the sidewalk I am more compressive about being ignorant about something but not being mean spirited, and for the most par that is cool, I will deal with that because I know they intention is not to harm me.

With that being said, I want to let you know that some of the “not cool” things I will talk about are also based on lack of knowledge, and some of the people that do this things are not really bad, but still doing that is not right and can make some persons feel really uncomfortable; also, if it turns out that you are someone that happens to do some of thins things probably it will be a chance to challenge and reconsidered  some of your position the same way I did.

And now, not cool.      

1° apparently I don’t “exist” and Pansexuality doesn’t exit.

This is the first thing I had to face joining the LGBT community, the fact was a lot of hate and misinformation about what being pansexual means, and I was shock to find that inside the LGBT community there is a lot of people that still don’t believe that pansexuality, or other forms of sexual orientation other than homo, hetero and bi, can exists, and not just that, I respect every person right to believe whatever they want, but they can also get really cruel and it goes from denying that pansexuality exist to insult someone just because how this person really is. 

Needless to say that I was also victim of insults and other nasty thing throw at me and a lot of people more just because our my sexual orientation, which is something we don´t choose, is just the way we are, the way I am, and to be in denial of that, witch I was most part my life, is something really harmful and painful, it left a vacuum in my heart that I tried to fill with other people attention and love, and now just because a group of persons don’t agree or don´t like it they are going to deny my existence and my identity, no not haven it,  that’s not right;  and is up to defense our right to an identity and to have our existence acknowledge, there’s progress but there’s still a lot of work to do and everywhere there’ll be people that is toxic and harmful, and is up to us to confront all the hate.

2° Just because I’m Pan does not mean I’m attracted to everyone or I want to have sex with everyone .

One of the first things I did was create a Facebook account to interact in pansexual groups and such (by the way if you want to send me friend request at Rivé Jon, my profile is the one with the Pan flag over my face), and for the most part is actually really nice to interact, I love this new Facebook, but with it has also come a lot of terrible things, that include being a victim of toxic masculinity from another perspective, ever since I open that new Facebook account I had been getting a lot of people whom want to have cybersex with me, down right to send me dick pics or offer me money for doing so, witch I have nothing angst if someone does it, except for the fact that at any moment I said I wanted to do that, one person even try take advantage of the fact that I live in Venezuela by saying that because I live in a poor country he’s doing me a favor offering me money for showing myself on cam, ok if you want to pay for cybersex go to chaturbate or something, but is not OK to hustle a person to do so, other guy got angry at me because I didn’t want to be his boyfriend, we live in two different countries and the most important part, I DON¨T KNOW HIM!  and other guy began to throw insults at me because I didn’t want to suck his …. until he ….., you probably get the idea;  that time I lost my temper and speak out my mind to that son of a ….. Sorry but remember all of this makes me angry again, anyway, just because some is pansexual or on a LGBTQ+ page or group or anything doesn´t mean that this person wants to have sex or see unwanted private parts pictures it doesn´t matter how “in need” the other person might be is a disrespectful thing to do and it can really get in someone mind.

After all that I went to talk to my BFF and told her all the harassment I got online, and her response was, “baby that happened to me all the time, almost every day there is an idiot that think because he want I must show him my parts, and after some time it really gets in to your head” and just the idea of having to experience that for most of my life made felt ill.  Until that point I knew that cyber harassment was a issue, specially to women, but is not the same to know that happens, that to experience the gross and discuss caused by that, and to think that women all around the world had to put with all the toxic and ugly behavior and things we men do to them, is not right, is just not, and now that I’m more aware of that I can´t keep being part of that, and I must do something about it.        

This is for today, I know is kind of short but this 2 are the most annoying and shocking things I had to face so far, and in regard of se the second it actually had change my view on women issues and feminism, this journey has been full of surprises so far, and again I can only say how happy I am to make it,  I’m sure that with time a lot more will come up, and you can bet that I’ll be ready for it.

Until next time my loves, take care.",pansexual
"I'm not a fan of yellow, so i just stick with the Bi flag. Sorry-not sorry.",,pansexual
Someone drew this on the wall at my local coffee shop - Pansexual Jesus in even known in France guys,,pansexual
When I tell someone I’m pan....,,pansexual
"Happy 10,000 pansexuals!!!","Wow! We blew right past 10,000 subscribers! I am humbled at the love and support I see in this community as we grow and understand who we are.

Let's create a custom design for our subreddit! Who would like to support me in building a community created theme for /r/pansexual? Let's make this happen!

It is an honor to serve this community as your founder and moderator. My love to each and every one of you.",pansexual
Coming out to people,"Who should I come out to next I told my best friend. Now you choose 
° My sister.   (I hope you pick her but whatever)
°My Christian grandma 
°A different friend 
°A random person from Insta (not here I just came out on here anyways)


Thats it pick pls
",pansexual
My new laptop's keyboard is customizable. What else? :D,,pansexual
STEM - Research for Diversity in LGBTQ+,"Dear Reddit Users -
  
I wanted to pass along an invitation that you can extend to your colleagues, students, and other interested parties which offers the opportunity to participate in a current research study. 

To be included in the study participants must be at least 18 years of age, live in the United States, and are engaged in a Science, Engineering, Technology, or Math (STEM) field. We have included those engaged in STEM fields to encompass advanced graduate students, postdoctoral scholars, academic faculty, researchers, and industry professionals..
 
We are conducting this study to better understand the degree to which lesbian, gay, bisexual, trans, queer, or asexual (LGBTQA) diversity, and commitment to diversity were predictive of workplaces that fostered creativity in the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) careers. This will entail your completion of online surveys. Your participation is expected to take approximately 15-20 minutes to complete. The content of the surveys should cause no more discomfort than you would experience in your everyday life.

You can find the survey on Qualtrics and complete the survey at any time. The link is below:
https://kansasedu.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_29ucqdEm3dLczLn 

If you have questions or difficulty accessing the survey please contact Jonathan Huffman (jonathan.huffman@ku.edu)   .

Your time and potential involvement is greatly appreciated. 
 
Sincerely,

Jonathan Huffman (M.A.)  
Principal Investigators                        
Counseling Psychology 
Joseph R. Pearson Hall, Rm 621       
University of Kansas                              
Lawrence, KS 66045                              
785 864-3931                             

Dr. Barbara Kerr, Ph.D.
Faculty Supervisor
Counseling Psychology
Joseph R. Pearson Hall, Rm 621   
University of Kansas         
Lawrence, KS  66045    
785 864-3931",pansexual
This LGBTQ Alliance Partner is selling adult toys to raise money for the prostate cancer foundation,"Thought this was cool and felt compelled to share with my pan friends

https://sextoysformen.co/

https://sextoysformen.co/pages/prostate-cancer-foundation

https://sextoysformen.co/pages/lgbtq-humanist-alliance",pansexual
The Foot of Nope (x-posted from r/wholesomeromance),,pansexual
Good Pansexual Jokes?,"Does anyone have any positive or neutral pansexual jokes or memes? (Besides ""dO YoU haVE SeX WIth pANs?"") I would kind of like to drown out the annoyingly obvious with some of original jokes we can call our own, to kind of band together as a community.

Here are some I've heard of:

**Straight outta the PANtry**

**My sexual preference is YEA**

**I'm PAN-duh**

**Pansexy**

**PANtastic**

\---------

If you don't have any, you can make up jokes!

I'll try to make up some, as well, but I suck at at humor so please forgive me. xD

\--------

\-

**""You can flip this PANcake anytime""**  (equivalent of ""step on me"")

\-

**\*sticks out thumb\* ""Don't PANic""**     (I haven't read the Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy, so correct me if I got the reference wrong)

\-

**Parent: What would you like to eat?**

**Pansexual Child: Bamboo**

**Parent: ...**

**Pansexual Child: 'Cause I'm PAN, duh!**

\-

**""I'm a pan-sex-ual, in a pan-sexy world. It's so PANtastic!""**

\-

**Come to the pan side, we have PANini**

\-

**Come to the pan side, we have bad puns!**",pansexual
Pan Pride rally car?,,pansexual
"Liberté, égalité, pansexualité.",,pansexual
Everyone need hugs. 🌸💜,,pansexual
going to my first pride,"hi so i'm pan and will be going to my first pride march in september, and i'm not really sure as to what i should expect.  anyone got any advice?",pansexual
I'll be posting some motivational hedgehoggies on the sub the shared post is on. You're welcome to join!~ come share some cuteness(:,,pansexual
"Because of what we are and our shapes, are we......",Pan-dimensional?,pansexual
My pansexual diary N° 2 Exploring my sexuality without having sex.,"Last time I talk about my sexuality I said I still was having problems accepting that I like men, a part of me still fell that is wrong, homosexuality is wrong and all that “lovely stuff” (Being sarcastic) so I decided to do something about and explore my attraction to males, so that I can feel comfortable with this part of me and my first idea was, “get in grinder, date a bunch of guys go slow and you’ll feel comfortable about liking men”, that didn’t go well.

First, for some reason most of the guys here that use grinder just want to have sex, we don’t know each other and even when I agree to see them they wanted to have sex right away and without protection, so that’s a ¡BIG NO! for me, anyway it was a bad idea, and about  1 week of the same thing I drop the plan, and then I had another idea, and ¡spoilers! this was really good idea.

What I did was using my psychology background to analyze the origin of my rejection towards my homosexual feeling, that’s where all the thing I said about what I was dealing with in the last post came from, to make a long story short it came from my family, specially my dad and his homophobia, and I guess I always knew I had some of that same sex attraction in me and if he find out he will hate me the same way he hates gay people, so I was conditioned to give a certain response, and that was rejection towards homosexual feelings, thought and behaviors.

And with that out of the way I just need it a “intervention plan” to decondition myself, now that I know where my rejection came from I could move forward and face it, not as the child afraid to be rejected  but as the adult that need to accept himself the way he is, and decided to explore my sexuality without having sex, instead what I did was progressively tell myself that I’m and adult, this is part of me and that as an adult is fine to find men attractive, and I’m having a lot of fun giving me the freedom to find men attractive, also it feels so good! The down side of things is that I still live with my parents and I’m still really afraid to tell them because I don’t have anywhere to go and with the current crisis we are living I don’t want to be a burden to someone else, but fear not my friends, I’m a man with a plan, and things will come my way one way or another.

That’s it for today, there’s still more thing to talk about this journey, and hopefully I’ll wright about it soon.     ",pansexual
Hey i made a pansexual phone case and that was how i came out to my family. Here is my fave picture of me,,pansexual
Wanted to show my pan pride makeup! Going to Brighton pride and this will be my first time repping pan colours! (Last time I went I didn’t know what pan was and went as a bisexual) Hope everyones had a safe and happy pride month!,,pansexual
My Pansexual diary," About a week ago I finally come to terms with my sexual orientation, it wasn´t an easy thing to do, I had to overcome a lot of problems and personal issues regarding who I feel attracted to and the way I view myself, I also had to face a lot of things I was trying to run away from, and still carry some of it with me, again not easy to overcome, and yet, I never felt more happy in my life, I finally know who I am, I feel complete, and these days every time a had been stress out, or angry, I just come back to this and fill my hart with love and joy.  
So I want to share with you, my beloved friends, some of the things I had to overcome, both as a personal exercise facing them and as a testimonial (for lack of a better word) to whomever is going through something similar.  
So first a grew up in a traditional and strict home, my parents are not very religious, yet they were very strict in regards gender stereotypes, I usually was punish for showing “inappropriate behaviors for a men”, of course that and other things made me a very confused, insecure and sad person, Enter college at age 22, still not a single clue of who or what I am, but something happened, I had to live on the campus and was the first time I wasn\`t living with my parents and began to felt weird, I noticed that I felt attracted to men, I found trans woman more attractive than most ciswoman I knew at the time, also felt strongly attracted to tomboys gender fluid, gender neutral, bigender, and trans men; I didn\`t now about the gender spectrum at the time, (if I’m misusing a particular gender please let me know and apologies in advance) The point is I felt all this emotional and sexual attraction, it was crazy strong, and also felt guilty for having them, because I wasn\`t “behaving like a men”; in fact my first same sex experience was in college but because of the guilt a felt I didn´t enjoy it, yet I was always going back for more.  
It took 9 years for me to accept that I can’t fit into one category, no matter how hard I try, that I don\`t have to feel guilt because whom I fell attracted to, that is normal that I find attractive “masculine women, and feminine men”, that is ok that I find more attractive no binary, gender fluid or queer, or simply that I can like someone regardless gender or sexual orientation. ",pansexual
Hi! I'm Rivé," Hi I’m Rivé (Not my real name I wish it was) I’m Cisgender male pansexual, a bit queer, all love, I'm here to share with you my coming out journey, I still have a long way to go and I know is not something new but I fell I must tell someone everything I’m going through right now, is such an exciting and wonderful experience and I need to share it, and although there’s still some bad things and I still feel I have a long road to walk, I know deep in my hart I’m on the right way ",pansexual
"I'm super confused, Am I Pansexual","Hi! I'm a 14 year old male and I'm super confused on if I'm pansexual or naw!

So for about a year I've know that I was bisexual, but like a month ago I've been thinking that I'm pansexual! So I've always had an attraction to males and females but for like a few months I've had attractions to non-binary people and transgender people!

I would see a person who I think looks beautiful and they would tell me that they wouldn't like me because there trans! Now a few years ago I would have said that I didn't like them anymore but now I still have an attraction to them even if there trans or non-binary!

So am I bisexual or am I pansexual? And due to things that have happened before we're I've mistyped some stuff, im telling you that I'm not trying to be negative towards trans people or non-Binary people ",pansexual
Relationship education program for cis male couples!,"Hey! My name is Arielle and I'm a queer researcher and relationship skills coach at Northwestern University. I want to give y'all some info about 2GETHER, a project we have going on for cisgender male couples.

2GETHER is a paid research study that involves a relationship education program-- where you and your partner can learn healthy relationship skills like communication, coping, and other ways to strengthen your relationship. We have a national online program and an in-person program for people who live in Chicago.

There will be follow-up surveys and free at-home STI testing before and after the 2GETHER program. Because we're a university, all data we collect is protected by IRB and federal regulations. If you and your partner are eligible to take part, you'll see a consent form, which has more info about your privacy rights.

Fun bonus: as a thank you for completing all parts of 2GETHER, each partner will receive $250!

Want to find out if you qualify, or learn more? Check out our eligibility screener: [https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY](https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY)

Even more info on our website: [http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/](http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/)

IRB #STU00202802, STU00202939",pansexual
A question for you all...,"Am I(18M) pansexual? I have preferences like feminine features or qualities, but the idea of same-sex or transgender relationships don’t really bother me as long as we have a connection. I don’t really have any details, as I’m still figuring things out, but I was hoping for some opinions...",pansexual
I just realized that I'm Pansexual,"Not really sure what to do with this information but hey. It's good to know, I guess.",pansexual
How do I come out as pan and be taken seriously? Never told anyone except my bi friend and my other friend. Not sure what to do,,pansexual
"Hi! I (28m) just came out, and I wanted to mention a part of my experience that they don't tell you about in the movies.","So I've been questioning for years and was only able to sort of connect the dots recently and put a name to my feelings towards my sexuality. What no one told me was the incredible feeling that filled me the second I thought to myself ""I am pansexual."" My chakras all opened, I went super saiyan, I was just possessed with this incredible joy of finally being so sure of what had been a really mysterious part of my personal identity. It was a first kiss, a good cry, and hundreds of other little positive feelings all at once. 

I guess the only real point to this post is...did anyone else feel this rush of cosmic energy when they realized who they were?",pansexual
Describing pan to others,"How do you describe to someone who may not understand all that it means??

For me, I just realized probably 6 years ago that I'm pansexual. The easiest way to explain it is that "" if they're turned on, I'm turned on"" no matter what they identify as. Looking for other suggestions! ",pansexual
Hello,"Hi im Alix and im pansexual, asexual polyamorous, and ftm transgender. Im 14 and love books, various anime, cartoon-y shows, and art. ",pansexual
New here!,"I’m kinda new to this subreddit and to realizing I’m pan (I’ve already made all the kitchenware jokes to myself out loud so as to take away the burn).

What I’m saying is I’m a tad shy and nervous. ",pansexual
Added a pan pin to my jacket!!,,pansexual
Finally got a flag,After a long wait I finally have one on my wall,pansexual
Help!,"How do you explore being pan while being single?

I know this sounds weird, but after it being neither here nor there for so long, I just kinda want to talk about it and live it for a while.",pansexual
Quick debate..,Which is better: Boobs or guys’ asses?,pansexual
My wife (38f-pan) and I (31m-pan) are in an open marriage and want to explore,"We're both hungry for what the world has to offer and we are open to different arrangements of having an open marriage, couple sharing, having our own individual partners, or having a single person to share experiences with together. A big problem I've run into is we don't want to be perceived as just wanting to experiment, I don't want someone to feel objectified by us being interested in them because they're of a different gender identification that would be new for us to experience. For instance we have recently discussed how it would be fun to have some time with a trans woman, but we don't want her to feel singled out just because of her identity. I feel like I'm rambling now if you have any advice for us to break into exploring our sexuality without alienating a potential partner or partners it would be appreciated, please feel free ask in the comments. Thank you!!",pansexual
"[COMING OUT] Came out to my homophobic mom, threw me back into questioning phase, send help (X-post with LGBTteens)","I only wanted to come out to my dad as bisexual (even though I'm pan but I wanted to make things easier), which went smoothly, but he said that he can't and won't keep secrets from my mom. I didn't want to tell her, but untimately I did. She did seem quiet about it yesterday (shock phase, I guess). But today when she got back from work she started her speech about how I could possibly find a job like this, have family, kids (which are the ultimate goals of life and you're garbage if you haven't accomplished these AS WE ALL KNOW) and I won't have friends and die lonely. All these, while comparing me to some woman who left her boyfriend for a girl (like she knows everything about them - spoiler: she doesn't), my uncle who got married twice, once to a Romani woman, but saying that she still loves me. I'm conflicted that I love her too, but how can she say stuff like this?
And the thing is, I'm starting to believe her. She's messing with my head, and I don't know anything for sure now. 
Please, someone who's experienced this, help!",pansexual
I came out to my (totally accepting) mum today. I was greeted by this rainbow on the way home.,,pansexual
How to come out as pan?,"Title kinda says it all but does anyone have any tips about how they came out as pansexual? I’m worried because I’m not sure people will get it and I feel very awkward having to then explain what being pansexual means. I know I don’t have to come out and I feel kinda frustrated that I even have to come out (no one has to come out as straight right?) but I want the people around me to know the true me. So yeah, would really appreciate hearing people’s experience about how they came out and if they had to explain it. Cheers guys! ",pansexual
"Hello, I am LBGT &amp; I created a LBGT Friendly discord support server. We have fun, games, and peer support. The Island welcomes you!","Hello, I am LBGT &amp; I created a LBGT Friendly discord support server. We have fun, games, and peer support. The Island welcomes you!

* We have roughly 700 members
* We have a fun main chat channel
* We have awesome peer support
* We have an LBGT-friendly community 
* All ages are welcome 
* We have active game nights especially on weekends
* Come join us!

[https://discord.gg/9tg6W43](https://discord.gg/9tg6W43)",pansexual
A Discord server for LGBT+ people who like music!,"What is Discord?

Discord is a real-time chat service with voice channels, roles, and other things. There are many things in the channel like gender-specific roles, music bots, and other things.

Why should I join?

Because we are trying to make something different than other LGBT+ servers. Other LGBT+ servers just focus on the fact that the people in the server are part of the LGBT+ community, which is O.K., but it doesn't make it easy to make friendships on the server. With this server, we all bond over one thing - music. And possibly other things!

Link - https://discord.gg/3jzsXec

I'm the owner of the server, and I'm actually pansexual, too!",pansexual
New. Advice needed/wanted,I’ll be completely honest I only realized that I’m pansexual a few months ago and really my only source of figuring this out is my friend who is also pansexual. So any sort of advice going forward would be help due to my friend is not always helpful and it’s only one persons insight I’m going off of.,pansexual
I think this is the right forum for this,"I’ve identified as Pan for a few years now, and am open about it if prompted or it becomes relevant. Recently I’ve begun to wonder, though. I don’t explicitly think of people as attractive beyond a “yes that person fits the definition of a pretty person” unless they want to have intercourse. If a person does come up to me with the desire of sex, I have this “why not” reaction, regardless of gender, sex, orientation, appearance, what have you. Is this still pansexuality? I feel like it is, but has anyone here heard of a way to describe this  ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ attitude towards sexuality before?",pansexual
Need some help,"So, I'm a 26 (going on 27) year old male (I identify as gender fluid though), and though I've identified as pansexual since I was about 16 I feel like I've always leaned in the asexual side of things.

What I'm wanting help with though, is asking if it's possible for sexual behaviors to be learned unnaturally, as I also have problems with rage (tied to an abusive childhood) and it's always had a strong tie to my sexual drives. Mentally, I don't like the idea of sex and never really have, but for some reason my mind has been stuck on sex to a perverted degree, and it's never felt natural to me.

So in short, is it possible I've been identifying wrong for 11 years, or something else of that nature?",pansexual
I don't know what to do :(,"I told my step-mother I was Pan a few months ago. she was very understanding and told me she wouldn't talk to anyone about it because she wanted me to do so. Just learned that she told everyone I was pan. I didn't confront her because i do not want to create any family trouble, but I don't want to let this pass. I trusted her and she broke her promise. I am starting to think she is not as reliable as I thought she was... I don't know what to do... help",pansexual
Looking for pals,"Hey guys, I’m a 26 yo female from Va. Along the way I’ve lost all of my friends except one after coming out a couple years ago. I’m trying to meet new people but not many people in the south agree with my “lifestyle” or they just think I’m disgusting and use my sexuality as an excuse to sleep around. I feel very ostracized, I have my family thankfully but I would love to make friends that actually share the same open-mindedness and acceptance. Idc if you’re 10 miles away or 10,000 I want to meet you! ",pansexual
Looking to make text friends for ongoing conversation.,"I am a male in my late 20's. I've kept my sexuality and my sexual interest to myself most of my life.

**INTP**

Quite introverted. But excessively nice. I like having a small number of strong personal connections and I don't enjoy talking to more than a few people at a time. In this way, I am not social.

I see intimacy and love though a lens of fluidity. Currenty finding my place in the world of polyamory/non-monogamy and exploring my sexuality.

I'm really just looking to chat with anyone at all about anything at all and I've met a few cool people on reddit.

Being Canadian would be cool but definitely not required.

If you are a lady who would date bi/pansexual men just let me know that you exist and restore a bit of my faith.

**Things I value in life:**

\- Happiness/Altruism

\- Personal Connection/Conversation

\- Thought/Questioning everything, even oneself

\- Education/Critical Thinking/Gaining Perspective/Self Challenge

\- Music/Art/Words/Creation

\- Animals

\- Marijuana

\- Exploring Psychedelic Drugs (yet to try - I believe there is something to learn there. I'd be a failure to myself if I never open the lid to see what's inside)

\- Attending Tomorrowland

**Shit I think is awesome:**

\- Skateboarding

\- Podcasts

\- Ted Talks

\- Psychology

\- Videogames

\- Funny TV sitcoms

\- Movies

\- MMA

\- Deviation from social norms

**Current primary musical genre of interest:** HipHop

\- I also love EDM, Metal and all kinds of other stuff.

**Send me a message or chat request. I also have kik!**

I look forward to meeting new people! :)",pansexual
Help! Confused!,"I think I'm pan-romantic/demi-sexual, but have no experience to back that up, other than it feels about right.

I've never explored it in any real depth and just kinda need to talk to some peeps who are in the same boat.

Help would be greatly appreciated!",pansexual
Thoughts on poly vs Omni?,"All the terminology trying to describe lifelong feelings. I glommed onto Pan as it was the first to come up as an everybody is potentially attractive. But while the gender of who I’m attracted to doesn’t halt attraction, I’m not genderblind, their presented gender (or pushback against gender expectation) is a part of the attraction. 

But Pan is so much cooler a term than Omni so what to do?",pansexual
"For those that don't know what a pansexual is. I didn't, now I think it's awesome.",,pansexual
"Congrats, Brendon! Welcome to the club :)",,pansexual
My phones background what do you guys think,,pansexual
10 Signs Your Partner Is Abusive,,pansexual
I came out as pansexual &amp; my fiancé came out as bi.,"We've been together for over four years, engaged for two. I came out as pansexual in the past few months &amp; it feels so freeing. Most of my friends know (even knew before I could admit it), and only one of my family members know. I'm too afraid to tell the others. My fiancé is very supportive &amp; is enjoying this time of exploration as well. Shortly after coming out, I met a beautiful trans* woman and now she's our girlfriend! Needless to say, I am very happy with life right now &amp; I never expected any of this. I am proud to say that I am pansexual, queer, poly, and in love with two incredible individuals. ",pansexual
Need someone to talk to? Let me help :),"Hi guys! I see a lot of posts on here about needing someone to talk to, but everyone always points to group chats and discords and things like that. I personally find myself infuriated any time I enter a new group chat, and I assume I’m not the only one who feels that way, so I wanted to offer my help for anyone who needs a more 1 on 1 conversation from a fellow pansexual. So, if you ever need to vent, process, or even just have a casual conversation with someone, my inbox is always open. Love y’all ❤️

(I’m a 22 year old pansexual man, in case that matters at all)",pansexual
Hotlines/Resources,"**Here are some resources that may be helpful for folks who need support. Does anyone know of others?**

**National Suicide Prevention Lifeline**  1-800-273-TALK (8255)

Suicide prevention telephone hotline funded by the U.S. government. Provides free, 24-hour assistance

**National Hopeline Network** 1-800-SUICIDE (784-2433).

Toll-free telephone number offering 24-hour suicide crisis support.

**The Trevor Project** 1-866-488-7386

Crisis intervention and suicide prevention services for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and questioning (LGBTQ) youth. 24/7 hotline.

**Gay, Lesbian, Bisexual, Transgender National Youth Talkline:** The GLBT National Youth Talkline is a hotline provides providing free and confidential telephone and internet peer-counseling, information and local resources for gay, lesbian, bisexual, transgender and questioning youth callers throughout the United States.

(800) 246-PRIDE

**Gay, Lesbian, Bisexual, Transgender National Helpline:** The GLBT National Hotline provides free and confidential telephone and internet peer-counseling, information and local resources for gay, lesbian, bisexual, transgender and questioning callers throughout the United States.

(888) 843-4564",pansexual
Coming Out Pan,"I am 29 y/o with a spouse/family that is SUPER conservative. I have always been attracted to both men and women. But recently my eyes were opened up to the broad spectrum of genders. I feel like I identify more as Pan because honestly I have found myself attracted to way more than just standard male/female. I’m so scared about coming out, I know my family will disown me. And my spouse knows I like both male/female but he is kinda ignorant to the whole gender thing and has no intentions of changing that. ",pansexual
I literally know nothing. Help,"I have no idea if I’m posting this to the right place, I’ve never been on reddit before. My 11 year old daughter recently came out to me as pansexual. And I know nothing about pansexuality or the LGBQT community really. 
I’m from a small midwestern town and I do not know anyone who isn’t straight (that I know of) I have absolutely no issues with her sexuality or anyone’s. The more love we have in the world the better in my opinion. I just want her to be happy so please help me learn what I need to know to best support her. I don’t want to be ignorant, I’ve just never looked into any of this stuff before and I have no idea where to start. ",pansexual
I made a pansexual pride flag keychain,,pansexual
really tired of not being taken seriously,"""isn't pansexuality, like, the same as being bi?""

""pansexuality is just for people who want to feel special with a label""

""PANsexuality... haha do u fuck pans lol""

etc, etc, etc. 

why can't i just identify with what suits me best? why do i have to see this shit EVERYTIME this sexuality is brought up?",pansexual
I Have No Idea Where I Am On The Spectrum Anymore,,pansexual
Upcoming LGBTQ Related Youtube channel! (:,"This upcoming channel starting sunday, I will start sharing some videos about life experiences such as coming out as lesbian to my family. I also want to build a community/family during this journey. Subscribe and be my friend?[ Iana Relampagos's Youtube Channel](https://www.youtube.com/user/fluffyvlog)",pansexual
24[T4R] Transgirl Looking to Find Herself &lt;3,Hello. Im a 24 year old transgirl. I'm currently closeted (i.e. I don't dress and have not begun my transition) but am looking to explore myself with others. I long to be treated like a regular woman in a setting where I can just be myself,pansexual
I Identify as Pansexual but I haven't dated anyone other than a straight male,"I am currently 19 yrs old about to be 20 and I've known my interest for a person's gender never really mattered ever since I was a kid. I had a crush on my best friend (who was girl) in kinder and also in 5th grade (who was also a girl too). I've had girl crushes over the years and I also find genders out of the binary gender. But I've never dated anyone out of boys before. I never had the guts to talk to my girl crushes to the point I could say I'm in love with them nor have I considered thinking about them being interested in me. I haven't met anyone out of the binary gender that I had a crush with (not that I know everyone's gender identification... But I'm living in an area in asia where sexuality isn't really talked about as much or something? or I'm just the asshole who assumes that). I have this paranoia with talking to people I am attracted other than straight men and think maybe they're not into women....But I do know that there was 1 girl who was bisexual but I was too shy and awkward to make a move. It's very frustrating...  


Anyways... I just wanted to get some tips on how to stop being an awkward idiot... Any tips for someone like me?",pansexual
Struggling with my Identity. Help! (x-post from r/bisexual),"Hi Folks,

Sorry in advance if this ends up being quite a lengthy post or if it sounds like I am rambling. I have been going through a lot of late and I want to state my case as much as I can and as clearly as I can in order to get any advice or help.

To start this off let me bring you up to speed with who I am. I'm 28, male and in a long term hetro relationship. I have always considered myself somewhere on the spectrum of bi/pan-sexuality but I have never confided in, or expressed this with anyone in my life outside the small handful of bi/pan sexual encounters that I have engaged in years ago.

***The reason for this I*** ***put this down to:***

**1)** My Rural/Catholic Upbringing.

**2)** The fact that I am not emotionally or romantically attracted to men.

Number 1 is obvious. It's hard to find understanding and acceptance about something that may seem ""out of the norm"" in my setting growing up which is unfortunately the same story time and time again for all of us.

Number 2, I never felt that I was ""full on bi/pan"" (whatever that means) as I would be attracted to and would connect emotionally, romantically, physically and sexually with Women but I would from time to time get ***SUPER*** horny in changing rooms, showers, thinking about cock, etc.

So in my later teen years I experimented a few times by connecting with some guys here and there for a little bit of experimentation. During these years I got to explore what turned me on and what didn't. I would engage, swap and receive all the fun (safe) sexual acts with men but I could never get behind or enjoy any emotional attachment, kissing, making out, romance etc. As a matter of fact, as soon as the deed was done so to speak, I would be gone like a thief in the night and wouldn't return to my attraction or inclination of men for a few weeks or months after. What is interesting looking back on this period of my life now is that I still all along was engaging in relations with Women, some of the times I met with men we watched straight porn together and I connected and hooked up a few times with a transgender (mtf) Woman. So all along I was under the impression that I was straight but my own little dirty secret was that I would get my rocks off from time to time with guys or male reproductive organs if the occasion came up.

I then ended up meeting a wonderful Woman, we hit it off like a house of fire, had a whirlwind romance, did long distance for a few years, I ended up moving to be with her, pursued a life together and have had a great time so far and have engaged in this relationship now for about 7 years. I would reflect on my experimentation as a younger man and as so many others tragically dismiss our orientation, I deemed it all as a phase. (D'oh!)

However, for the past few months now I have been going through spats of anxiety, alientation and feeling lost from a culmination of a few things that I am putting down to a Third-Life Crisis. I am starting to wonder if I am where I should be in life right now emotionally, professionally, and geographically. I am also reflecting on my current relationship which is with a Wonderful, Kind, Loving Woman and wondering if it is right for me for now, the near future and for life?! Nothing major has changed in our relationship but I just feel that recently for a while now we have not been gelling and have been noticing some drifting apart and disinterest creeping in. She had mentioned last night about behaving more like roommates more than anything else recently.

With all of this comes the realisation after lurking this subreddit for a while now that I am Bi/Pan. A dead giveaway for this now in hindsight is that I have really never stopped in fantasizing and masturbating to bi, and trans porn since I started seeing my partner. I now know that I need to address this and I need to grow into this new realization and acceptance of who I am. I understand that the first matter to address is sitting down with my partner and having that classic conversation.

I can't tell with my partner if it's a case of the chicken or the egg but I feel like my sexuality is linked to all of this. Either with our strained relationship comes wonderment of my sexuality and if I need to explore my sexuality more to know what I want in life. Or is it that the prospect of continuing a long-term relationship is scaring me as I will always have an unfulfilled longing for living my life as an open, single bi-male and this is leading to me becoming distant in my current relationship.

If you've read this far, you have my heart. I love you and thank you for wanting to know more about what I am going through. All I ask is if you have any advice, pearls of wisdom, support, love.

Thank You. &lt;3",pansexual
"Attracted to genders in different ways, but also kinda demi? Please help me figure me out.","Hi, woman over 30 here, only recently heard of demisexual and while I identify as that, I also wanted to know if there's a better way to identify how I feel. 

I only crush on guys romantically. But I don't even want to see them naked, until I have a strong emotional bond with them. So I've just figured I'm a hetero- demi? But I also see women and think ""hot damn, I wanna touch"". So maybe I'm bi... but maybe homosexual and demi-heterosexual? What? 

And when I get really close to someone, regardless of gender, I just want to shower them with kisses and cuddle and touch. The urge is really strong regardless of their relationship to me, like friends or family members. But with women I don't want to date or have sex. Just kiss and touch.

Am I just weird? Anyone have any ideas? ",pansexual
Why do I feel outcasted from Pride?,Ever since Ive come out Ive felt more and more ostracized not only from the people that i used to consider friends but from the LGBTQ+ community. Ive even had someone within the community tell me it isnt real and its an excuse to be promiscuous. Is this normal? ,pansexual
Well heck I need help,"First, some context. I have had a crush on this girl for about four months now. About a month ago, I told her I had a crush on her. She said she didn’t feel the same way, but we could still remain friends and since then we have resumed our friendship like nothing happened. Now, she’s moving. We can still text and stuff, but I don’t know how to maintain our friendship when we hardly ever see each other.",pansexual
College Roommate Trouble,"So I’ll preface this by saying I’m a guy going into second year of university. I’ve known I was at least bisexual for about four or five years now, but I haven’t been really open about it since I live in a pretty conservative area and I don’t want to deal with that drama. But now I go to school in a crazy liberal area and I finally feel like I can be open about myself, which is great!

I ended up rooming with a guy with a lot of similar interests to me, so we were playing some video games with some of my friends and I wanted to test the waters a bit, see how ok he would be with my sexuality. Long story short, I make a couple jokes about being spit-roasted, he says “I’d obviously prefer it if you weren’t gay,” I laugh it off, end of subject.

We move in together in the fall, I don’t mention I’m pansexual since I don’t want to make him uncomfortable (we’re going to be living together for a year and all), and it’s not like it had the opportunity to come up since I’m not exactly “sexually active” by no choice of my own. But basically all freshman year I’ve only gone on dates with women and I feel super closeted since I don’t even have any queer friends and I hadn’t ventured into the LGBT+ dating scene at all.

Because of a number of circumstances (mostly study abroad), I’m not going to be rooming with any of my friends next year, so I’m in the luck of the draw. I’ve got no clue who my roommate is going to be, but most likely it’ll be a guy around my age, probably a year younger, and because of statistics he’ll also probably be straight (even if he’s not nothing sexual would likely happen since that could lead to some messy situations).

I want my roommate to know what I’m about, but I also don’t want to make it weird for him. I know I shouldn’t care, I normally don’t, but being someone’s college roommate is a long-term agreement not to make the other overly uncomfortable. God forbid my roommate’s a total conservative, but does anyone have any experience or advice with this?",pansexual
How do I put myself “out” there?,"25 yo single female living in NYC. I’m pansexual and polysex. However I only dated cis straight men most of my life. I am feeling closeted and bored. Im having a hard time finding like individuals.

I figured a good way to start is attending pride and searching for other pansexual people. It shouldn’t be hard in this city but I still think we are a rare breed of humans lol. 

Any ideas r/pansexual?
",pansexual
Am I bi or pan with a preference?,"I recently found out that bi means attraction to all genders and that pan means attraction regardless of gender.
I identify as pan, but I get crushes on guys a lot more often than I do on girls, so I’m not exactly gender-blind.
Am I bi, or pan with a preference? Please help!",pansexual
How come no sub icon???,Shouldn't we at least have an image of the flag or something here rather than a default Reddit icon for the sub?,pansexual
Facts of Life,So I’ve recently come to terms of being pansexual within the last year. Before hand I thought myself bisexual but I had rejected for years because I grew up religious. I’ve only come out to my wife and thankfully she’s pan as well but I’ve been fighting myself whether or not I wanna come out to my family even tho they are still religious. My wife thinks I don’t have to because I’m with a woman and not single or with another gendered person but on another hand I feel like I’m not being true to myself at all. Any thoughts or ideas? ,pansexual
How should I come out to one of my best friends?,"So I’ve known her for 2 years and we’ve talked pretty much everyday since we met. I want to come out to her, but here’s the thing; She’s super duper Christian. Her entire family is super duper Christian, all of her friends are super duper Christian, her entire world is Christian. In fact, we met at a Christian summer camp where we both worked at the time. She’s not particularly hateful, but she’s not open minded either. We’ve had conversations about this issue and she has clearly stated that she believe homosexuality is a sin, but that she doesn’t believe gay people are bad people just because they’re gay. I’m going to come out to her though because I love her as a friend and I want to be able to be open with who I am with her. But I was thinking - should I say I’m pan or bi? I only ask this question because I think it would be easier if I said I’m bi because that’s more well known outside of the LGBTQ+ community. I’m definitely Pan (I have a gender-fluid boyfriend), but I was thinking that maybe I should say I’m bi first and then see how she takes it. What do you guys think I should do? Thanks. ",pansexual
How to feel comfortable?,I am a pansexual and I am married to a man. When I go to gay themed events such as pride I always feel like I don’t belong because I am now in a hetero relationship. Growing up I identified as mostly a lesbian but I was confused. I knew I fell for people for their personalities but it was 95% women. I started  identifying as bisexual when I realized there was some attraction to other sexes. Now I think I’ve finally found my home as a pansexual but I feel like a fraud. How do I feel confident that I still belong at these events even though I am with a man now? ,pansexual
“Interesting” apartment-mates and coming out tomorrow,"So I live in a house split into three (technically four, one bought two) apartments.  A lot bigger than it sounds, but anyways.  I’m calling them apartment-mates for lack of better term.

I’m new.  Like I’ve only been here for two weeks and still have boxes everywhere.  One day I go to leave.  I hear a mans voice shout something about one man and one woman all heated.  I had a chuckle.

Now I’m a bit split on avoiding putting a flag in my window.  I don’t want to end up dealing with drama, but I also don’t want to be limited.  Everyone has been nice to me so far.

Outside of that, while I’m still reliant on my parents, I’m much more independent.  I was anxious about fighting with my parents, but now I’m excited to tell my mom.  I’m painting a pan flag with “PAN IS GRAND” and sending it to my mom with, “hey did you know it’s lgbt pride month! love you”

I honestly can’t wait.  I had everything besides pink.  Tried to make it with the various colors I have and it didn’t go so well.  My family is a mixed bag with this, so I know exactly who will be throwing the fit, but I think my mom will be one of the best.",pansexual
Survey on childhood gender experiences,"We are seeking adults to complete an online survey about different childhood experiences, particularly those relating to gender. Your participation will help us to develop a new questionnaire. We will also investigate associations between different childhood gender-related experiences and adult sexual orientation, gender identity and mental health. For more details and to take part please visithttps://www.surveymonkey.co.uk/r/childgender5",pansexual
Pansexuality in a Dating Sim,"https://i.redd.it/cydleo5grn111.png

Hi everyone! I have been working on this game for quite some time now, it is a dating simulator where the player ignores the appearance and gender of the romance options \(much like pansexuality\). This is targeted to people of the LGBTQP\+ community including myself, but anyone could and should be able to enjoy the game. If you like the idea please support the Kickstarter page: [https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/whitenoir/personality\-dating\-sim](https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/whitenoir/personality-dating-sim)

You may also join the Discord server here for announcements/game discussion/updates: [https://discord.gg/b9HGjwZ](https://discord.gg/b9HGjwZ)",pansexual
Happy Pride Month,,pansexual
Why do people think I might cheat more easily?,Seriously. Why is this a thing. I've heard this stereotype too many times.,pansexual
Educational documentary on Pansexuality?,"Hi, I've been asked by a Canadian broadcaster to develop ideas  related to misunderstood or misrepresented expressions of sexual identity, including pansexuality. If you live in Western Canada and would like to chat about this further, let me know!",pansexual
I Love SEX,"Sex is sex gender is not important, the person is.",pansexual
Can the term “queer” be used by pansexuals?,"So I’m confident in my identity as a pansexual, but I find myself using the term queer and gay to describe myself more and more in casual conversation. I’ve seen some things on Twitter that say gay is not an umbrella term, which I don’t personally agree with, but I’d like to know how other members of this community feel about that. 

TLDR; can I use the terms queer and gay?",pansexual
Heterosexual pansexuals?,"How prevalent do you think this identity is among pansexuals? I find this concept interesting. I've always thought bisexuality and pansexuality were ultimately the same thing  (attraction to more than one sex, with widely varying personal preferences relating to all kinds of things within that). But you can't have a hetero bisexual can you?",pansexual
Who else understands when someone just stares when you say you're pansexual and panromantic?,"Idk. Just wanted to post about it. It happens a lot for me. Their eyes just say, ""What the hell is panromantic? Speak English please.""

The end. That's all.",pansexual
Pansexuality and Polyamory in the media,"Say you have a polyamorous, pansexual character in a story.
We'll call them Character A. A already has a relationship going with Character B.
But A also wants to get with three other characters.
One of those characters, (Character E), Character A wants their company one day because Character B is unavailable and at work.
What's the best way to portray this without character A being perceived like they're whorish (which they are not)?",pansexual
My old girlfriend was pansexual and I have a question that really has been eating me inside.,"Hey guys, I went out with my ex-girlfriend of 2.5 years. She told me about her pansexuality early on in the relationship and I really didn't care at the time. We split up after that and since then there has been something that eats at me when I think about our relationship. It is about whether she actually found me attractive physically or if she just liked my personality. 

It's just made me insecure because now that I'm out of the relationship I wonder if no one will ever fall in love with me again because the one person that did didn't find me physically appealing. 

I'd appreciate if someone could help fill my drunk ass self in. Thanks guys. ",pansexual
Tips on finding the right guy,"Hey all, I’ll keep this brief. I’m a Pan guy with limited experience with other men. My is wife is incredibly loving and support and wants me to explore it more. I’ve only ever found guys on the internet, but I hate the process. Any tips for finding a playmate in the real world? I’m kind of a take-charge kind of person in bed and I’d like to find someone compatible with that...

if it help, I live in the Tampa Bay, Fl area. ",pansexual
Fluidity of Sexuality,"Hi, new to the subreddit! ☺️ Just wondering if any other Pans are comfortable with the idea of their sexuality changing in the future? I kind of like the idea of my sexuality changing as I experience more things and meet new people! Anyone feel the same? 🙃",pansexual
Coming out at pride,"This post may be pointless, but I just wanted to share

Last year around this time I was really questioning my sexuality. Going back and forth from bisexuality to pansexuality to heteroflexible to asexual. I couldn’t really figure it out, so I just decided to go labelless and not tell my family. But now that I’m an adult and ready, I’m just going to do it and come out. I fullheartedly believe I’m pansexual.",pansexual
Does this count as being pan?,"So I consider myself to be Androgyne (born as male). I’ve been questioning my sexuality and am curious to know where I fit in.

Thinking about it, I suppose ones gender doesn’t necessarily matter to me much when it comes to attraction? I like both penis and vagina. However, I don’t like guys. By that I mean, I don’t get turned on by the male physique. Take Ryan Reynolds for example. The dude is definitely an attractive guy, but I’m not turned on by that. I very much like the female body and femininity, and some masculinity as well (e.g. androgynous women). Do I count as pan? Or poly?

Thanks in advance! If you have any questions that require me to be more specific, just ask 🙂",pansexual
10 Star Wars Characters You Didn’t Know Were Pansexual,,pansexual
Star Wars' Lando Calrissian is Pansexual...How do we feel?,"[Donald Glover on Lando's pansexuality](http://ew.com/movies/2018/05/21/donald-glover-solo-star-wars-lando-sexuality-pansexual/)

 I am not sure how I feel about Lando being Pansexual. Or rather I don't know how I feel about the response to the character being pansexual. I don't know about you, but I don't have sex with ""blobs"".    As a pansexual I don't care about gender, so I can be attracted to anyone but not necessarily ""anything"". I guess i'm just trying to figure out what I think. I think i'm less nervous about the character and more nervous that they are going to represent it wrong and people will perceive it as ""a pansexual will have sex with legit anything"".

Any thoughts?
",pansexual
Dealing with your bi cycle in a relationship,"I was wondering if anyone knows how to deal with the fluidity of their sexual interests while in a relationship? \[M\]y  SO and I are in a heterosexual relationship, but every so often I feel the urge to want to fool around with someone of my gender. I've read about the bi cycle and was wondering if this is my case or something else. More so, does anyone have advice on how to deal live with this fluctuation without it causing chaos to my relationship? ",pansexual
So I ended up coming out to my parents. And they said I'm too young to be any type of gay.,"\[SORRY ABOUT SOME OF THE LANGUAGE I'M REALLY PISSED ABOUT THIS\]

Like, what the hell parents!? I'm 15, I've known this since I was about 13, and I've had many boyfriends, and I know that I'm into guys. I still like girls, and there have been a few other people out there like transgenders, or even non binary people. I know that I'm pan.

You people say that you will love and accept me no matter what, and they you go and say ""Oh, it's probably temporary. Your hormones are out of control at this age, who knows what's going through your head."" and ""In this day and age, you shouldn't *WANT* to be gay. There's tons of discrimination out there.""

Big fucking emphasis on the ""want to be gay."" Okay, okay, first of all, fuck you. I can't fucking help it. I like guys. That's just who I am. Could you people help that you abused me and my sister until we were 9 and 10, and  had to take our money to pay bills because you spent the rest on alcohol? Yes, you could. I can't help it that I'm into dick. There's a fine line between being able to control something, and not having a choice. I don't have a choice. Like I said it's who I am.

Why can't you guys just be like my other friends' parents? They all came out to their parents at least a couple years ago. Their parents didn't say any of this kind of shit when they were 13 and 14 and came out to their parents. They're parents went on knowing happily that their child is gay. I wasn't able to at that time because my junior high was fucking rough. My anxiety, stress, and depression levels were at an all time high back then. I couldn't even think about coming out to you guys.

All of friends are happily living with their parents. I hate you two so fucking much I can't even describe it. You won't let me just, be me. I can't wait for the next couple years so I can get the fuck out of this place as soon as possible.

Sorry about that, r/pansexual! I was just in need of a rant. I'm just so confused, mad, depressed, and not even sure what else, about why my parents are like this. I know my dad is a bit of a homophobe, but just my mother. She never showed any signs of anything. She seemed like she would be perfectly happy with one of us being gay. But I guess not.

But thank you to whoever reads this. I just wanted to rant. If you could give any type of feedback, that would be great.

Bye bye!! :\)

\[UPDATE\] \- Thanks you guys so much!! You all are such amazing people, and you helped me get through a tough time. 

This community is probably one of my new favorite places ever, and I love you all, thank you. You people made me better. Thanks. I say thanks a lot.",pansexual
Pride,,pansexual
How can I look super gay for pride?,"I need some tips for looking really fucking gay on pride, thanks",pansexual
"So I want to go to the local Pride event going on in about a month. But the thing is, I haven't came out to my parents yet.","So I don't know if I should just, come out to them before then, or if I should say I'm hanging out with my friend \(who's actually my boyfriend, my parents just don't know\) and then we go to Pride anyways. Or there's always the option to just not go. But that'd be lame.

So what do I do??",pansexual
College project - discrimination survey,"Hi! I am doing a college study regarding social studies. The subject I've chosen is discrimination against LGBTQIA\+ people. Would you please be so kind as to fill it out for me?

The first two questions might weird you out because they might be similar to you, but I didn't want to exclude people who feel their sex differs from their gender, out of cautiousness.

Thanks in advance, MR.

[https://docs.google.com/forms/d/e/1FAIpQLSdn5OpcgfZMOpBV7jprmQO69vjQy13fYeV2jZENAJAABE7g\_g/viewform](https://docs.google.com/forms/d/e/1FAIpQLSdn5OpcgfZMOpBV7jprmQO69vjQy13fYeV2jZENAJAABE7g_g/viewform)",pansexual
Polyamorous Questions,"My name is Khris,
  
       I am a Pansexual, Polyamorous, Non-Binary
(They/Them). Anyways, that is just a little backstory.

       I am dating a girl But, I also want to date this boy I like. He knows that I am dating this girl and if I ask him out I fear that he may think I am a Whore.
        What should I do?",pansexual
Is Anybody Else Like This?,"Does anybody else find different traits attractive in different people? 
For example, I typically find feminine features more attractive, but not so much masculine traits. But there are times when those traits are extremely attractive on certain people. 
Anybody else like that?",pansexual
How you knew you were pan,Hey guys! I’ve recently discovered my attractions lay in more than one gender and I’m wondering how did you guys decide to identify as pan v. bisexual? ,pansexual
Anyone in a poly or open relationship?,I’m curious. I’m Pansexual but my boyfriend is straight. We have an open relationship where we’re both free to hook up or date women. Is this common?,pansexual
Research Survey,"Hi! We are LGBTQ-affirming researchers (faculty and graduate students in Counseling Psychology) at the University of Florida conducting a study focused on the experiences of stigma and oppression of sexual minorities (e.g., lesbian, gay, and bisexual people) in the United States. Participation will involve completing a 20-30 minute online survey. Every 25th person to complete the survey will receive a $20 Amazon.com gift card. These awards will be given and all e-mail addresses discarded prior to accessing any survey data.

In order to participate you must: • Identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, queer, questioning, or some other nonexclusively heterosexual identity • Reside in the United States and be currently employed • Be 18 years of age or older
LGBQ people of any gender identity are encouraged to participate. 

If you would like to participate, please follow this link:

https://ufl.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_e3Ee4kIrhefjCrH.

Thank you VERY much in advance for your time and effort. Please feel free to pass on this link to other people who might be eligible to participate. If you have any question about this study, please feel free to contact the Principal Investigators, Richard Douglass, M.S. (rdouglass@ufl.edu) and Ryan Duffy, Ph.D. (rduf@ufl.edu). This research has been approved by the Institutional Review Board (IRB) at the University of Florida (IRB201703215).",pansexual
Should I come out to my parents as pansexual or bisexual (to make sure they understand),"Hey there! I've decided I want to come out to my parents and close friends. I feel like I should come out to my parents first. I'll turn 18 in a month, waited two years, and originally I wanted to wait another year but I really want to open up to them.

The question is, should I come out to my parents as pansexual or bisexual. The problem is, my parents aren't educated on the matter and I'm 100&amp;#37; sure they haven't heard of pansexuality. They, at least my more open\-minded father might  know about bisexuality, but it's not the same! And I would erase my own sexuality. Another problem is, that we aren't English and they don't speak English, so I couldn't provide them resources on pansexuality.

I still have some time, I'll only come out after I've turned 18, but I want to be prepared.",pansexual
Is this just me?,"It’s been great because over the last year I’ve met some great Pansexual peeps, but they’re all cis female. I’m scratching my head a little bit because I’m the only cis male I’ve ever met. I’ve met plenty of bisexual males and females however. Is this just me? I’m assuming I just haven’t met them yet, but where are you hiding!!!!",pansexual
I think I might be Pan.,"So I think I might be Pan but I'm really not sure, I've never dated anyone before but I know I don't care about looks much, but I don't know how much I care about gender.
My family and friends are completely open to the LGBTQ+, I have a gay Sister, Uncle, and Grandma, and two of my greatest friends are Gay and the other is Panromantic/Gender Fluid, but my church is... at times.... homophobic, for instance the head pastor in  a sermon once said ""Why do the gays get the rainbow, that's our thing!"" And I only later found out, he was quoting his mother at Thanksgiving, and another pastor is always shoving in everyone's face that marriage is between one man and one woman, So I have little idea how I would go about coming out, any tips?",pansexual
Is pan-cycle a thing?,"Real talk, is pan-cycle a thing like ""bi-cycles""? Because last year I was more interested in women, but ever since I met this AMAB nonbinary person at an event months ago, I feel like my radar is noticing more nonbinary folk. And I'm not saying AMABs are men or AFABs are women, and I know I can't be into cisgender men, but idk 'pan-cycle' is the best way to describe this and I don't mean to offend, so I apologize in advance.
Thanks in advance. =)",pansexual
Why Pansexuals Should Be Feminists,"Although some feminists have dismissed pansexuality as anti-feminist, I do not think such a criticism is true, and thus I do not think that it should deter pansexuals from feminism. Firstly, in regard to the critique of pansexuality stating that pansexuality is anti-feminist, I would say that it is feminist for women to be honest and to be encouraged to be honest about their sexual orientation. Perhaps the implication of this critique may be that a woman in a relationship with a man and/or a non-binary person, and/or who has the potential to be in a relationship with a man and/or a non-binary person, is subjecting herself to sexism.  To the contrary, I would say that there is really little point to feminism if one believes that all men and/or non-binary people are necessarily going to be sexist no matter what. How can women have equal rights if all such people, who are approximately half the population, are never going to support that? If the implication is that a woman in a relationship with someone who is not a woman is taking her time and energy away from women and/or feminism, I would say that nobody can spend all their time and energy in the service of any cause, and that having a relationship with a woman is not necessarily helping feminism, as women can be sexist and refuse to support feminism, and as encouraging women to not have relationships with people they are attracted to and not be honest about their sexual orientation is not feminist, as it restricts those women’s freedoms and diminishes their happiness without advancing women’s rights. It is for these reasons I oppose political lesbianism and political asexuality (which are sometimes considered part of feminism), and would oppose political pansexuality and political heterosexuality were they to exist, which to my knowledge they do not.  

I would also like to point out that many important feminists are (or were while they were alive) pansexuals, such as Greta Christina. Lesbians have often not been able to live off of men’s money, while heterosexual women sometimes have (and have been encouraged and pressured to), and thus in that respect the rights of women to keep their own money, go into high-earning professions, etc. have sometimes been more urgently needed for lesbians than for heterosexual women; for pansexual women such a difference would largely depend on whether they were in relationships with men or not (with pansexual polyamory being the sole possible exception to such considerations). Lesbian feminist Sheila Jeffreys writes in The Lesbian Heresy (1993) that while many feminists are comfortable working alongside gay men, they are uncomfortable interacting with pansexual men. Jeffreys states that while gay men are unlikely to sexually harass women, pansexual men are just as likely to be bothersome to women as heterosexual men. (She uses the word bisexual here, but I define bisexuality and pansexuality to both mean a sexual orientation where one is attracted to people of the gender one is and of all other genders; in any case a bisexual man would by definition be attracted to some women, which is what Jeffreys is stating is problematic here.) I would dispute this assertion. I think that sexual harassment is not usually an expression of sexual desire (after all, if  someone wants to sexually entice a woman, they probably know harassment will not work) but  rather a way to insult and/or intimidate women, and thus gay men are sadly as motivated to perform it as pansexual and straight men.  

In regard to the critique of pansexuality stating that bisexuality is a type of false consciousness, let me first state that false consciousness is a way of thinking that prevents a person from perceiving the true nature of their social or economic situation. So, even if a person is truly pansexual as shown by their sexual arousal, it could possibly be preventing them from perceiving the true nature of their social situation - for example, it could possibly be preventing women from perceiving the way they are oppressed by men. In regard to this argument, I would state that if women could not perceive oppression by men if they were sexually attracted to men or in a sexual and/or romantic relationship with a man, feminism would never have arisen among heterosexual or pansexual women, and yet it clearly has. 

Lesbian feminist Julie Bindel has described female pansexuality as a “fashionable trend” being promoted due to “sexual hedonism” and broached the question of whether pansexuality even exists. She has also made tongue-in-cheek comparisons of pansexuals to cat fanciers and devil worshippers. (Again, she uses the term bisexual, but I use the term pansexual, and I believe we are referring to the same thing.) In response to all this I would say that there are still places where pansexuality is not accepted and yet people continue to come out as pansexual there, as they did before pansexuality was considered chic at all in any place. So I would say that this proves pansexuality really exists, inasmuch as such an internal identity can be proven.
  
As for the argument that pansexual women who pursue relationships with men are “deluded and desperate”, as some lesbian feminists claim, I would state that there is nothing more deluded and desperate about entering relationships with men than there is about entering relationships with women or non-binary people. People of all genders are capable of being sexist and otherwise abusive to female partners, and people of all genders are capable of being feminist and otherwise supportive to female partners. One’s partner(s) should be chosen as individuals – asserting that women are inherently superior to men and/or non-binary people in any way is sexist, and it is not helpful to women to do so. Indeed, asserting that women are better partners inherently could keep women from working to become better partners, as they would be assured that they are inherently that way and need not make sure they are treating their partner(s) as an equal (or equals), supporting them, and so on. Asserting that women are inherently morally superior has also been historically used to deny women rights – the idea that women are too “pure” to sully themselves with politics was used as an argument against women’s suffrage, for example. The idea that women are inherently feminist or otherwise inherently superior partners to men and/or non-binary people could also be used to argue that women should devote themselves to relationships rather than careers, a common anti-feminist position.  

Panphobia and the refusal to accept pansexuality is also an anti-feminist position not only for the reasons I have already given but because rejection of male pansexuality is often tied to rejection of men perceived too effeminate, a patently anti-feminist position in its disparagement of qualities associated with women. The idea that a man who has qualities associated with women, such as attraction to men, is inferior has also been used to disparage feminist men who are supportive of their girlfriends and/or wives, as seen for example in the misogynist term  “pussy-whipped”. A pansexual man, I would hasten to add, is not inherently any more likely to be feminist or effeminate than a straight or homosexual man; it is only that the rejection of pansexual men due to the perception of them as effeminate is anti-feminist.  

As for cyberfeminism in particular, I note that Donna Haraway’s 1985 essay “A Cyborg Manifesto: Science, Technology, and Socialist-Feminism in the Late Twentieth Century”, which was the inspiration and genesis for cyberfeminism, states that the cyborg “has no truck with [pan]sexuality, pre-oedipal symbiosis, unalienated labor, or other seductions to organic wholeness through a final appropriation of all powers of the parts into a higher unity.” (Again, she uses the term bisexual, but I use the term pansexual, and I believe we are referring to the same thing.) However, I would say that this is wrong because pansexuality is a sexual orientation, a harmless attraction some people simply have, not something they try to have or do in order to create organic wholeness through a final appropriation of all powers of the parts into a higher unity. Therefore, I would say that cyborgs can be pansexual, and cyberfeminism can and should be accepting of pansexuality. 

The rejection of pansexuality in women by lesbian separatists is more complicated. I would  say that if lesbian separatists believe that men and/or non-binary people are inherently anti-feminist, this is disproved by the examples of feminist men, and also this belief does not logically lead to founding lesbian- only spaces in a male-dominated society, because in such as society (for example, the United States) men will still control most of the society and men could therefore impinge upon even the most isolated commune with laws, not to mention lowering its potential membership through convincing women that lesbianism is a sin. Yet if lesbian separatists wish to have lesbian-only spaces simply to be among like-minded people, while not seeing pansexual people as inherently anti-feminist, or believing that lesbian-only spaces can truly be insulated from male culture, I do not see anything panphobic or anti-feminist in that. 

I think I have shown in this essay why pansexuality is not anti-feminist and therefore need not be rejected by feminists; now, let me show how pansexuals can benefit from feminism. Firstly, as I have already mentioned, the rejection of pansexual men due to the perception of them as effeminate is anti-feminist. Feminism can help fight this by fighting the perception of all feminine things as inherently inferior to all masculine things, which comes from the idea that women are inherently inferior to men (though I do not deny that some particular things considered feminine, such as being paid low wages, are in fact inferior to their masculine counterparts, it is not so for all things considered feminine, such as being sexually attracted to men.)

Secondly and most importantly when considering how pansexuals can benefit from feminism, feminism can raise women to the same status as men and non-binary people, which will make it easier to have equal relationships with either or both regardless of one’s own gender. 
",pansexual
I like pans too,"Yeah; Non-stick and steel handled, I really like Gold bottoms though",pansexual
i want this hat its amazing,,pansexual
Are there any panromantic aces in this Reddit?,I'm asking because I identify as panromantic asexual and I haven't yet found any Reddits that cater to both my romantic and sexual orientations.🙁 So I had to sign up for both the pansexual and asexual Reddits. ,pansexual
Lesbians who aren't into girls who've been w/boys,Me and a friend (who is one of those lesbians) were recently having a conversation about this from both perspectives and I'm curious what others think. It's really frustrating cause I don't understand but she thinks most pan people understand?  Does anyone know why this is a thing cause she just confused me. Help please!,pansexual
"Soooo... I want to come out to the rest of my friends. Only 3 of them know, and I'm worried the rest won't be the same to me afterwards.","Here's the background information: Biologically, I'm a dude. Biologically, probably 75% of my friends, are dudes. My 3 friends who know, one is gay, one is trans, and the other is also pan.

I just feel like if I go and tell my guy friends, they'll start to feel kinda awkward around me or something knowing that I can be attracted to guys. All of my past relationships, at least the ones they know about (I've been in relationships with a few guys and one non-binary person) have been with someone of the opposite sex.

Overall, I really *do* want to come out to them.  Just knowing them though, they're pretty awkward people. I don't want to make things weird when it comes to all of us.

So, do I wait till I'm more comfortable with it or something?

Or do I just go for it and hope for the best?

Any advice helps! Thanks!",pansexual
Internalized homophobia and sexual satisfaction,"Hello!

I'm an undergraduate student in France doing a psychology project analyzing the correlation of internalized homonegativty and sexual satisfaction among people who identify as bisexual, pansexual, bi-curious, and fluid. To gather data, I'm doing a survey (link below) addressing this very question.

https://docs.google.com/forms/d/1qmUFu7yjjfFrOWe1eICnjODTMsw00d1LRyZR4WXAjPs/viewform?edit_requested=true

The survey is very brief, containing only 4 questions which can be filled out in just a couple of minutes. If you are interested in filling it out, there are only two requirements: that you have had sexual experiences with both men and woman, and that you identify with one of the sexual identities listed above.

""Sexual experience"" is defined as anything involving genital or anal contact. Vaginal and anal penetration (including with toys), oral stimulation, genital rubbing, mutual or allo-masturbation -- all are considered sexual experiences for the purposes of this survey.

The survey is open for both cis, trans, and genderqueer people. However, because of uncertainty about whether a sufficient number of trans and genderqueer people can be collected, I have decided to collapse both categories in one group, though they remain divided by their assigned birth gender. I expect gathering data for at least 20 people in each gender category (cis women, trans and genderqueer AMAB, etc.). If I succeeded, I would absolutely love to disclose and discuss the findings with you guys!

The idea for this project came from [this study, performed by Kuyper and Vanwesenbeeck (2011).](https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/20191420) Using a population survey of Dutch respondents, Kuyper and Vanwesenbeeck (2011) analyzed the impact of internalized homonegativty on a variety of health outcomes for people who are lesbian, gay, or bisexual. They found that internalized homonegativity interacted with the sexual satisfaction of lesbians, gay men, and bisexual women, but its most pronounced effect was on bi men.

A more recent survey has confirmed that internalized homonegativity in gay men and lesbians is not significantly correlated with sexual enjoyment or satisfaction, but the findings in regards to bisexual people awaits replication. Plus, no surveys have studied the correlation between these two variable with non-monosexual people who do not identify as cissexual. And finally, Kuyper and Vanwesenbeeck (2011) did not see how internalized homonegativity interacts separately with sexual satisfaction in opposite-sex and same-sex encounters.

My project is, I believe, the first step to attempting to address these matters, which I think are so interesting for those of us in the bi/fluid spectrum... But for it to succeed, you need to fill it out... ;-)",pansexual
What’s the difference between panseuxal and bisexual?,"I don’t mean to be rude, I just want to know because I thought both meant being attracted to either gender.",pansexual
how i say to my family that i'm pansexual ?,"well... i keep saying that i'm bisexual(in case i'm pansexual) just because they gona say like
""you love pans ?""
""this don't exist""
and i don't have pacience to deal with this, so please help me",pansexual
I’m pansexual because...,I love bodies. Everything about them. ,pansexual
Amused,Being part of the gay community can be a real pain in the ass sometimes. It’s all those pans we use! 😆,pansexual
How i’m planning on coming out,"I’m not. 

I’m going to date whoever i like and when i bring them home, i’ll leave my family to join the dots. I wouldn’t have to come out if i was entirely straight so i’m not going to when i’m pan. ",pansexual
Looking for friends - just moved to Manchester (UK),"Hi there! 

I just moved to Manchester, and well, I have no friends here. So, if someone is interested in making friends and hanging around, it would be great. Btw I’m 26 and also in a relationship so this post is for just friends. 

if you’re interested just send me a message! 
 ",pansexual
Can anyone relate?,Is anyone else constantly frustrated about being labeled on the binary of sexuality by other people? It’s like I’m assigned gay or assigned straight. Or how people assume you’re straight until you “come out” to them... so frustrating. I just want to talk about girls and dudes and nonbinary people without having to clarify my sexuality all the time.,pansexual
Came out to my mom!,She’s the first family member I’ve told and she was so so so supportive! Way more supportive than I thought she was going to be. Yay yay yay. ,pansexual
"Pansexuals of reddit, how did you know that you are pan and not bi?",,pansexual
I “came out” to my parents.,"So the situation is a bit messed up but let me explain some background first. I am a 16 female and right now I live in Dubai witch does not accept non heterosexual people easily. 

I’m pretty open about my sexuality with anyone except my family , it’s not that I ashamed of it I’m just afraid of their reaction because it’s theirs that matter. Since I’m open about it it was in my bio for twitter and while my dad was snooping around my phone he found it.

It probably was my fault but I am still mad because my dad did not come to me and talk about it he outed me to my mother , the person who’s opinion I feared the most. And my fears did non disappoint me. My parents did not react well.

My Dad was mad , but not for the fact that I was pansexual , he completely ignored that and still does, he was mad that I was so public about it in the country we live in. I don’t know if he would have been mad if we still lived in our previous country where same sex marriage is allowed but I probably won’t know. Since then he hasn’t brought it up  and keeps pestering me about boyfriends not even considering it might be any other gender.

My mom on the other hand is quite complicated. At first she screamed , a lot, she even called me disgusting. Once that screaming match was done she ignored the subject for 2 weeks. Then out of nowhere while I was watching netflix in my living room , she asked how I knew I was pansexual if i never dated the same gender. I told her that I don’t need to date to know if I am attracted to the same gender.(I was attracted to the same gender since I was 6, my first crush was a girl), she did not react to it well again and was mad about it screaming for a bit and the grounding me. 

Now it has been a month and nothing has changed , I don’t know what’s worse my fathers silence or my mother’s disdain. 

My question is , what should I do ?",pansexual
How do you come out?,"I've resigned to coming out as bisexual because no one seems to know what pansexual is. I feel muted in the LGBT community. Unrepresented. Today, I found this sub. Over 8 THOUSAND people are on here. I feel less alone in this ""label"" today. :) ",pansexual
Should you tell a female if you have dated guys &amp; if so how soon should you tell them?,A friend and I were discussing this and I was curious as to know further thoughts on the issue? Do you think you should tell a female ours dating that you have dated men and how soon do you think you should tell them?,pansexual
"Looking for volunteers to complete a short survey on the ""coming out"" process for a research project","Hey, everyone!

I am a graduate student in clinical psychology at a university in Canada, and I am working on a brief class project that discusses family therapy in the context of an adolescent (or young adult) who has recently come out to his or her parents. The information will not be published as part of any formal research study, but will be summarized for discussion with a professor and other clinical psychology trainees.

My main goal is to conduct a review on the types of conflict that occur when coming out, and the therapies that may be appropriate to help a family to adjust. However, a lot of the research on this topic is very old, and possibly outdated! I'd love to get a flavour of how things may have changed, particularly regarding the increase of LGBTQ celebrities in the media and the use of social media platforms to connect with like-minded peers at a very young age.

I would really appreciate any responses to [this short 10-question survey](https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/YDCZWWD). You do not need to be ""out"" with your parents to answer these questions, nor do you have to have come out very recently. All ideas and thoughts on the topic are welcome. 
 
All the questions are optional, so you can enter as much or as little information as you are comfortable with sharing. 

Let me know if you have any questions or comments!",pansexual
How should I tell family that I'm Pansexual? I know they'll be fine...but why am I still so nervous?,"Title kinda explains everything. I really want to come out as although I've never had a relationship before I've started chatting to a girl who I'm hopefully going to meet up with in a few weeks. I feel like I'm hiding a part of who I am from my family which sucks but I just don't know how to tell them. I know that I have nothing to worry about, they've even said in the past if me or my sister were gay it wouldn't matter. I've always told myself that my sexuality isn't a big deal and I don't want to make it a big deal out of it, which I feel by having to announce it I'm making it a big deal. Sometimes they'll make comments about me having a boyfriend one day or whatever but I kinda just laugh it off, I've kinda made a mental note that if they say something like that again I'll be like ""...or a girlfriend?"". I want it to be a casual thing, because it IS a casual thing, at least to me it is. Eurgh...what do I do? I feel so stupid getting so wound up about it, to me sexuality is both a big part of who I am but also a small part of who I am. Sorry for the ramble! Just had to get this off my chest. If you're still reading, Thanks!",pansexual
"Had this hat made the other day, thought it belonged here:)",,pansexual
Help coming out to my partner,"So a little background I’m a recently identified pansexual female and have only been in hetero relationships. My current boyfriend and I have been together for over 5 years now and I intend to be with him for as long as he will have me. We have one child together and I have another from a previous relationship. He knows that I am attracted to females and that I went on a date with a girl before (I failed miserably with her 😩) but I don’t think he knows the extent of it. I’m not wanting to seek out other relationships but I want to be open and honest with him about how I identify especially because I want to show my kids that living their truth and never feeling like they need to hide anything is so important. 

I know he will be supportive but of course I’ve built up every negative scenario in my head about him thinking I love him less or want to be with other people. 

Has anyone come out mid relationship? How should I break it down for him so my fears NEVER come to light? 
",pansexual
My daughter who will be 13 next month told me today she has a girlfriend and believe she may be pansexual,"Like the post says. My daughter told me she believes she is pansexual and has a girlfriend. I’m so proud of her for owning who she is. It may be a phase of exploration or it may be who she is. I love her no matter what and I just want her to be happy. She said “I’m so glad you’re such a good mom and i didn’t have to be scared to tell you”. Made me tear up. We try to have open honest communication in our home at all times. I’m so happy she feels safe with us. All I ask is that whoever she chooses in life that they treat her good. Friends, girlfriends, boyfriends etc, I really don’t care as long as she picks good people.  She’s such an amazing kid and her sexual orientation is the least of my concerns. I just wish she would clean up after herself. Lol!",pansexual
Confused about what I am. Mildly NSFW maybe.,"I consider myself pansexual because I have become sexually aroused thinking about having sex and actually having sex with any/all genders, but I'm honestly wondering if I may be... partially asexual. Is that even a thing??

The reason I'm confused is that I have had romantic and sexual relationships with men and women, but never for my physical pleasure. I rarely notice my own physical pleasure and never focus on it. I masturbate, but only for the quick orgasm and never for the extended pleasure of it. I love sex with a partner, but couldn't care less about my own orgasm and I get really anxious when the focus is on me. I have had orgasms with partners before, but they were kind of disappointing. I've had way more satisfying sex sessions that did not include my orgasms.

Also, I very, very rarely have sexual thoughts about random people walking around. Sometimes I'm like ""Oh wow, he/she is fine!"" But it's more in an admiring way. I do notice, however, when I work out consistently for a few weeks I start noticing women a LOT compared to how often I usually notice them.

I am on the autism spectrum and I have realised that a big part about what I love about sex is that there is very little guesswork to be done. I KNOW when I've  done the right thing. I don't have to worry about not doing or saying the right thing or missing signs. Body language is very easy for me to read during sex, and it makes me feel incredibly successful when I make my partner orgasm. It's like a social interaction I'm actually good at.

So I'm just confused and I wanted to get all that out. Whew, I feel better!",pansexual
me_irl,,pansexual
Today I get to maybe kiss this girl I like 🤞🏻,,pansexual
Pansexual butterfly tattoo💖💛💙,,pansexual
Help Me,"Hi, I am pansexual. I haven’t come out yet and i’m scared of what people might think of me if I do. Any advice?",pansexual
help! am i pansexual? or bicurious? or bisexual? or no label?,"i would say i was essentially hetero. i like men, i have only had full on sexual contact with men. i have kissed girls (but mostly girl friends when im too drunk, not the attention seeking ""lets turn on men"" type, just its happened and ok that happened).

i find girls attractive and i feel like i find them attractive in a sexual way. but at the same time, i dont know if i could do sexual acts with a girl?

does this make sense?

is it just me being unexperienced and nervous (similar to when youve not lost your virginity and youre like aaahhhh) or is it more i like the idea of women but im not actually sexual attracted?

what does that make me?

(when i say men or women i refer to anyone refers to who identifies as male or female or other, so biological/trans/agender etc. sorry if im not being inclusive, i am new to all this. i just know that i dont mind if someone doesnt identify with their biological birth assigned gender, i just dont know if i am only sexually attracted to those who identify as male or if im curious or actually attracted to those who are female/identify as female, or other.)",pansexual
One of the Snapchat filters today has the exact Pansexual flag colors on it!!!,,pansexual
So I've identified as bi until now but....I'm confused.,"This is where I get confused re: labeling myself:

I find a certain kind of maleness very sexy, so that would be the ""masculine/male"" gender. So I'm not ""gender blind"" to masculinity and I often find it very attractive in and of itself. I feel like this way about femininity too.

But then again, I also am attracted to people who are trans, genderfluid, or gender non-conforming. It's not that I don't find aspects of gender/gendered expression attractive, it's just that genderbending/androgyny/gender vagueness can be just as if not more appealing to me as someone who is ""traditionally"" masculine or feminine presenting, in part because it rejects society's bullshit ideas of gender and feels so freeing to me, but also because it ""combines"" two traditional genders I find attractive and adds to it.

Does this make any sense? Does that mean I'm bi or pan? Or both? I'm probably bi, right?",pansexual
Looking for a place to look,"Out of high school I final accepted my pansexuality and (after coming out to friends and family) decided to join in the lgbt community. After five years I realized a pattern, I would go to lgbt events and places to meet people and only meet cis male gendered people. I decided I wanted to “expanded my horizons” and see what it’s like to be with other partners. I don’t have anything against cis males but there are so many different flavors of people out there and I want to try them all. It’s been a year since I’ve decided to take a break from cis men and I haven’t found anyone interested. Is there an app or website where I can meet other people of all genders and orientations for friends or hookups or whatever?

TL:DR: Looking for a bi/pan friendly version of Grindr or Tinder?",pansexual
Very new here any advice welcome,Soo my entire life I’ve been so confused about what I am but a year ago I started reading about pansexuality and it’s like a lightbulb went off in my head. Unfortunately I would never tell anyone outside the LGBTQ+ community because I think that a lot of my cis heteronormative friends don’t really believe in it and just see it as something people say they are to be more interesting or something. Would people mind sharing their stories of how they found out they were pan and if they ‘came out’ (quote marks because I hate this term) to people? This is such a confusing time for me and I don’t think I’m handling it so well! ,pansexual
If someone is mean because you're LGBTQ...,"Keep Skittles in your pocket. When someone is mean, scream TASTE THE RAINBOW and throw Skittles in their face.",pansexual
hello,i love all of you,pansexual
"""Heterosexual Relationship"" and other labels",,pansexual
Constantly changing?,"I came out as bi with suspicion of being pan, I then later on came out to people as pan which got even more questions but I realised what actually fits me is demisexual, but I feel I shouldn’t keep changing and I am pretty happy with ‘being pansexual’, so should I change again or stay pan?",pansexual
New to the lgbt community! Anything I should know?,,pansexual
Finding who I am is strange,"Ive been thinking a lot about who I am and how I want to identify. Its sometimes all so confusing. Im still in the process of finding myself (as a pansexual, as a woman, in my future career, etc) and sometimes its so much to think about. Sometimes I honestly dont know who I am. I wish it could all be figured out so I wouldn't need to worry/think about it.",pansexual
My perfect match would be with pansexual but...,"Since we all know the complexity with gender and sexuality, its hard to find someone in that spectrum. Location then also affects ones ability to maintain a connection and expand on a relationship whether its friends or more. My purpose is to befriend someone who's culturally and LGBT competent who thinks more up top then down below if you know what I mean. Lol. Take your tinkle elsewhere yeah? :p Otherwise, let me know if you are single and wanting to mingle. 

About me: Live life as a non-gender binary individual, but more so feminine lifestyle. I can be what some call ""passable""--appearance wise and vocally. I use that with air quotes because its not like I try that much. Sure I struggled and have my insecurities, but I don't have a ritual or anything and I am just who I am. I was originally on here for gaming advice, as that's what I thought reddit was, but I have found these forums to be quite interesting and decided to start meeting people in this way.",pansexual
Fucking dogs,Any one else tell ur friend for the first time and the first thing the say is “So u could fuck a dog???” ,pansexual
Discovering im a pansexual but in a commited relationship,"Within the last year I have discovered my sexuality. I am 20 years old and it was supressed my whole life until now. I grew up in a catholic household and I have quite a few mental illnesses. Anyway, I habe recently discovered that I am attracted to all kinds of people, but this is all happening while im in a very strong commited relationship. I love him so much and want to be with him forever but it has been unusual discovering things about my sexuality while im with him. I guess things really arent different but its odd knowing now im attracted to more ppl while being commited to someone.
These are just thoughts haha... if anyone cares to let me know what they think that would be cool :)",pansexual
"Thanks to y'all, this is my demographic data so far!",,pansexual
"Findings from study on bisexual and nonmonosexual women's discrimination, resilience, and mental health outcomes","Hello there!
A while ago, you may have seen a recruitment add related to bisexual and non-monosexual women’s experiences of discrimination, resilience, advocacy, and mental health outcomes. I want to thank all of you who took the time to respond to the questions, sharing your perspectives, and entrusting us as researchers. Our research team truly appreciates it! 

You may have found yourself curious about the findings of this study, so I'd like to share with you what we found. More specifically, this study examined the relations among multiple discriminatory experiences (anti-bisexual discrimination, sexism), LGBTQ+ and feminist advocacy, resilience, and psychological outcomes (distress and well-being). Results from the study found that both anti-bisexual and sexist discrimination were related to psychological distress, although LGBTQ+ and feminist advocacy and resilience were related to less psychological distress and greater well-being. In addition, resilience appeared to offset the harmful impact of sexism in relation to psychological distress. So, there's some good support for the importance of advocacy initiatives on one's own well-being (and just in terms of working to create a more just society), as well as developing resilience to aid in coping with discrimination. 

I know several folks provided feedback on this study, also suggesting that level of identity outness (including concealment and disclosure) may have made some of these experiences more or less common. Although we didn’t include this a variable in the study, we do believe it is an important area of additional research—as well as bisexual invisibility altogether—and have suggested it as an area of needed research in our manuscript that was accepted for publication. 

Again, thank you so much for your assistance!

Take good care all!
",pansexual
Are memes allowed?,,pansexual
My son came out on my birthday,,pansexual
What is the pansexual symbol,I know that the LGBTQ plus community as a whole has the rainbow but I didn't know if there was one specifically for pansexuals,pansexual
A Little About Being Pansexual,"I can only speak for myself and at least some for my fiancé who is sitting next to me.

First of all, we don't really use labels -much - but I guess we're called cis m/f. I am in my mid 30s, which could explain my reluctance to use labels.

I know it's a cliché but we love people - people of all types, looks, genitals, personalities, whatever. Here's an even bigger cliché: we love people who love people. All true, though.

Be clear: I don't want to hook up with everyone I see. I'm not a dog. I'm attracted to everyone/anyone who is cool, down to earth, fun, etc. And like everyone else on earth, I'm more attracted to some people over others. *That's* *okay*. (Some people, whether man, woman, trans, whatever, are just so pretty and fun to be with. Some people aren't.)

The following sentences of this paragraph are going to be sexually graphic, I guess don't read them. My g spot is in my butthole. We are passionate in bed. We give up 100% of ourselves - head to toe - and we only get intimate with people who are the same way. We both love that physical connection with people.

On a slight side note, to anyone who might've read all this, don't ever let anyone take your preferences from you. It's not right and you won't be happy. Other people's approval, negativity, scorn, derision, words, etc. mean nothing in life. At the end of the night we have to be alone with ourselves. Be who you are meant to be.

In those small hours of the night, everyone else asleep, alone with my thoughts, I'm happy and content because I embrace who I am rather than run from it. I sleep soundly and deeply.

(But maybe these things have helped me in life:

I have an amazing partner who is the same way - we were made for each other; I'm the coolest, most loyal person you'll likely meet; I'm a 6' tall bear, after being at 140lbs throughout my twenties; and, quite frankly, I can take care of myself.)

Sorry for the screed, friends. I got a little carried away.",pansexual
You are awesome!,"Hey so I've seen a number of hateful posts appearing in this subreddit recently. I wanted to spread some love to counter the hate. 


You are awesome! You are brave to openly be yourself in a world that is so hateful and judgemental. Remember that people trolling, harassing, and bullying you for your sexual orientation shows who *they* really are and has no bearing on *your* worth as a person. 


Have a nice day :)",pansexual
Can I be Pansexual but not like female genitalia?,"Ok so here's the thing. I would consider myself pansexual, I like all genders, mainly trans women and men. But I also like women. I would like to have a girlfriend, but the problem is I'm not really sexually attracted to female genitalia. I think the female form is very attractive, it's just female genitals that are a turn off for me. I know sex and attraction is more than just genitals but it's pretty big part of it, it's kind of a dilemma for me since I would like to have a girlfriend but I know we would have to have sex eventually if it got serious, and it would be kind of a problem if I'm not even interested in the thought in putting my penis in her vagina, to put it bluntly haha.",pansexual
I'm having an internal crisis pls help,"Ok so i've pretty much always identified as a straight guy, but as i've learned more about queer theory and stuff i'm now under the opinion gender is completely imposed by society (I don't particularly feel like a ""man"" or whatever, i'm just me ukno). I'm now at the point where i've been attracted to cis girls, trans girls, NB peeps and now i have a crush on a trans dude and i'm confused. I'm not attracted to cis guys, so am I just projecting my heterosexuality onto someone who I shouldn't? Or am I actually pan or something? I don't like labels in general - I tend to just try being me, and let other people be them. I also wouldn't even be asking for help if it weren't for the fact that someone else could get hurt through all this. So idk yeah please help if you can haha",pansexual
This bracelet I made,,pansexual
The back 'surpise' side (in progress) for my women's march sign! I plan on doing the flag in glitter. Only those closest to me know I plan on coming out Saturday.,,pansexual
"if you're PANsexual you can relate ""凸(¬‿¬)""",,pansexual
What's the different between pansexual and bisexual,"I want to know what are the differents between them?
I have been confused for long time.Your answer will be fully appreciated.",pansexual
He took the joke pretty well,,pansexual
Judge rules against transphobic parents in school bathroom case,,pansexual
"[Academic] Relationships and sexting (everyone who is 16+, even if you have never sexted before)",,pansexual
Help a married young woman label her sexuality?,"I grew up in a very close minded community and in religious cult, Since I was a teen ive found  myself attracted to heterosexual, gay and lesbian porn. When I was a young girl i experimented with a girl, and was told and taught that behavior was wrong.  After that I just experimented with boys, so I considered myself hetero with a girl curiosity. I felt attracted to certain type of men and women, usually their face, specially their smile and eyes.

Fast forward to a couple of years ago, I was dating my now husband - and I was at Whole Foods, and I walked up to the cashier and I met this absolutely gorgeous girl, she seem tomboyish, short hair blond, very pretty face, blue eyes and beautiful smile - and holy shit shit she made me weak to my knees. I felt exactly how I felt when I met my now-husband, just shy and couldn’t look at her face. I felt like I was going to embarrass myself in front of her. after that I found myself always going to what Whole Foods hoping to see her and hoping to strike up a conversation. I told my bf about this, and he didn’t seem very bothered by that, except for “I’d love to watch you with another girl” comment - by that time I had quit that job that was close to that Whole Foods and never saw her again. I think about her once in a while. 

I’ve also met transgender men who I’ve found myself attracted to their smile and eyes too... idk. I may be rambling now lol anyhoo... 

About a year ago, I married my husband and idk why I’m more aware of my sexuality and who I am. I learned about the word pansexual, and Idk how to identify myself or if I should even care. Idk if a label will help try to settle this question in me. It’s not like I can date other people and see if I’m bi or pan. 

Help?",pansexual
Come join our WLW Discord Server :D,"Our [community!](https://discord.gg/zUYR4Mp)is dedicated to **all women** *(or others identifying within the feminine spectrum; cis, trans or non-binary)* pansexuals! 


Join our mature community to seek advice and support, or just chill out with like-minded people. This server has plenty to offer. Hope you'll help our family grow, and that I'll see you there soon ^:3


https://discord.gg/zUYR4Mp

PS: WLF = Women who Love Women.",pansexual
"Trump Administration's Banned Words Would Be Deadly For LGBT Americans, Just Like the Aids Crisis",,pansexual
Discord server - Queer Friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.

Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+ due to the nature of the server having 'dating' elements)",pansexual
Planet Rainbow ~ New 18+ LGBT+ Discord community!,,pansexual
"Obligatory ""Am I pan?""","Hi there.

At the beginning of this year I thought I was straight, then around May or so I thought I was bi, but now I've been thinking. It actually doesn't really matter to me what sex/gender a person is, it's more the person who is attractive to me rather than girl, guy, anything in between, or neither. I think I just have a type and it transcends (if you'll pardon the pretentious word) a person's assigned gender/gender. I've found myself attracted to cis men, cis women, trans women, trans men, people whose gender I didn't know as it was none of my business to ask; you know the score.

Please excuse my rambling, this is very new to me and I'm confused. Have you had an experience like this? Would you say I could call myself pan? Sexuality is so perplexing sometimes.",pansexual
"Roy Moore, the most homophobic Senate candidate in recent history, has lost",,pansexual
"Judge rules transgender people can enlist in military, denying Trump bid to delay deadline",,pansexual
The oddness of the Human Condition...,"So... How to start this post?

Maybe by just positing what I want to say up front and then explaining it would be best. Of special note though is to understand the difference between empathy and sympathy... If you don't know, go look it up because I don't wanna drag on too long in this probably divisive post.

I empathise with people who are paedophilia, paedaristic or zoophilic... Now I'm not one myself but I understand how that sentence looks.

So... Clarification is needed. I don't agree with those people who act on these feelings and honestly my opinion on anyone who abuses a child is that they should be afforded the worst punishment imaginable - chemical castration, locked in with more violent criminals, crippled in some way,  etc. What I'm trying to say is that the feelings aren't beholden to logic or reason and that people with these proclivities shouldn't be hated simply for what they are, but whether they act on it or not.

Stepping away from kids because I think every sane person on the planet agrees - sex or sexual activity without consent is one of the vilest acts a human being can commit and as I mentioned before there are those who are zoophiles instead.

Now Furries, I love Furries. I'm not one myself (I don't think...) but I like the ideal behind it. They love animals so much and understand that forcing that love onto a creature that can't give informed consent is wrong and so they dress up and role play with other people with the same given inclinations. At least most of them do, human nature being what it is there are always a few rotten bastards in any group no matter what their orientation. Even here in Australia there are a few documented peadarists who understanding that acting on their attractions would cause harm to that which they can't help but love isolate themselves.

Besides nowadays if they want to indulge in those feelings there's literally thousands, possibly millions of examples of literature or hentai out there for them to be lost in rather than corrupting an innocent loving being. 

I don't really know why I'm posting this. It's not that I want to advocate for awareness or rights for these people in particular, or that I want to stand in solidarity for them. I have no sympathy for the feelings or the plights of those who act on them after all. But, especially growing up in a town that was more likely to treat a 20-something going out with a high schooler as a upstanding member of society than a young queer kid struggling to make heads or tails of the attractions they felt to people, I empathise with the idea that you cannot control what you're attracted to and anybody that says otherwise is either delusional or a fucking moron.

Maybe I just had this swirling around in my head too long and wanted a forum where I could lay down the principle of my argument... That feelings can never be truly controlled, your attractions and inclinations towards a particular sex, gender or individual group cannot be changed and that everyone should aspire to consensual and understanding love.

Maybe I'm just an idiot who wanted to say something in a place where maybe someone else will understand my thinking or if not, tell me why they disagree without calling me a 'poncy little poofter cunt'...

Please feel free to let loose if you disagree vehemently, I understand it's not a particularly great point of view but hey, I've always been out of tune with humans anyway so I'd be interested to see the spectrum of arguments either against or (far less likely :3) for my points raised here. ",pansexual
"Guys, it's pansexual pride day! I wish you all the best",,pansexual
"Netflix's She's Gotta Have It Is About a Sex Positive, Polyamorous, Pansexuals!",,pansexual
Australian parliament approves same-sex marriage,,pansexual
Discord server - Queer Friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.
Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+)",pansexual
Pansexual more likely to be attracted to fem?,These types of people(men) would more likely be attracted to effeminate men than typical gay men? Yes or no?,pansexual
Australian Senate passes same-sex marriage bill,,pansexual
Signs I might be pansexual. Please tell me if there's a good chance that I am.,"I am a 17 year old high school male. And I love masturbating to gay porn and fingering myself. Is this a sign that I might be pansexual? I also feel sexually attracted to people of all genders, gender identities, and sexual orientations, and there's some guy crushes who I'm not going to name, and I think about riding on their dicks or them riding on my dick.",pansexual
My Parents don't believe im Pan??,"Im a 15 year old girl and im Pansexual but my parents don't believe im actually Pan they think its a phase or im ""pretending"" because of my friend group. But ive known for a while im Pansexual i dont feel 100% ""straight"" and Pan just sorta stuck with me and its how i feel. ive liked girl and guys. How can i get them to take me seriously? ",pansexual
Join the Battle for Net Neutrality! Don't let the FCC destroy the internet!,,pansexual
"Part meme factory, part LGBT support.","https://discord.gg/5Uh8fvN

have that",pansexual
Interview With Our Pansexual Friend,"Hi there! I host a podcast, [interrobang ](interrobangpodcast.com), that discusses topics from a haphazardly queer perspective. We released an episode last week where we interviewed our pansexual friend and I just wanna know one thing —

How did we do?

My co-host and I are a couple of gay dudes trying to become better allies. Do y’all mind taking a listen?

[Episode 07 - Pansexuality?! w. Blue](http://interrobangpodcast.com/2017/11/14/07-pansexuality-w-blue/)
*pardon the quality, still working on that part!",pansexual
Together is Better (LGBTFC),"Hey everyone!
 
We’re having an epidemic of loneliness, and this is even more difficult for the LGBTQIA members around the world. 
 
If you don’t have a social circle in real life; who do you talk to about coming out, transitioning or other LGBT+ issues?
 
2 years ago, I wanted to change this. I want to bring LGBT+ people around the world together, everyone has a friend out there waiting for them - The worst thing is, some people don’t know it!
 
If you'd like to join LGBTFC, click the link below:
 
https://discord.gg/0uNY4OtKZjUgmEpK
 
As well as this, I will be looking for more volunteer staff in the near future! 
 
Thank you so much for reading, and I apologize if this post breaks the rules of the subreddit. 
",pansexual
Discord server - Queer friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.

Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+)",pansexual
Advice for pan SO,"Ok, this is my first post and I'm excited about the potential advice


Me and my SO have been together for two years. The past couple months, we starting fighting quite a bit, and I could tell something was off. This happened for a while. Fast forward, and I got him to go to a trans-rally with me (I'm a cisfemale) in support and education in general, and he was far for interested than I expected!

It was then kind of randomly through text that he came out to me as pan, very nonchalant, he interwebbed it in a conversation! Since then he seems much more relaxed, and just generally happier. He equated the next day to ""feeling like a breath of fresh air"". 

We both generally seem closer and happier since; I'm really thankful and proud that he's not only being true to himself, but for choosing to share it with me.

My question is, is there something you all would've appreciated as a ""coming out gift""? Something I could give or do that really shows him I love and support him? I don't want to seem like I'm harping on it, (which I tend to overdo things) and he seems to be nonchalant about it, but I think it's a big step and want to show him that I know it matters.

Thank you

Edit: details",pansexual
Androsexual and agender,So I'm agender and amab. Androsexual (attraction to males) and I've never met a pansexual guy. I just want to know if any pan or poly guy could ever love me. ,pansexual
The man who wrote the anti-trans bathroom bill just lost to a trans woman,,pansexual
First openly transgender state legislator elected in Virginia,,pansexual
Am I Pansexual?,"I define myself as pansexual due to the fact that I don't care what gender the person is, or how they physically show themselves. I just think whether they're attractive or not.

However, I prefer women, whether they be femme women, butch women, transgender women, androgynous with feminine features (soft face, etc)... I just have a preference. Yet I get told by ""better"" pansexuals or people looking from the outside that that's not what pansexual is, and I can't have a preference.

Am I something else that fits better to what I described, or are they just being rude? ",pansexual
Am I pansexual?,"Hi /r/pansexual, I'm a bit confused and want to see what you all have to say. 

I'm a 21 year old male, I've always had a dislike for labels and avoided putting them on myself so I've personally kind of just sexually identified as.... human? horny? I don't know, I'm attracted to both cocks and vaginas. Romantically, I lean towards feminine and androgynous individuals (""traps"" as they're called online), but sexually I'm pretty much down for whatever as long as the attraction is there.

To people (and my female SO), I've identified heterosexual, or sometimes I'd say I'm bisexual to new friends, but I've avoided it a bit because people would be a bit surprised since apparently I don't look like the type of guy who'd be bisexual. It feels like I'm more attracted to the person. Sometimes that person was born a male but identifies as a female, sometimes they were born a male and identify male, sometimes they were born female and identify female, and so on. I don't really care for the labels, it's about the person. Sure, I do have preferences in how the person should look depending on my role, but that's about it. ",pansexual
how do I introduce myself as pan?,"I always feel wrong introducing my sexual orientation. Saying I'm straight would just be incorrect, if I say I'm bi I'd feel like I'm excluding non-binary people, saying I'm pansexual is right but in the wrong crowd it's 'pretentious' so I've taken to saying I'm lesbian. I'd love to feel comfortable using the term I identify to most but I find it difficult. Any suggestions?",pansexual
LGBT+ Discord Server,We're a decently active LGBT+ server looking for new users to hang out with https://discord.gg/8VuQrkC,pansexual
Discord server - Queer friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer/lgbt people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.

Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+)",pansexual
My trans narrative short film - please consider sharing! (TW: transphobic content),,pansexual
Having a sexual attraction towards male characters though I think I'm lesbian,"So I fell for several fictional characters (Morty Smith, Jessica (R&amp;M), Cthulhu, etc.) and I really think I'm lesbian. I don't fear Cthulhu personally, I just think he's hot. His mannerisms, and the way he eats people, and his cuddly body type, they just sing to me. I'm 16 and I need answers. Help!",pansexual
Feeling like I’m not pan “enough”,"I’d like to warn you I’m gonna use a slur in this post (queer)

I identify as pan because I am attracted to people regardless of gender, but sometimes I feel like I’m not queer enough. I’m a very femme cis gender woman, and I’ve only dated people that identify as men. I have settled down with a trans man who I love very much. I just feel like I have no place in the lgbt community and like I’m lying about being pan. I know who I am, and I know who I’m attracted to, but it feels wrong to identify as pan/queer since I’ve only been with people who identify as men. ",pansexual
Pan Men: Butch women?,"Hey, y'all. I just wanted to know what pansexual men thought of soft butch/butch women. Would you date them? Why/why not? Thanks :)",pansexual
"I has a pansexual, people just assume I want to fuck everybody the thing is I don’t necessarily want to fuck you. This has caused issues and I assume I’m not the only one.",I guess what I’m saying is #metoo,pansexual
"So I all but “came out” to my mom, and it was kind of disappointing (LONG AF)","So first things first; I’m pansexual.

So basically me and my mom were talking about lgbtq stuff. It’s not uncommon because even when I thought I was straight I had a trans best friend (still is he’s amazing) I was a huge supporter of the lgbtq community and stuff. She’s in her 50’s and I believe she’s pretty accepting for that generation. We’ve had numerous convos (because it’s in the news and she knows I know stuff so she asks questions or we talk about the stuff that’s going on) and here’s what she has said about gay people and coming out and such;

She’d be ok with her kids being gay (by extension pan or bi she just uses that as a blanket term).

She said she wouldn’t be embarrassed, so I asked her “so if one of us were gay and had a s/o, you’d be like ‘this is my youngest Jess and their girlfriend ___?” And she said “yes I’d introduce your partner”

But every time we talk about how other people reacted to their kids coming out she’d always say how she would react: “they chose a rough life. Two guys or two women walking down the street holding hands people are going to be rough. As much as society is different and more accepting than 30 years ago, its still rough”

I get what she’s saying but the wording she always says “chose”. It bothers me. I know it’s her generation and that’s the way she thinks but it really makes me hesitate.

We brought up religion as well with this topic. She’s not overly religious, she believes in god but doesn’t go to church or says the rosary or whatever. I said there are people who are in the lgbtq that are still religious and their philosophy is that “god made them the way they are” just how religious straight people say about themselves “what do you think?”. And she was like “I’m sure they do. And that’s good for them” And she said something over top of what I started saying so I didn’t hear it clearly but it gave the impression to me that she didn’t agree with them thinking that’s how god made them.

I’m not religious whatsoever but her response made me a little weary.

We also talked about how my grandparents would react to one of us coming out. They’re very religious Portuguese people. My grandma isn’t bad when gay people do come up in topic she’s like “as long as they don’t force it on me or in my face we’re good”. So that gives me a little hope. We’re extremely close, so I don’t see her reacting horribly. My mom seems to think that if we’d (we because we were talking about any of her kids being gay) show her and explain to her that we’re happy and we are being safe she’d come around even more.

My grandpas a different story, he’s very quiet and only really speaks when he wants to. So I just imagine him not really saying anything on the subject if i did “come out”.

Obviously with the amount of convos we’ve had but most importantly this one where we talked more in depth, she probably suspects. She’s not dumb.

But I’m hesitant to “come out”. Because of all this. I don’t know if I’m nervous because of how I know she’d respond or because some people in this community see it as a big deal.

I hate the term “come out”. I always said I wouldn’t. My “coming out” would be “hey Mom and Dad, meet my girlfriend ___” or if someone would ask me I’d be like “yeah I’m pan”.

God that’s long af. If you have questions, I’ll answer them.

(Sorry if the grammar or anything was horrible, I was typing fast to get all my thoughts out before I lost it. I know it was a big jumble of stuff so sorry for your brain!)

EDIT: I’m not “disappointed” by her response anymore. After thinking about things and through the lovely people on this app, I’ve gotten over what I thought was disappointing. Her use of “choose” really threw me off and made me think she doesn’t get it. After the conversations on here I  honestly from all of what she was saying I think she meant “choosing to show the world” rather than “choosing to be in the lgbt spectrum”. ",pansexual
Sex/Gender irrelevant to sexual attraction?,"I was wondering if anyone else who identified as pansexual found the sex/gender of the person irrelevant to sexual attraction? I'm not saying that a person's sex or gender is irrelevant as it is part of their identity and that is important, but just for sexual (or romantic?) attraction.

Personally I find people without very masculine or very feminine traits the most attractive, and this is irrelevant to their sex/gender. I was just wondering if anyone else felt the same or if some of y'all find people attractive dependent on their sex/gender.

Also personality is important to me. If someone is racist, sexist, homophobic, or has a hateful ideology I lose any attraction for them. I am also aromantic pansexual if that helps.",pansexual
Yay! Miley Cyrus is on Team Pan!,,pansexual
"Q&amp;A with Meg, 28, Who Identifies as Nonbinary, Genderqueer, Polyamorous, and Pansexual",,pansexual
morty learns what a pansexual is.,,pansexual
"I’m looking to buy a pin sorta like this one. But instead of the EU flag. It’s a pansexual flag. I’ve tried eBay, amazon and Etsy with no luck. Any help on where I could get one would be awesome :) thanks",,pansexual
Name that sexuality!,"I hope that title was thrilling enough for you, because this is another ""am I pansexual"" post.

So, I've always known my sexuality and gender identity was a little off, even since I was a kid. I'm a cis female, but I've always been on a boyish side and even when I was a child I would pretend I was ""half boy."" I'm a little more on the masculine side when it comes to my identity, I suppose.

I've only ever dated guys, and when I was I had a hard time being sexually attracted to them off the bat. Hookups went nowhere and were boring for me, and even then I'm a still virgin. I *have* been sexually attracted to men before, but *only* after I was really close to them and good friends with them. Furthermore, I have been in love with a guy. But even then, I didn't even really want to kiss a whole lot or do much sexually, and the sexual attraction faded even though my romantic feelings for him lasted for a while.

With girls, it's a different story. Girls have always been more pleasing to look at, and only recently have I accepted that I'm attracted to them. I haven't even kissed a girl yet - but I can look at one and can immediately imagine getting down and dirty with her, which is something I rarely did with guys. 

To go even further, I'm only thinking about this in boy- girl terms. I haven't even begun to address the pantheon of other gender-inbetweens.

I don't know. I know the ultimate answer is for me to get out there and just friggen do what comes naturally, but I really wanted to get this off my chest and receive some feedback. I pegged it at ""demisexual panromantic"" but who knows?

Tl;dr - is it possible to be demisexual with guys but sexually attracted to girls?",pansexual
"Q&amp;A with Hilary, 44, Who Works Hard to Boost Pansexual Identity in Erie Pennsylvania",,pansexual
Is this weird?,"I'm a 24 year old pan from Bangkok. Normally I don't care about genders. When it comes to relationship, personality is always the first priority. But I've just discovered recently that I'm attracted to crossdressers and mtf trans. I don't know why though. Is it weird? 
I just want to post here because I have no one to talk to. I haven't come out of the closet yet. My family and friends won't understand me for sure. And sorry if there's any mistakes in the post. English is not my first language. ",pansexual
question..,"okay so I'm pansexual (besides a small point in time when I thought I was bisexual) and I feel guilty and bad because I want to marry a male (I'm a female) so I can have children with him, but I feel really horrible as a person because of this but I don't know if it's wrong or if I should stop calling myself pansexual, I just need input on this.",pansexual
Coming out,"So I just came out as pan, but there are some people who say isn't it just bi. For me I'm not attracted to males or females. I only become attracted to people that I become really close to and build an emotional bond with. And it can be anyone. Then I start becoming attracted to them. Would that be more bi than pan?",pansexual
54 Bi &amp; Pan Voices from Western Pennsylvania,,pansexual
I don't know how to deal with my mom,"I [25F] came out to my parents about 4 months ago after breaking up with my ex because he is gay. The first thing my mom said is ""how do you know?"" I asked ""how do you know you're straight?"" I really didn't want to get into how when I was 12 we went to a movie and there was a sex scene where I could not stop staring at this woman's breasts. All I thought about was how I wanted to lick them and finger her while I play with them. I remember feeling really uncomfortable and very weird but it passed and it was fine I figured everyone must think that that sometime. She then said, ""you're just a pan because [your ex] is gay."" She asked a couple more questions than my dad told her to shut up.

After being almost afraid of my dad for most of my childhood he's probably my best friend. He was totally born to raise young adults. I told me to do whatever just makes me happy and he would to glad to someday maybe meet my girlfriend. I also once accidentally texted him graphic details about how I like to have sex with strangers on the weekend. He texted my back ""thanks for the laugh. How do I delete this?"" He's pretty cool.


About 2 weeks ago I cut my hair really short, after having long hair my whole life, and the first thing my mom says to me is ""are you gay?"" I told her ""no I'm pansexual it's like bisexual but more inclusive."" It probably didn't help I was wearing my rainbow pride shirt but that was a coincidence and it's comfortable. She said ""lesbians have short hair.""

When I was in middle school I went through a really bad depression. I was cutting myself daily, I was either crying or running out of class, I would sneak away just to be in the basement alone. My parents made me go to 4 different therapists in 2 years because therapists and Jesus fix everything. I didn't speak to any of them. My mom said ""why did we keep taking you it was a waste of money"" I told them I didn't want to go and I wasn't talking. As an adult I was diagnosed with bipolar disorder 1, OCD, and generalized anxiety disorder. I'm still on their insurance so they pay my medical bills and my mom complains about the cost. She doesn't even pay them my dad does. I have a new therapist as an adult and she said I don't have to do anything I don't want to so I stopped going to therapy. My mom said she doesn't like her but frankly I don't give a flying fuck. I'm finally just doing what I want. My mom used to yell at me when I would get anxious in public. We went to a movie once and my mom asked me to get popcorn. I saw someone I went to school with and I was so embarrassed to been seen with my parents I just shut down. My mom yelled at me in the middle of the concession stand and just rolled her eyes. Another time my dad was running to the store to get something and I forgot to tell him something I needed. I heard his car start up and my mom ran outside to tell him. I told her it's fine I'll just text it. She just yelled at me ""sometimes you need to talk to people even if it is your father.""

She kept bringing all this up even though I told her I didn't want to talk about it. She said ""well now your behavior in middle school makes sense. You were confused."" She kept saying how it was so horrible for her like I bring her dishonor or something. Then she's asking for really personal details of my sex life. We don't talk about sex at all in my family. So I kept getting confused when she kept asking ""were you WITH someone?"" She keeps asking me how two woman would have sex and I just say you do what straight people do, whatever you want. 

Right now I don't know what to do. I'm not just going to cut my mom out of my life but I don't know how to make her just stop asking so many inappropriate questions I'm not comfortable answering. She also told me to go to church when she's knows I've been an atheist for at least the past decade. Jesus and therapy fix everything and I'm doing neither so she's really confused. ",pansexual
"Advice, I guess?","I'm pan, and I'm trying to sell some of my jewellery online. I make mostly pride jewellery and I make stealth ones too. Is there a way to spread it? I'm kind of desperate, and I wanted to ask the part of the community I'm in, if that makes sense.",pansexual
Six Reasons Bisexual &amp; Pansexual Folks Should Share Their Stories with this LGBTQ Archive,,pansexual
How do you get rid of a crush on a straight guy?, It's just never happening. So my hormones need to chill. They won't listen to logic though. ,pansexual
Effem Pan,"I identify myself as male. Pansexual. He, him, his. My expression in terms of clothes are mainly masculine (tho there are days, but rare) but when it comes to my speaking voice and hand gestures, im really effeminate.

It's really hard to woo girls when you're effem. People always say they have a crush on me, then I speak or move :(

Anyone else struggles  with this?",pansexual
My favorite textpost (even though I'm pan and not a lesbian),,pansexual
"""Not gay enough?""","As a pansexual person, have you ever been told you're not gay enough to be part of the queer community?

For some background, I'm pansexual and polyamorous. 
I have lived with my long-term boyfriend for almost 8 years, but we both date other people. We've both had a few other serious relationships and one of my girlfriends  (now ex) lived with us for a bit. 

I haven't really talked about my sexuality a lot in the past, but I've always known I wasn't straight. Even as a child, my romantic interests didn't discriminate when it came to gender. 
I've always really known who I was in that way, even if I didn't always have a name for it. 

The first time someone told me I wasn't really queer was earlier this year when I was at an anime convention with my ftm boyfriend (now ex because he turned out to be trash), and a friend was there with her girlfriend. The friend made a comment about how weird it was hanging out with straight people. I replied with something along the lines of ""there are straight people here?!"" Sort of faux horror. 
And she responsed by saying that I'm straight. And I was like ""no?"" 
She also identifies as pansexual, so this caught me off guard. We've had conversations about our sexuality before, while I was dating a woman, and she didn't bring up me being straight. 

Since then, there have been other weird, offhand comments I've gotten from others in the community about how bi and pan people aren't actually queer unless we are in same sex relationships. 

Today, at pride, I got to talking to a woman who commented on my eyeshadow, which was rainbow and looked awesome. I move my hands a lot when I talk and at one point she saw the bracelets I was wearing. Three on each wrist, to represent the pansexual flag. 
And she asked me why I was at gay pride. And I said I wanted to get more involved in the community. I had not been to Pride since I moved to this city. And she told me that I don't belong there. That pansexual isn't a valid sexuality and I'm just making things harder for people who are actually gay.

I was already emotionally stressed by other things going on and I started crying. She walked away and I went home. 

The more I hear these things, especially from the queer community, the more it upsets me. 
My sexuality IS valid! 

Have you ever dealt with this? How do you handle it?",pansexual
"I, a cisgender/""straight"" female, am deeply in love with a trans woman.","I'm going to try to make this as coherent and short as possible, but please be patient with me. There is a lot going on in my head and heart right now.

I was going to post this on r/asktransgender, but I am all here for her gender identity and this is mainly about my own sexual identity being called into question. I fell in love with a person in a man's body. We're just friends at this point, but I've never had feelings like this for anybody. I was with my ex for almost seven years and we have a child together. I thought I loved him. I know now I did not. I never really did.

So, within the last two years, I've become friends with and, slowly but surely, developed earth-quakingly deep feelings for the most kind, good-hearted, intelligent, sensitive, loyal, hard-working, funny person I've ever met. 

They very recently revealed that they identify as a woman. I was the first person she's ever told.

It surprises me how much it doesn't bother me. In fact, I'm so ridiculously proud of her for coming out to me that I get teary-eyed just thinking of it.

This woman lights up a room when she's happy. Her joy is infectious. She radiates. I've never met anyone like her. God, this woman. I want absolutely nothing else but to be able to put a smile on her lovely face and I'd gladly spend my life trying to do just that. I've had this sneaking suspicion that we're going to get married one day for a while now and I never really even wanted to get married before.

These are serious and pretty scary feelings considering that her transition is in its infancy. As is our relationship, in many ways. I trust her with such totality, though. Always have. If she were a man, I would have probably run away or self-destructed by now. But, I haven't. I feel like it's one of those rare instances that waiting is actually worth it.

All of this and I'm supposedly straight.

Thing is, her coming out to me has made me reopen that little door with that little nagging voice that always whispered, ""well, I dunno...""

Truthfully, I was always attracted to women. When I  started masturbating, it was to pictures of women. I remember getting little jolts of confusing excitement when I'd help one my friends climb up something and my hands would brush against her legs. But, I was always attracted to boys, too. I liked them both. My early sexual experiences were divided equally between boys and girls. 

I kissed them both. Their body parts didn't make that much of a difference to me.

As I got older, the shame set in. I was taught that gay people were okay and straight people were okay, but bisexuality was not. Bisexuality was just an excuse to cheat on your significant other. It was impossible to like both. You had to pick a side.

I ""chose"" to be straight because I'm not a lesbian.

I'm not straight, though. I avoid looking at girls and trans men I find attractive out of the lingering shame I feel when not completely conforming to the ""pretty straight girl"" identity that I was told was the only option. 

So closeted that I couldn't even allow myself to look at a man just because he was born in a woman's body just in case that might not be ""straight"" enough.

I can't believe I'm saying all of this.

But, it's true. It's all so true.

I've always been very accepting of others' sexuality and gender. I would never think of other people the way I've thought about myself. Why have I been hiding for so long?

There's so much more, but I'll spare you all for now.

How do I tell people that I'm pansexual?Should I tell the woman I'm in love with? How? When?

Should I post this on r/asktransgender? 

She has so much going on inside of her, I'd hate to add to that weight. Plus, it's pretty terrifying simply because it would expose every ounce of my feelings for her. We've told one another that we love each other and it's been very intimate. But, I'm still scared. So much could go wrong. Nothing is official. There are still obstacles.

I'm scared, but feel like THIS is the most ""correct"" thing I've ever felt.

Thank you all so much for reading. I feel really weird, but really good.

***edited for general readability
",pansexual
"The Queer Frontier: A closed FB LGBTQ+ Support Group (Female Identified People Only) Inclusive of all religions, nationalities, and orientations.",,pansexual
Seeking interview subjects for student project,"I am a grad student studying new media. For my thesis, I'm going to create videos highlighting people who proudly live outside of social norms. (Gender, sex, family, etc.)

I'm seeking diverse individuals who would be willing to speak to me about why the way they live is great. We can do email, Skype, phone, etc. 

The end result will be a twitter that features video/audio clips, animations, and illustrations. 

If you would not like your voice or face to be shown, please let me know. These will be on the internet, so please be aware in case you aren't comfortable being outed due to work, family, or other circumstances. 

Direct message or comments are okay!",pansexual
Study on bisexual women's discrimination and sexual experiences,"Hello,

My name is Raquel Craney, and I’m a student in the Counseling Psychology Doctoral program at the University of Missouri-Kansas City (UMKC), conducting research regarding bisexual women’s sexual experiences, discrimination, coping, and distress. In order to voluntarily participate in this study, you must a) identify as a bisexual woman (or identify with the experience of being a woman who is attracted to people of the same gender and people of genders different than you), b) be 18 years of age or older, and c) live in the United States. We would like to provide a TRIGGER WARNING because this survey asks questions about unwanted sexual experiences. We are very interested in hearing from BISEXUAL WOMEN OF COLOR, although women from all racial and ethnic backgrounds are welcome to participate.

If you are interested in participating, you will be asked to complete an anonymous online survey that will take approximately 20 to 30 minutes, one time only. If you are interested in participating, please click on the following link: https://umkc.co1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_eII5JmAeCcklliZ

Or, if you would like further information, please email Laurel Watson at watsonlb@umkc.edu

For your participation, you may choose to enter a raffle to win one of eight $25.00 Amazon.com gift cards.

This study, protocol number 16-505, was submitted to the UMKC IRB and determined to be exempt from IRB regulations. If you have any concerns about your rights as a participant your concerns please call 816-235-5927

Thanks for your consideration, and please feel free to share widely! 

Raquel Craney University of Missouri, Kansas City Counseling Psychology Doctoral Student rscbqb@mail.umkc.edu",pansexual
blog,"i wanted to start a blog about being a young pan conservative in today's America and i just wanted to know if anyone would actually read it or give it a look 
",pansexual
Do pansexuals feel attraction towards genderqueer gynesexuals?,"Greetings, I'm a 32-old genderqueer from Chile and, ever since I accepted my true self, I've been wondering what kind of cis-woman would feel attracted to someone like me. I was born male yet never fully identified as such, I don't hate my masculine parts, but other than enjoying sex and peeing standing up, having them wasn't a big deal for me. 

Masculinity has always been alien to me, there was a time not so long ago that I tried to appear more manly and the result wasn't satisfying. Women found me attractive, but not enough to fall for me. A month ago I realized I was living unauthentically and embraced the fact that I'm much more feminine than masculine, even if physically I don't look one way or the other.

Is there any chance a male-born genderqueer can attract cis-women who happen to be pansexual?",pansexual
Cis(?¿) Questioning,"So most of my life I would say I identified as a CIS *SCUM* MALE , but more and more I'm realizing I've always been into 'tomboys' since a young boy. Or rather women with masculine qualities And now that I'm older I notices that I have an attraction to genderfluids, non-binary and transgender femmes. Rather androgynous people but leaning more to the feminine side... would this still be cis? Idk man, I'm confused. I hope I haven't offended anyone.",pansexual
Anyone else here in their 30's that just realized they're not straight?,"After 34 years of convincing myself that I'm hetero I have come to the conclusion that I'm definitely into all kinds of people.

It's so weird to start seeing your future differently. Like, I've been to pride parades a million times before but now that's a parade for me? I thought I was a member of this protected group of people and now I know that I never was? I thought I'd be marrying a man but now I kinda just want to chop my hair off and find a non-man to make out with. :)",pansexual
"Another ""Am I pan?"" type post","So here's how it breaks down. I am a man and I have always considered myself straight. I am mainly attracted to women but have found other people attractive. I also like cock. I never really thought much about that cuz I thought I was straight. But lately I've been trying to be more open with myself and kinda, yknow, experiment. I thought maybe I was heteroflexible cuz I am mainly heterosexual but I like cock and like mmf sex and stuff, but I'm not very attracted to men most the time, and wouldn't really do anything with a man past oral. The more I've thought about it, I realized that genitals/gender just don't really matter that much for me. I do have my preferences, I'm definitely more attracted to feminine people, but cock is not a deal breaker and definitely something I wanna try. Anyhow, kinda just wanted to get my thoughts out. I'm excited to explore. And suck a cock. ",pansexual
Get out of jail free card?,,pansexual
Came out to my straight friend as pan and she made this for me :),,pansexual
I guess I'm pansexual?,"I can see myself being attracted to someone of any gender as long as they're a decent human who treats other people with respect. It's not that gender ""doesn't matter"" to me because I know that it's an extremely personal and often sensitive identifier for so many people, so I won't say that; it's that I just find myself open to anybody. 

Is that pansexuality? If not somebody please tell me! 

I find some (self-imposed) labels comforting and I've been looking for one for my sexuality for a long time. ""Lesbian"" is just too restrictive for me personally &amp; I think ""pan"" is a lot closer to how I approach love and desire. 

I just needed to get that out....thanks Reddit :) ",pansexual
How can I be sure about my sexual identity?,How can I be sure about my sexual identity if I'm still establishing my personal identity?,pansexual
Miley Cyrus is pan?,"Hello r/pansexual from your friends at r/bisexual ! 😊
I just made a post on 'Famous Bisexual rolemodels' and was quickly corrected when I listed miley as bi (bad source)

I thought it was awesome that someone so high profile is publicly out as pan and wanted to make sure you guys knew ☺

Oh and you should have a list of famous pansexuals in the sidebar, I know for myself at least, knowing a bunch of celebrities are bi gives me a sense of legitimacy that helps prevent me questioning my own sexual identity.. 😃

That's all from me, keep being awesome!",pansexual
Questioning Sexuality Endlessly,"**tl;dr i question my sexuality with fear of not being straight, and end up talking about extreme taboo and maniacal kinks**

I declared to myself that I felt pansexual about 1.5 years ago, I'm 20, and I still feel confused very very often. I'm just going to dump what's been going on in my head and hope to hear some opinions or similar experiences. A lot of this has to do with pansexuality, but also fantasy kinks and stuff like that.

Bit of background, I've only dated women, who were mostly cis, except one much longer term relationship with someone who also identified as pansexual, but still passionately female. That's not to say they didn't play dominating roles or things like that in their gender role. I've had a pretty straight life, except a few consecutive occasions when I was in high school where I gave/received a handjob and received a blowjob from a close friend that was male identifying and gay. 

I was a lot younger when that happened, and was conditioned by society to feel wrong about it. I think I just wasn't comfortable with the idea. Possibly from parenting, possibly from myself, who knows, I still don't know. We hooked up a few times, but never kissed on the lips or anything like that. I ended up getting up and leaving one time he was coming onto me because I think I just genuinely didn't like how it felt at the time, and that was the end of that.

In terms of internet porn, which I'm particularly curious to whether you guys think is valid or even meaningful, I transitioned from watching straight porn to watching gay porn to watching porn with transgender women, and bouncing back and forth between them. As a clueless teen, I just feared about being gay, for some reason, and lived in fear of not being straight. After freshmen year of college, it became pretty clear to me I don't really fit the typical male gender role. I identified with a lot of feminine mannerisms, but also didn't feel entirely like I wanted to give up all my male characteristics, and still don't honestly. I labeled myself as gender queer, which was actually a really common and well received thing at the college I was going to, and felt a little bit better. I still identify as gender queer, but struggle all the time, *still*, about thinking about my sexuality.

What it comes down to in my head, is I think I am more sexually aroused by dicks than vaginas, but far far far far far far *far* more emotionally attracted and connected to women or female identifying individuals than men. This basically leads me to transgender women, but for some reason I never feel comfortable with that result. The hard part is I can't differentiate if it's due to fears of society/parents or I just genuinely still like women too. There's something that's frightening to me about only dating one person of one identifying gender for the rest of my life until I die, which I know is where polygamous relationships come into play, but I don't know much about them and feel like they're commonly looked down upon or seen as alien in every social circle I've ever been in. I usually end up thinking in my head that I'm just more sexually attracted to transgender women than regular women, but not more emotionally connected to one or the other. This obviously leads to conflicts in my head though, because should I just pursue trans women then? I am currently, though, pursuing women like crazy because I genuinely just don't know any transgender women, and I am **very** selective and put huge emphasis on emotional connection rather than sexual encounters. It's easy to feel like I could be in heaven just dating some girl where the sex is good, but I could never bring myself to do it. This paragraph is pretty much where I would like to hear any insights or similar experiences about.

Now, on a different topic, which I think is more related to mental illness, sometimes when I masturbate I sometimes think I am incredibly stimulated by taboo. Taboo is a pretty broad word, but it basically materializes into negative taboo things. Being dominant and misogynistic towards someone female-identifying, being completely dominated/gangbanged by wealthy powerful men, cheating with sex, being abused, and some other even scarier ones, are all things that I have one or another ended up masturbating to. Obviously they all remain as fantasies, but now, typing this out, it scares me a lot more. I guess I can gain comfort knowing it's in my head, but I feel like it can all sound very psychopathic very fast. It's just the idea that it's *wrong* that arouses me immensely. To the point where sometimes if I'm not really feeling it when I'm having sex with some random hookup, I'll think about us having sex with context of something that's inherently wrong (I've thought about incest and rape before..) and I'll be able to cum way faster. This post started really as a curious questioning thing with my sexuality, but it's turned into a completely different topic. I feel like as I'm writing this out and getting it out of my brain for the first time to other people, I'm scared. Usually I think about these things in the heat of the moment, and then cum, and then forget about them and don't think about things like that ever again. I feel like this is very unhealthy and I want help. I've been to a therapist before, but just for depression and anxiety, not really directly relating to any of this. It obviously complicates things with my sexuality, because in terms of thinking about my best friend fucking me and demeaning me vividly in my head (because that's taboo and wrong), makes me immediately feel like I'm gay. But when I'm not incredibly horny and alone masturbating, I don't think about ever starting a relationship with my friend or even having sex with him, it's just the extreme taboo and inherently erroneous act that's so hot. I do find myself masturbating to traps or transgender women more so than any other porn as of the past year or so, which might lead me towards the direction of thinking I'm just attracted to trans women, but perhaps it's because it's something that would be seen as ""wrong"" by society and why it's arousing to me.",pansexual
My new Pan Pride shirt,,pansexual
I hate being pansexual,"THERE ARE TOO MANY OPTIONS

TOO MANY BEAUTIFUL PEOPLE

UGH",pansexual
"Q&amp;A with Roxxie Thunder, 27, Glittery Pansexual Femme from Beaver County",,pansexual
Is pansexual the right term?,"I've been doing a lot of thinking about my sexuality lately and I realized I'm basically only attracted to men who are more feminine than masculine and women who are more masculine than feminine, as well as many androgynous and non-binary people. I'm also not really attracted to genitals at all regardless of biological sex. Does this count as pansexual? Bisexual? Is it on the asexual spectrum? Any term I'm unfamiliar with?",pansexual
"I've been out as a Lesbian for years. I'm realising I'm probably pan, but if I admit that my sister will think that she's 'cured' me.","Yeah :(

Tragic backstory; mum is one of the sweet christians who genuinely cares about everyone, but she's dying of cancer and the main thing that is helping her get through it is knowing that she will see us all in heaven. My sister, however, is a particularly hateful baptist christian who uses the 'hate the sin, not the sinner' excuse for her abhorrent behavior toward LGBT people. A few years ago she literally tried to disown me because I refused to apologise for being angry at her when she told me I was a dirty sinner and going to hell for my 'wrong behaviour'.

The only reason I haven't 'come out' as agnostic is because I know my mum would be BEYOND devastated, and that my sister will use it as further cannon fodder and end up hurting my mum even more. I stay civil/friendly toward my sister and put up with her behaviour until she says something totally out of line for the same reason. I keep up a strict 'grey rock' approach around her. 

My sister is training to be a minister and she's got work in her church, where she is campaigning to be a helping hand to people struggling with mental illness. Of course, for her church that category includes LGBT people. I know she has been using me lately as an example for how she's really super tolerant and she can get along with gay people. I'm 100% aware of her trying to manipulate me into going back to church and she seems to think that my total lack of response is me accepting it. She is a BIG believer in ex-gay therapy so I'm just waiting for the day that she signs me up for it. 

So my present predicament is; I'm starting to think I'm more pansexual. Most of my crushes (Like 95%) are on ciswomen, but they are all either in a relationship or straight and I'm happy on my own so I just push it out of my mind. But I've been interested in non-binary/trans people before, and this time I am kinda interested in a guy I met who happens to be single. I'm starting to realise I'm attracted to personality first - it just happens that most of the time women fit my 'type'. I want to explore relationships with anybody I'm interested in, no matter what gender they are. I'm interested in trying out dating this guy just to see how it goes. 

But... my sister has been not-so-subtly trying to convert me and I know if I start a relationship with a cishet guy she will be over the moon and use me as an example for how ex-gay therapy works, no matter what I say otherwise. Since she's in a position of power in her church, has an inherent hatred of queer people, and has been focusing on providing 'help' to people like me, letting her think that would be so so dangerous to anybody she ends up 'counselling'. So I'm feeling kinda stuck and resentful about it. I live with her and my mum so it's not like I can totally hide it from her or cut her off. Until mum passes away I refuse to leave her alone with my sister, so I'm stuck here. 

I don't know what to do. ",pansexual
My daughter is Pan and is on a Girl Scout trip. adults in this thread do you remember finding it easier to be an all female trip or does it not matter? When she's on coed trips boys seem to distract her more/lead to some drama,,pansexual
Pansexual Characters &amp; Black Hole Heartbeat,"I'm an pan author (with a new sci fi novel about a pan character) and was wondering if anyone knows of any other novels with pan characters? I'm sure there are dozens of us. My Google searches are only returning TV and movie characters, or just characters from the movie Pan.

If anyone is interested in mine, it's called Black Hole Heartbeat and I'm doing an Author Spotlight next Saturday (8th July) on r/books and the mods are happy for me to mention it here. The book is free both physical and ebook format from https://andrewhenleyauthor.wixsite.com/andrewhenleyauthor",pansexual
"Please, some advice thx","My parents are lesbian and bisexual, so I have grown up around queerness and been fine with it (they are now divorced, not looking for pity points, it's important to the plot). They recently both moved to oakland and have been living in separate houses. I recently decided to identify as pansexual, and I know my parents would be fine with it, but recently, I got into an argument with one mom. I don't know how to come out to her (and I can't come out to the other one because she would tell the mom I'm having an argument with). Furthermore, I go to a school that's very anti-queer, anti-belief, and even though I have come out as an atheist, I am not sure what reaction I would get from my ""friends"". And, my other (straight, lesbian parents) friend might push me away for a super racist (i am part Asian) anti-belief, anti-queer cis girl he is crushing on. Another concern of mine is he will think I am crushing on him (I am not).  Thank you ",pansexual
Can you be pan and not be sexual attracted to ftm transpeople?,"What the title says. I am romantically attracted to female-to-male or female-to-anything people, but not sexually. Something about a person that appears traditionally masculine but has a vagina doesn't click with me. Can I still consider myself pansexual, or is there a different label that would be more fitting?",pansexual
Share your stories about monogamy?,"Im a pan/queer cis woman dating a straight cis man whom I love and generally find very attractive.

We've been monogamous for almost 3 years and overall it's very good. But there is a huge and growing sense of loss for me that if we get married (which I mostly want) then I will never date a woman or any other non-man again. Maybe this isn't the right r/ to ask this in but I'm curious to hear stories about other pansexual folks' experiences with monogamy (or not). Don't have many other pan friends so could use some life experience here.

Thank you!! &lt;3",pansexual
My little sister told me she's pansexual,"She's 14 and I'm her 19 year old brother. We're on vacation and are sleeping in the same room. We went to bed around 11:00 last night and stayed up until nearly 1:00 just talking. She was asking me random questions as well as personal questions, like relationship type stuff, and I tried to answer everything the best I could. She was asking me about my girlfriends I've had and she told me about her boyfriends and her first kisses. I'm usually pretty soft-spoken and this was the first time I talked with her about personal stuff like that. I was a little uncomfortable but I could tell she was really enjoying the talk. I mostly just listened.

When she told me she's pansexual I was just sort of like ""oh, okay"". She said she's into boys, girls, and everything in between. I asked her ""What's in between boys and girls?"". She just sort of started saying a list of words that I had never heard before. I think demi and omni were in there. I still haven't looked any of them up.
I told her I didn't really believe in gender fluidity or the whole idea of the gender spectrum. She seemed surprised but we didn't really get into it, we went to sleep shortly after.

My concern is this. She is still very young and I'm worried she's feeling compelled to apply labels to herself. She's a very sweet and thoughtful person, but I'm having trouble believing that she's emotionally mature enough to come to this sort of conclusion. I'm worried that social pressure might be playing too big a role in how she conceptualizes herself, but I also don't want to impose my beliefs on her. I also don't want to belittle her by saying something like ""it's just a phase"" even though I genuinely think it might be.

Edit:  Hey everyone, thanks for all your replies! I've read them all. This is all pretty new to me so sorry if I was insensitive, that wasn't my intention. And even though some of you got a little passive aggressive I feel like I've got some new insight, so thank you. Like most of you suggested, it's probably best I just let her figure it out herself. She's already pretty comfortable talking to me, and I'll always try to be there for her. Even when we disagree it never turns angry for either of us. It's a weird dynamic for sure, one that I'm not used to. I never really had someone to open up to like that growing up, but that was probably my own fault for being so closed off, so I'm very excited to be that person for my little sister.",pansexual
"A Q&amp;A with 32 year old Angie, a Black Pansexual Poly Feminist Mom","Angie's story is the latest part of the AMPLIFY Q&amp;A archive. Link in comments. We have more than 210 stories in the archive, many of whom identify as pansexual. It is a great resource. ",pansexual
Rik's LGBTQ+ Discord Server,"Hi, i made a LGBTQ+ Server on discord so LGBTQ+ people can talk to each other and have fun! So just come and take a look! https://discord.gg/ETJXCvE (Hetero People can join too!",pansexual
LGBT+ Discord Server,"A friend and I recently made a Discord server for LGBT+ people to talk and hang out, hetero people are allowed too of course https://discord.gg/8VuQrkC",pansexual
"Q&amp;A: Krista, 28, Lives in Rural Pennsylvania as a Pansexual Woman",,pansexual
Haha I am confused,"Sorry if this goes against any rules, I'd just like to sort of rant. Sorry about my English too.
When I was quite young, I found myself being sexually turned on by the female body (I think it started when I was maybe 6 or 7. I never knew about sex.) Around this age plus a few years later, I don't think I ever found sexual arousal from the male body.
But I get emotionally attached to males. Recently I realized I can get emotionally attached to females or just anybody, so I'm guessing that's pansexual, but probably not since it's not sexual attraction I'm talking about. But when I get emotionally attached to females, it feels more like I'm forcing myself and really I may just want them as a close friend- unlike a guy where I think of them in a more romantic sense. It's weird. 

I thought I never really found males sexually attractive, but then I've fantasized more about enjoying sex with a male than a female and recently I realized that I like yaoi, so now I'm just confused lmao. I don't really feel anything when I think of lesbian sex however. It's possible I've grown out of being sexually attracted to females since maybe that was all I had known of sexuality when I was younger. I like the idea of dressing like a guy and being mistaken for one/treated as one with the pronouns and such, but I'm not transexual and I label myself as tomboy (so like, cross dressing I guess?) 

Plus, I have schediaphilia/fictophilia (mostly emotionally to males, but sometimes female sexually and occasionally female emotionally even though it might just be me wanting some sort of friendship?) Lmao I'm just really confused XD. To clarify, I am female. I guess I want some label to explain my orientation better/simplify everything but people say labels aren't necessary when it starts getting complicated so I might just get advice such as, ""you are whoever you are you don't need a label!"" I know that isn't bad advice, but it'll be kind of relieving if I can just use one word to describe myself lmao.

I am really sorry if that was confusing, it was a bit of a rant so I'll try to clarify if there are any questions/misunderstandings",pansexual
Confused about my sexual orientation...,"Recently I read a book where the female main character had to pretend she was a boy. While she was masquerading as a male, she met a girl and they danced together and kissed. Later this girl found out the main character was female and she wasn't weird about the discovery or anything, but said that she wasn't interested in the main character anymore because she wasn't into girls. (Sorry if I lost you there.)

I remember this surprising me, it just felt so inherently wrong. It startled me that she was no longer interested in someone simply because of their sex. That felt wrong, that felt weird to me.

I know a simple scene in a book is such a small, inconsequential thing, but ever since reading it I've been confused about my sexuality. I've never really thought love had a gender. If I was attracted to someone and their gender turned out to be different from what I'd initially thought I wouldn't think it'd change how I felt about them? Though, before this book I hadn't really given that circumstance much though, it just was what I'd assumed everyone was like, I didn't think that people would just automatically be not attracted to someone because on their gender?

I've only had one full-blown crush in my life, and it was a male, so I can't really look to that to determine whether I'm truly pansexual or not? I think I've been attracted to females but I'm not certain on anything really???

I know a simple paragraph in a book is pretty much nothing to go off of when discovering one's sexuality. I think I'm pan, but everyone seems so sure, and I'm not? I don't want to say or think I'm pan if I'm not, that'd be unfair to the community. I just don't know...

Sorry for bugging you all with this mini essay, I just really could use some advice...",pansexual
Reporter looking to speak with pansexual-identifying people for an article,"Hi there, 
I'm a reporter working on a story about pansexual identity and misunderstanding surrounding pansexuality through the words of pansexual-identifying people themselves. If you're willing to speak with me for this story, please shoot me a message! 
Looking forward to hearing from you! Thanks!
",pansexual
Friendly LGBTQ+ Discord Server,LGBTQ+ Server on discord so LGBTQ+ people can talk to each other and have fun! So just come and take a look! https://discord.gg/yemSKgW Open to all!,pansexual
I thought you guys might like these lock screens!,,pansexual
LGBTQ+ Discord Server,"Hi, i made a LGBTQ+ Server on discord so LGBTQ+ people can talk to each other and have fun! So just come and take a look! https://discord.gg/ETJXCvE (Hetro People can join too!)",pansexual
23 mtf trans kik,"Hello. So I'm still only out as trans online. I don't dress, and haven't begun my transition since I'm still not out publicly. But I'd really love to talk to people as who I really am on KIK messenger. My kik is RPKev. Feel free to message me. ",pansexual
"New here, but struggling with identity.","This last few years I began identifing as pansexual, and whilst that still pretty much holds true. I'm a girl who's only sexual experiences have been with men. I'm now in a long term relationship with a man who I met before I started properly exploring the idea of pansexuality. I am now getting thoughts of women I realise now I was very attracted to but didn't register as a gay attraction because I was still under the delusion I was straight. I'm completely annoyed for not realising sooner because now I keep thinking about what I might have missed out on, sexually and romantically with a woman. I see women in a totally different way to men sexually too, which only adds further fuel to the fire that is not knowing. 

I don't want to end my relationship by any means, because I am happy. But I don't want to go forever not knowing what it's like to be with a woman. Threesomes are off the cards too, he's not that kind of guy, and being monogamous I can't exactly ask for a free pass to be with a woman should the opportunity arise. I don't know how to stop caring about the fact, anyone else been in a similar situation and have any advice for getting past it?",pansexual
"Q&amp;A: Vanessa, 31, Describes Her Transition, Life as Pansexual in Washington County",,pansexual
Questio about gender from a person who doesnt know a lot about this topic,To start things off I just want you to know that I dont know a lot about this topic. I just want to know more myself. I hope I dont get a lot of hate. Why do we need more than two genders? I thought genders were only for reproduction.  Why can't you just sexually identify as a man woman or hermaphrodite based on what part you have? Why cant you just like whatever or whoever you like?,pansexual
Need advice,"Hello, 

So I'm kind of new to Reddit so please forgive me for the wordy text or if I say something stupid.

I discovered I was pansexual about 4 years ago when I started falling for a friend of mine who is gender fluid. It was kind of confusing at first because I didn't know if it was the girl side of them that I liked or if it was the male side, until finally it dawned on me that it didn't matter. Anyways, she was into me as well so we tried dating for a bit. It didn't last very long and I didn't get very far, apart from kissing and touching. Fast forward almost 3 years later and I decide I want to try dating women again. I tried online dating and found this amazing woman. We had our first date and it was electric. I knew I had found my soul mate. The difference this time is that she's transgender (MtF). Now that didn't matter to me and it still doesn't. I love her for her amazing spirit and personality, not what's between her legs. This is where it starts getting difficult though. I met her before full time transition and before surgery. Every aspect of our relationship has been great, up until now. Our sex life has become stagnant. We are both very submissive people and to make matters more difficult, her gender dysphoria is starting to affect what we can and cannot do. She thinks getting surgery will fix most of those problems, especially those we currently have in the bedroom. I know having the surgery won't affect how much I care for her, but my biggest worry is that because I've never truly experienced having sex with a woman I'm not going to be able to please her anymore. 

Again, sorry for the wordy text. Any ideas or advice would be great. Thanks :).",pansexual
Mia Donna Has Wild Happy Life as a Pansexual Polyamorous Person: A Q&amp;A,,pansexual
I'm male and afraid if I fall for a guy I'll get bored easily or start to miss the female body. Anyone else or vice-versa?,"So... I'm worried if I start a relationship, even if it's cute, casual, cuddly, and makes my life sparkle, that I'll get bored with the guys anatomy.  

Like... I get that everybody's body is different but I would hate to move in with a guy and then three months later be bored looking out a patio door only to hear the guy say ""what's wrong?"" while I'm harboring feelings of wanting a beautiful female body.  

The idea of being with the same person isn't quite the issue so much as never having sex with a female again if I wind down with a guy.  (And to be honest by female I mean the body.  To date I've only been head over heels for men except for my first love.  I mean I've agonized over women and even been left dumbstruck by them a bit but generally I get all goofy over cute guys.)   ",pansexual
Movie that Stretches Ideas of Love and Romance,,pansexual
My boyfriend seems to resent the fact that I'm queer,"He says that the fact that I'm ""into literally everything"" makes him feel that he's not special. Or that I'm settling with him despite the fact that he is a man. Has anyone else experienced this type of mentality? Any advice?",pansexual
"""But you are so relaxed about it?!"" Reactions to Pan","After chatting about sexualities with some new found friends I explained that I identified myself as Bi.  My perception has always been that I love the person and appreciate the body and being very body positive you have to work (or not as the case may be) for me not to like your physical form.  After some questions one of them exclaimed ""then you are Pan like me!""  I laughed and calmly said ""probably we didn't have that term when I first discovered myself"".  

She was so pleased to meet another Pan that we chatted very candidly for about an hour.  A quieter member of the group looked like he wanted to say something about it all and after a while I said so and invited him to comment.  

He stumbled over the words but the upshot of it was ""but you are so relaxed about it?!"" and then went on to explain that only lgbtq+ people he met jump down his throat every time he ventured an opinion or asked a question.  Worse still they saw any questions or curiosity on his part as him trying to come out of the closet rather than being what we saw.  A respectful and curious cis straight guy wanting to not be ignorant.

We chatted for even longer talking about the thought processes that led me and my new Pan buddy Katie to realising ourselves.  He was transfixed by it all that he was able to share what was to him and interesting and different path through life no different to visiting another country and learning about another culture.

Part of being Pan for me is treating each new soul I meet as a new canvas until the colours show themselves.  We harm ourselves sometimes by so quickly painting the agendas of others before we know them and then acting so affronted when it happens to us.

Thoughts with love,

Chemyst.",pansexual
"Advice, support and some possible clarity about my sexuality please.","I have always considered myself a straight female. Im happy being female but recently I have been questioning my sexuality. This is where it gets confusing.
I am now starting to realise I am not sexually attracted to people unless I like them as a person first. This I believe has always been true, as a young kid people would ask me who my crush was and I would say no one, as I genuinely didn't like any of the boys OR girls because I didn't know them well enough.
I have carried that into my young adult years. I do not have celebrity crushes, I do not find strangers in the street sexually attractive. I know a beautiful person when I see one, but I am not sexually attracted to them. I am only sexually attracted to a person after I love them for their personality. Due to this I am still virgin and have never had a partner as I am so picky with personalities. This would make me (from my own research Demi-sexual)
Until recently I have only ever had sexual attractions to men. This is were it gets confusing. I recently found out a girl who was friends with the man I was interested in was lesbian. I always thought she was beautiful, but I was not sexually attracted to her. But when I found out she was lesbian I was excited and cant stop thinking about her and how I would love to meet her (I'm assuming this is because I want to find out about her peronality.) I then went to a party and had an incredibly deep and meaningful conversation with another female in which people believe is in someway a part of the LGBT+ community. She was on MDMA and I was drunk (putting this in there because it may have had an affect on our feelings) We talked about our passions which were incredibly similar, she was kind, and I really liked her personality (always have, the conversation at the party just pushed me to like her more). We locked eyes at the party as she said to me ""you really are a truly beautiful woman' and I felt so much passion between us both, to the point where if id stayed a little longer I may have ended up asking her on a date. Both of these encounters with women have happened this year, so thats why its all so much more confusing. I have never been one to consider gender at all in any cases, I see souls instead (whether your a Trans Woman or Male, Female or Male, I see your soul) ((which through my own research is considered Pansexual?))
I will admit to questioning my sexuality a few times briefly in the past, as i do consider womens bodies to be beautiful and mens bodies too, but brushing the concept off immediately.
Im not sure I could imagine myself having sex with a woman, but I could imagine myself being in some sort of a relationship with a woman. But that also goes for a man as well, although when I love a man enough, I do want to have sex with him, so perhaps this is the case with women too if I were to love their personalities enough?
Adding to the stress is the fact that Im still virgin, so I'm scared I may loose my virginity to the wrong person as I'm so confused, and Im too scared to sleep with anyone to see wether Im sexually attracted to their gender on a whim because of my inability to feel sexually attracted without some form of relationship first.
Im unsure what I want out of this, but I just wanted some support and possibly some insight into where I may fit in. The rebellious, free spirited part of me (which is most of me) wants to say ""I'm whatever the fuck I am and love is love, I have no labels, I see no genders"" and to just go with the flow, which is truly, deeply in my heart what I believe, but the part of me which is still conformed to society thinks I need a label for it.
I feel i probably fit into some demi-sexual pansexual sub-category, but Im really not sure and don't really want the label. If you've read all of this Im truly greatful. I just need some help or support or something. Im so confused and am not comfortable yet bringing it up with my friends or family.
Thankyou xx",pansexual
"Selene, 60, is genderfluid, pansexual, femme-presenting, neuroqueer and more. She shares her story in the AMPLIFY project",,pansexual
Coley Claims To Be Invisible in Plain Sight as a Pansexual Genderfluid Black Femme,,pansexual
Pan Problems af,"I look pretty masculine but I totally go back and forth between wanting to pound someone who calls me daddy to wanting to be pounded and be daddy's princess. 

Pan problems af.",pansexual
IMPORTANT ANNOUNCEMENT ABOUT THE PLACEMENT OF THE PAN FLAG,"the territory has fallen under dispute. we've made a deal to relocate the flag (the other party will help as part of the truce). until then, enjoy the new pan heart on the vertical trans flag.

**DETAILS**:

original dispute: https://np.reddit.com/r/KCRoyals/comments/633eut/royals_bros_let_us_put_our_collective_dongs/dfr2qse/

resolution: https://np.reddit.com/r/TransFlagPlace/comments/6341dq/important_message_from_official_discord_chat/?st=j11i6vh4&amp;sh=a1f4b5da",pansexual
I need some support!,"Hello r/pansexual! I'm fairly new to this, so excuse me if I seem really wordy, but I want to get my thoughts out.
To be short and honest, I have realized that I am pansexual and am romantically attracted to all genders and orientations. I've been out for about a month and a half, but I find my confidence wavering in coming out to those lose to me. I've come out to most of my family and they've been entirely loving and supportive.
I guess I have two questions that I'd like to ask to now if any of you have advice or experienced similar things.
1) Next week, my class will be discussing sexual ethics, gender, and orientation. If sexual orientation comes up n the discussion and I am asked about my experience, I want to be honest about my orientation. I'm scared of how my colleagues will react because they've only known me as straight. How should I go about this?
2) I have been a Christian and active member of the United Methodist Church my whole life. It is still and will continue to be an important part of my life. But I am concerned about my relationship with my home church if I come out publicly (on Facebook, etc.) and if I potentially date and marry another man. Have any of you experienced this same dilemma?
I hope you all are doing well!",pansexual
Can we make a Pan Flag on r/place?,"Specifically around [here] (https://www.reddit.com/r/place#x=257&amp;y=570). **FINISHED! I AM SO PROUD OF US! IT IS SO PRETTY!**

We are also filling one of the rainbow hearts. Specifically, this one [here] (https://www.reddit.com/r/place#x=557&amp;y=728) (thank you /u/Ivy_Adair for starting it) **Finished! &lt;3**

Also, look at the hearts on the Trans flag's center for a little surprise &lt;3",pansexual
My journey to accepting my orientation,"I was attracted to people regardless of sex and gender as long as I remember finding people attractive. I knew as a child that there was gay and straight, but I didn't know there was anything else. I tended to like males more in elementary school, so I thought of myself as straight, but I knew I liked females, so I was afraid I was possibly gay. I would cry and pray, asking for god to make me not like girls anymore. When that didn't work, I would be left feeling guilty about something that I had no control over. 

In junior high (that's what we called it in the early 2000's in SoCal), I heard about bisexuality and I knew that fit me better than heterosexual, but I had a hard time admitting it to myself. I had a crush on one of my female friends and we had frequent sleep overs. We would do flirtatious things, but never anything overtly sexual.

In the eighth grade, our class had a vote for the yearbook on things like ""most fashionable"", or ""most likely to succeed"". One guy who was supposed to be my friend convinced most of the class to vote for me and the girl who I liked as cutest couple. Since it was a private Christian school, they wouldn't publish those results, but students counted the votes, so everyone knew. 

I went to a high school kind of far away, so very few people from junior high ended up going to the same school. I was excited to have a new start. It was a performing arts school, so sexual orientation wasn't a big deal to students. I still went to a very conservative church and was very involved, so I still was hiding my orientation. 

I had so many crushes on girls at my school, but was too scared to act on them. In my junior year, I had two major crushes on two of my friends. The three of us were very close and I wanted to be with both of them. One time one of them told me that she found an actress attractive and that she might be bisexual. I wanted to kiss her, tell her she was beautiful, tell her I wanted to be with her, and that I loved her. I didn't because I was too scared. 

In my senior year, I had an openly bisexual friend in my weight lifting class and our lockers were close to each other. Sometimes I would wear sexy lingerie to get her attention. She often challenged me on my ""Christian"" beliefs and I knew I was a hypocrite because my church would teach homosexuality was wrong and I was attracted to women. One time she said that I could touch her nipple piercings, I wanted to, but I pretended I didn't.

In highschool, I am not sure when exactly, my friend from junior high invited me over for a sleepover. When we were going to bed she asked me if I ever thought about doing things with another girl. I knew if I said yes, we would end up doing things, but I was afraid so I said no. She said, ""Me either,"" and rolled over and went to bed. Sometimes I think about how alone that must have made her feel. 

In college, I was still telling people I was straight. My friends would joke that I was the most lesbian non-lesbian there was. Sometimes I would make out with other females, but I would only date men. People would ask me if I was bisexual all the time, but I would deny it. 

I got married to my wife and she was the the first person I told I was bisexual. (My wife is transgender, so I thought she was a man at the time.) Later I heard about pansexuality and realized that was more fitting for me. I slowly started falling away from Christianity and stopped praying to be straight.  I came to accept my orientation and stopped feeling guilty  about it. A little over a year ago I came out to all my friends and family. It went well overall, although a few people were mad I didn't tell them first or at how I came out. ",pansexual
My Definition of Pansexual,"I also posted this in a bisexual forum but I think it applies here. I'm super new to Reddit so I'm still learning.

Can't I just be sexual? I just don't really define myself as a specific sexuality. I'm a cis woman. I'm married to a man. He's the one my soul fell in love with. The physical attractions for me come only after my mind and heart fall in love. I'm physically attracted to anyone really. Yes, I do have just physical attractions to men and women. As in crushes or that tingle in my pants when I see Kit Harrington, Ruby Rose or Andrew Lincoln.

Though I've been attracted to transgender or gender fluid  folks too. I like androgynous people. I legit don't care what's between someone's legs. I'll like it if I like the person. And it doesn't have to ""match"" the gender. And just because I married a man doesn't mean I chose a sexuality. I chose HIM. I never know how to explain this..... I'm not straight because I married a man. It doesn't work like that. So hard to explain. Does anyone understand this? Myself? Like I said cis woman and femme (I don't even really know what femme means). Traditionally feminine? ",pansexual
I need some advice guys,"Recently I was really depressed and I wasn't quite able to put the finger on the why. I know how it is to hate oneself and I knew that it wasn't something like that this time. To my point: I in the last few week I encountered some different sexualities in literature and I thought a lot about those kind of things, and I was confused when I came to the conclusion that I really didn't care for the physical gender of the caracter. I know this is fiction and to compare it with reality doesn't really make much sense, but it really got me thinking.
I am a born male and also feel that way and I had some relationships with women. However, even though I like women sexually, I think I wouldn't really care about the actual sex of a romantic partner tbh.
In conclusion, I think, for me relationships, even sexually, would be possible for me under the right circumstances, but I am not quite sure, because I have no experience with other genders than female at all.
My questions:
-Given my feelings would be the way I assume, would this classify as pangender?
-How should I test whether I feel that way or not?
-Do you have general advice for my sorry ass xD
Thank you a lot if you are actually reading this. Wiriting this seems to help me not being depressed and think this unresolved problem could have actually been the cause.
Damn am I weird
",pansexual
"Interested in your perspectives on research exploring ""Difference""","Our research group invites each of you to participate in a study which focuses on exploring the ways personal identity may affect how we perceive others. We recognize that each aspect of identity can be complicated. For this study, we are interested in your understanding of these topics. We estimate the survey will take approximately 15 minutes of your time to complete.

Your participation will contribute to our profession’s understanding of how mental health professionals tend to understand their work with a wide variety of clients. As the United States population continues to make historic shifts, social, professional and political influences on mental health are predicted to increase. The goals of this research include assisting mental health care providers to understand how current changes in demographics may affect mental health care.

Participation from a wide range of perspectives is important. So, please share with anyone and everyone over the age of 18 who would be willing to complete the survey!

To participate in the study please follow or cut and paste the link below: https://umsl.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_0GN66A80ZVylyOp 

This research is being overseen by the Institutional Review Board (“IRB”) at the University of Missouri - Saint Louis

Respondents from all backgrounds are needed. We need your help to get the word out to as many people as possible!",pansexual
Pansexual - all genders or regardless of gender?,"Some people say that pansexuality is being attracted to all genders, other say *regardless* of gender. Does being attracted to different things on different genders (for example, short hair on women but not men) still count as gender blind? ",pansexual
Coming out.,Title says all. ,pansexual
Fear,"So im recently coming out. Slowly to people in my life. The more I open up the more scared i am. I just see so much hate. So many hate crimes, gays, trans, beat to death. Shit like that. I'm finally being open and so happy about it. And I'm just more and more afraid to be who i am.

Anyone have helpful words?",pansexual
Angela is a Queer Mother Identifying as Pansexual,,pansexual
Pride from Iowa State University,,pansexual
I did it.,"Yeah, I'm the person who never wanted to come out to my parents. My mother sits me down one day after school, asks me about my day, what homework I have, etc. She then asks me (for about the thousandth time) about why I joined my school's Gay-Straight Alliance. I said it was because my friends wanted me to, and I also have several friends who were part of the community. Unfortunately, I had so many opportunities to tell both my parents I was pan, but decided to keep it to myself. But it was when my mother told me she kept hearing all this ""pan stuff,"" that I just had to tell her. It was also wasn't that easy answering ""yes"" to if I liked people of my own gender. To be honest, I think it was a bit anticlimactic. She told me she would always love me, we hugged. But I don't think it needed to be dramatic. I overheard her talking to my father, both whispering to each other, but I knew she just told him. He never confronted me about it, never spoke of it, he's just carrying on with his life. And that's okay! I was so scared of coming out, but now I feel proud. I feel relieved. 
I feel PANTASTIC.

If I were to take one thing away from this experience, it would probably be to tell them myself, rather than to get it out of me (which both my mother and sister have done). But again, that is quite alright with me! I'm glad my mother came to me first, because I know I still do NOT have the courage to speak up about it. So in the occasion of contradicting myself, I'm not so sure how I feel about my family knowing. They act like nothing ever happened, but I still come up with all these dumb scenarios of how they could be hiding a hint of wishing I was straight. But I am still glad I came out. So glad.

Even after this train wreck of a post, I still thank you for reading! ",pansexual
Father in denial of me despite 6 years of dating both sexes,"
It somehow bugs me he thinks it's never serious with one gender, that we're just messing around when really my partners are just as special regardless of their sex. He only takes my relationships seriously if their with a certain gender.",pansexual
Opportunity for non-heterosexual women to take part in research (18+ living in U.K.),,pansexual
"Tyler, 18, is a Pansexual Trans Man in Erie, Pennsylvania",,pansexual
Take my survey on LGBT+ knowledge of masculine women's identities! Open to all LGBT+ people!,,pansexual
I came out to my parents,"I (25F) know my parents love me but based on their reactions I'm not sure how accepting of me they are. I first told them I was bi because I knew they would understand that but later told them I prefer pansexual. Obviously they didn't know what that meant. The first thing my mom said was ""How do you know?"" I looked at her and asked ""How do you know you're straight"" She didn't have a response for me. She processes things by asking a million questions and reading books so I expected all the questions. She asked ""When did you know?"" And I just said ""a long time ago."" I really didn't want to say ""well this one time when I was about 13 we went to a movie and all I could focus on where the bouncing titties."" I tried for years just telling myself ""I'm a lesbian"" then I would see penises and think ""no I have to be straight."" I didn't even know a middle ground existed. When it comes to his kids my dad is very, ""Do what makes you happy"" which made me feel good. I just told them not to be surprised if I bring home a woman someday. It was an interesting weekend and I'm expecting more questions soon.",pansexual
[survey] Share your experiences as a Bisexual or Pansexual Mom,"https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/bisexualresearch

Hello my name is Meghan Cromie, a  bisexual student at New College of Florida. I am conducting research on the experiences of pansexual and bisexual mothers and I am inviting you to help. Click the link below to be taken to a survey if you are over 18 years old and have given birth, or had a partner who has given birth. The survey should take approximately 15-20 minutes.

If you are friends with any other bisexual and pansexual moms, feel free to share this link with them.

Thank you for your time, and for helping conduct needed research!
",pansexual
I need advice. I'm coming out.,"Hey, so I’m going to give a basic rundown here, for better setup, and so that you can understand my situation better. I'm a guy. A paper white, skinny, tall, male. I’m 14. I’m in 7th grade (I started late and have a summer birthday). The school I’m going to is a catholic school. It’s not so bad. Very accepting. I am an atheist. This isn't what I'm coming out about, but it is kind of important for you to know so that you understand that I'm not at risk of being disowned or hated because of who I am. I'm an atheist and it's not a secret, my parents know it, my friends and peers know it, my teachers know it, hell even the principle knows it. None of them really care. They truly couldn't give a damn, it's just ""whatever"" to them. And this is just how accepting everyone is. My parents are liberal, and as such I knew that they wouldn't be upset. I had thought that my new religious school and classmates would be, but they didn't care, like I said. The teachers, while some of them disagree with it and have their own beliefs as to my judgment, I'm sure, are not persecuting to me about it and don't try to make me repent or feel bad. My friends, don't believe that I will be punished or anything like that. While they are religious, they aren't archaic about it, and most don't even believe in hell. Now, I'm also openly ""not straight"". I'm pansexual. I like everyone. But as far as my friends are concerned I'm just not straight or am just bi. I've asked out 2 girls before (failed both times), and don't try and hide my interest for any of the sexy guys the girls swoon over. I've only ever said that I didn't just like girls. I haven't really told them the label for it, but it doesn't matter. Everyone knows that I'm pansexual, no one really cares, I don't care, it's all great. Except for one issue. Well, more like two actually. My parents. They don't know. I've jsut never really felt up for telling them. I once hinted at it when saying that this would be the year of school in which I'd actually consider dating and going out with someone. I kept it purposefully vague as to the gender. I didn't say I was going to ask girls out or have a boyfriend. They both asked me about that and both said that they loved me and wouldn't mind. I said the same thing to both of them, that with all do respect, it wasn't necessarily their business. And they accepted it and that was it. This was of course before I'd come out about being pansexual to everyone, and still felt a bit timid about people knowing. Okay, I have to make a quick pause. I have a plan. I am coming out. And I'm doing it in a way that I'm proud of and think will work best for me. So I've been writing/drawing these pages with pictures/words on them. It's kind of supposed to be a 'parody' of a kids book, meaning that it kind of has that feel to it, where there's a large picture on every page illustrating the story. In this little book, is my coming out confession. It talks about alot of things. And in the end comes out about the three things I need to come out about. One is the pansexuality and to my parents. The other two I'll talk about after this little pause. I think that this way of coming out will work best for me because I'm a great writer. I talk best through written words than spoken. And this is a way that I can enjoy. Basically, my depression (yeah I have it, it sucks, but that's not what this is about) took away my passion for drawing years ago. And only recently am I getting it back. So the two things I love to do, writing and drawing, are helping me come out. I don't want this to be something I hate. I'm going to come out through words and color. Anyway that's all, quick pause over. The main thing that I'm coming out about, is something I've only told three people. I'm genderfluid. And it really sucks ass. Atleast if your trans, you can try and transition, and then it's all fixed. For me, whether or not I feel like a guy or girl, isn't some stagnant thing. It changes. And it fucking sucks so god damn much. If I could have one wish, that had to be focused solely on me... What I would give to be able to change sex when I feel like it... Anyway, sorry I just, it stinks. It really does. But like I said, only three people know. My bestfriend, I'd trust her with anything. Another friend who is transgender and kind of gets my plight. And then a new friend that I've made this year, I've told her a lot and we're really close. All three of these people that I've told, are all accepting of me. I'm not afraid to come out to my friends, well, I am, but not like a lot. My teachers, I really couldn't give a shit about what they think honestly. My parents, I know that they'd accept it, eventually. But, there's all this confusion going on. There's so many genders and sexualities and some are overly specific, some mean the exact same thing as others, some have multiple meanings that each claim is the right one. It's confusing. I get it. And there's the whole 'Transtrender' bull shit that comes with it. Suddenly everyone isn't just fit neatly into the whole binary area and everyone is different. A lot of people are a bit stigmatic towards all of this. My parents are. I think that if I said that I was genderfluid that they wouldn't take me seriously at first. I think that they would in the end. But perhaps the scariest thing, and the hardest for me to come out about. is wanting to transition. And this is kind of the thing I wanted to talk about. I came to the conclusion girls where better than guys along time ago. I can prove it through anatomy, history, society, a lot of things. While men are stronger then women on average, women can do things men can't. Women can give birth for one (just to be clear I know if I transitioned to a girl I wouldn't be able to give birth, nor would I want to, I can't stand pain and don't want to be a parent). I'll gloss over the fact of how women and orgasms work... And of course women do have to deal with periods, which, just... Respect, okay, respect. In history women have proven to be more accepting and generous. I could go on, but don't feel like it. I've always gotten along with girls slightly better than guys. And I find that if I fantasize about men (which is usually when my genderfluidism appears, sexually) I'm more often the girl with a guy than the guy with another guy. I've given it a lot of thought. And I want to be a girl. I'll be happier being constantly female than constantly male. And I know that at some point I'll begin to feel like a guy, because I'm genderfluid and it changes. But I think I'm okay with that. It's the sacrifice I'll make to be happy. I can't change when I want, so I'll change to what I want most. This is going to be the scariest to com out about. To everyone.
And that's it. That's everything. All I want is some advice. Some opinions on all of this. What I'm going through. What I'm going to do. And most importantly, advice about transitioning. I've tried researching it, but couldn't find anything that answered my questions exactly. I'm going to put a list of questions I have below. This is a really long thing to read. And if you read it all, thank you. Would you be even kinder, and maybe help me out? I don't really have anyone to ask these things or to talk about this stuff with. So, if you do respond and help me.. God, I, I can't say how much it will mean to me. But, if you do, than thank you. Thank you so much.
How does the voice work? I have a deep voice. I've been thinking on it, but this is the only conclusion: If one undergoes transitioning before puberty or during early puberty, their voice won't get deeper and they won't sound like a boy. If one goes through transitioning after puberty or during (to the point where it's to far to matter), than their voice will remain male sounding and they'll have to use a fake voice to sound like a girl. I don't think that's right, it's just what I've pieced together. I really don't want to have to pretend to sound like a girl. So how does it work?
How long will it take? I know that it varies upon age and body and a lot of other things as well. But how long might it take for me?
What will it all be like?",pansexual
So I called myself it once and it stuck.,"A Pansy.  Not as in the flower or anything but I was talking about my sexuality with someone and I had just said ""lezzie"" in the convo and it came out.

And now it stuck.  I am now a Pansy. So in my mind, we have our own unofficial flower and we are all pansies.

Alas. ",pansexual
[transgendered] Pronoun trouble?,"So, I strive to be a good ally. I don't have any trouble with using someone's preferred pronouns, generally, because virtually all the trans people I know transitioned before I knew them... However, I have one trans-feminine friend that I knew before her transition, and we haven't seen each other since... She recently contacted me online, and let me know she's still living in the same city with her wife (cis-woman, married prior to transition). My question is this: if we happen to meet up and start talking about 'old times' (pre-transition) I am worried I might inadvertently use a wrong pronoun... Is it generally frowned upon to use a pronoun matching the gender-expression that was current at the time of an event in the past? Maybe I'm over-thinking this; but, **having known her prior to her transition, makes it difficult for me to parse, and accurately describe experiences we had together, prior to her transition,** ***to third parties...*** Especially if some of them didn't know her then!

Edit: typos and highlighting of the actual question.",pansexual
People always say I'm pansexual? But?,I don't see how. I am attracted to transgender people and some people who identify as queer or bigender or agender have even been attracted to one intersex woman. But generally I am not attracted to faab people generally besides her. Even with her I don't think I could have sex I could make out etc but not much else why do people call me pan? Can you be pan and only like certain genders not all?,pansexual
Want to take part in a sexy 10 minute online study?,"Would you like to participate in our 10-minute study focused on validating a sexuality questionnaire?

This study has been approved by the University of Calgary Conjoint Faculties Research Ethics Board. This is a validation study of the revised sexuality questionnaire. The questionnaire measures affectional/sexual orientation as well as sexual identity, gender identity, and gender roles. This will include questions about sexual preferences and sexual behaviors toward both males and females in the present and while you were a teenager. You will also be asked to provide your age, biological sex, gender, gender role, year of study, sexual identity, ethnicity, and religious affiliation. You must be 18 years of age or older to participate. This entire study is online, and takes most people about 10 minutes to complete.

Please visit the following link to complete the study: https://ucalgarypsych.co1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_bCNP3z3sPlrTYmF

If you have any questions or concerns, feel free to contact: * Dr. Alderson, principal researcher, at alderson@ucalgary.ca * Or the Conjoint Faculties Research Ethics Board at the University of Calgary, at cfreb@ucalgary.ca If you are curious about the results or any aspects of the study, whether or not you took part in it, please feel free to contact Dr. Alderson at alderson@ucalgary.ca
Thanks!!",pansexual
Cool “Hearts Not Parts” shirt,,pansexual
What am I?,"I'm confused on my sexuality. I'm pretty sure I'm pansexual but whenever I ask someone what that is or what that means they give me stupid answers like 'they'll date mailboxes and animals' which I know isn't true. 
I think being pansexual means you don't care about gender at all, while being bi means you only like boys or girls. I just want other people's options on what being pansexual is and what being bi is. 
In high school I only dated boys but I was always attracted to girls but never acted on it. 
After graduating I started dating a girl and everyone freaked out, 'omg now you're a lesbian?' 'Or you have to be a lesbian bc bi people are sluts' 
Once we got serious I started telling everyone I was just a lesbian bc they made being bi seem like a bad thing and it was easier just to shut everyone up that way.
About a year later we break up. 
I start having feels for another guy but don't act on it bc everyone is telling me I should be a lesbian.
Guy moves it's over. 
Few month later start dating another girl who I really like and am still dating, BUT 7 months into our relationship they tell me they're trans (FTM). 
At first I was unsure if I wanted to continue in the relationship but then I realized screw it who gives a FUCK I love this person. 
So now I have a wonderful boyfriend who's amazing, BUT he feels weird sometimes bc he thinks I'm a lesbian. 
I don't know if I should even bring up that I was never actually just a lesbian or not. 
I'm not sure if him and I will get married so I'm also confused on who I would date if we ever broke up. 
Just looking for advice. 

I KNOW I SHOULDNT LET OTHERS DEFY ME AND BLAH BLAH BLAH BUT IM WEAK IDK 
",pansexual
Found an etsy shop that supports bi/pan artists!,"Found a cool shop that sells bracelets and other crafts made by bi/pan people to support their community! Plus it has a super cool name.

[A Shop Bi Any Other Name](https://www.etsy.com/shop/AShopBiAnyOtherName)",pansexual
Pansexuality IS Real [Rant],"So, recently coming out as Pansexual to my family and friends (I'm 16 so school :D) has sparked some controversy. My friends are all super nice and accept who I am. Which is lovely and much better than most people coming out, I honestly have a lot to be thankful for. But one of my closest pals will not accept I am Pan, he tells me I cannot be as it does not exist; I have to be Bi. He says to him that orientation is only based on sex and not gender whatsoever. It has really frustrated me (especially the transphobia he continued with). Also when I came out to my mum she said ""So is that just a glorified Bisexual?"" I laughed and explained but she was excited to learn. We are real and I hate being put down like I am some psycho. Why do they think they can define me when they are not me.

I was wondering how many others of us experience this, is it common? I struggle to express myself outside of my head so does anyone have any advice on how to explain it better to heterosexuals? Thanks guys, love you &lt;3",pansexual
Subtle pride,,pansexual
"Jesse, 28, Talks About Pansexual Identity in Northwestern Pennsylvania",,pansexual
[SURVEY] Sexual Minority Women &amp; LGBTQ+ Community,"My name is Shelby and I’m a Psychology and Gender Studies undergraduate student. I’m conducting a brief survey on sexual minority women, gender presentation, and the LGBTQ community for my thesis research and would love your participation. I am looking for sexual minority women above the age of 18. Your participation should take about 10 minutes and will enable you to provide your voice in research that directly impacts your community. 

Here is the link to the survey: 
https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/D2FSQY5

If you have any questions, contact me at shelby.statham13@ncf.edu. 

Thank you!
Shelby",pansexual
Maintaining queer / pan identity in a hetero relationship,"Hey folks, 

New to reddit! 

I wondered if folks had any advice / thoughts on maintaining identity while in a long-term relationship with a man (I am a femme). This only really cropped up when my partner moved to my city and we began working in similar circles so I became his partner to his coworkers and he became my partner in my office; people began assuming and acting on the idea that I am straight (I had always used gender neutral terms when telling stories before). I don't want to out myself, especially in my professional role, all the time but the assumption of monosexuality is really grinding my gears. 

Advice? ",pansexual
I don't really care about my label.,"The more ive grown over the years from a budding bisexual to the pan I am today, I realize how much i couldnt give less of a fuck if people saw me as a pan, or if they even didnt understand or antything i dont think i could care.

I suppose it may have something to do with the first same sex relationship i forced myself into to ""prove"" i was bi, and subsequently got sexually abused.

I think why im trying to say this is just, dont let your sexuality or romantic interests make you do anything just to prove it to yourself or to others. ESPECIALLY if you are younger. Even the lgbt+ space isnt the safest. 

If you care enough, fight for what you believe, but if you have different things to worry about, dont try and make your sexuality a super 100% important thing to be loved and cherished, just let it be an extra thing on your ""about me"".

edit: im on phone sorry about spelling.",pansexual
Kyle discusses other people assuming he's a gay man rather than bi or pan,,pansexual
Wow,I told my friend she couldn't read my Reddit so When I was sleeping she went on my Reddit and read everything. Yay.,pansexual
"Attracted to ""hearts"" or to people regardless of their gender?","Hi, I'm a bit confused. I've seen people saying that pansexuality is attraction to the personality of people, not to their body. However, I thought that attraction to personality was romantic orientation and not sexual orientation. Am I confusing things or I just read wrong descriptions?",pansexual
Hubby added to my Pandora collection for Xmas! Love that man!,,pansexual
Hi I've experienced a recent life change and would like to become a moderator for this subreddit.,"Please upvote me, and answer one question, what is the help you most need from the people in your life, and if you asked them, would they give it to you?",pansexual
"hi, new person here...","Hey guys, im new here and a recently out of the closet pansexual. Im looking for friends?",pansexual
I except myself,"So I've known that I'm pansexual for like a year or so and I've come to terms with that but I feel as if I'm to young to come out. When I'm talking to my friends and we've come to the topic of sexuality I wanna tell them I think I'm pansexual (even though I'm certain I am) I can't get the words out of my mouth. I've told one friend and she said I shouldn't feel the need to label myself but I've been labeled all through out school so I kinda feel the need to label myself which I definitely should not feel the need to do that. But maybe In a year or two I will feel more comfortable to come out to my friends.
       Sincerely Ty",pansexual
Very recently Reddit made me realize I'm Pan not Bi,"Hey everyone,

So I have identified as a female bisexual for over a decade and it has been a huge part of me for that time. Recently, there was a questionnaire posted on a few subreddits regarding sexuality and gender orientation which prompted a pretty in-depth discussion between my partner (lesbian) and I regarding our sexuality ""limits"", I guess you could say. 

In the beginning of our relationship we just told each other our sexual orientations and that was that, there was never a further conversation. It was just that we both knew we could work out together. 

Fast forward to a few weeks ago and we were having this very intense discussion on our own sexuality and gender orientation sparked by such questionnaire. I'm kind of surprised we never thought to discuss it earlier. Her orientation was basically exactly where I thought it would be as a lesbian, but as she started to ask me more questions I realized that I really didn't care about the gender binary at all when it came to sex as an act or within a romantic relationship. We found out together that I am not Bisexual but in fact I am Pansexual. When we both realized this new truth I had this feeling of 'wow, how did I not ask myself these questions before? And will she think any differently of me because of it?' In the same exciting moment I learned something new about myself I also felt incredibly vulnerable and scared that my partner would not be ok with this turn of events. It was terrifying. But, as soon as she saw those gears in my head moving that way she immediately spoke up and told me that this changes absolutely nothing between us and then kissed me :)

To be honest I don't really know why I'm posting this story. Nothing has changed in my life, I'm still with my wonderful partner. I still go to my job, practice with my sports team, eat the same food. Though, somehow I feel different. It's kind of crazy to think about how a simple definition or term can make you feel that way. Maybe because Reddit helped me find that truer part of myself I guess I wanted to share this story with you all. 

As a side note (more like side question), for those once identifying as Bisexual and now identifying as Pansexual, are there any words of wisdom you wish you had known at this stage? The very last thing I want to be is disrespectful to anyone. Before this I thought I had a pretty good handle on different sexualities and gender orientations but I guess I was just so cemented in my previous identity of bi that I never felt the need to do a self check up as my knowledge grew.





tl;dr A Reddit questionnaire made me realize I'm Pansexual and not Bisexual, partner approves and is supportive, rambles...",pansexual
When I discovered myself.,"I used to have multiple crushes on boys and girls when I was younger so I thought it was normal. Then I found out about bisexuality and thought, this is it, this is what I am.

But as I grew older, I found myself liking people who are beyond just a male or female. I found myself liking people because of who they are as a person and not because of what was in their pants. That was just a bonus.

I continued to label myself as Bi, but it confused me to high heavens. Soon enough I looked deeper into it and found a whole new world of orientations. When I found Pansexuality I nearly cried because I had never felt so relieved of not being alone about this. I used to think I was selfish or just easy for liking more than 2 genders but now I know better.

I have found out more about what makes me who I am and I have never been more happy to be myself.",pansexual
"Howdy, I am a new redditor, I dump Tumblr for this site😂. Anyway I am Sonatina Haze (follow all my social media by just typing my name in and I will appear). I am pansexual and pangender, 17 and single. An artist and a historian here🤓",,pansexual
Study on bisexual/pansexual women's discrimination and resilience,"Hello, My name is Raquel Craney, and I’m a counseling psychology doctoral student at the University of Missouri-Kansas City, conducting research regarding bisexual women’s discrimination and resilience. In order to participate, you must a) identify as a bisexual woman (and/or pansexual, omnisexual, demisexual, non-binary sexual identity), b) be 18 years of age or older, and c) live in the United States.
If you are interested in participating, you will be asked to complete an anonymous online survey that will take approximately 20 minutes, one time only. If you are interested in participating, please click on the following link:
https://umkc.co1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_6hTOQW6ZLOVkXnn
Or, if you would like further information, please feel free to message me.
For your participation, you may choose to enter a raffle to win one of six $25.00 Amazon.com gift cards.
This study, protocol number 16-521, has been approved by University of Missouri, Kansas City’s Institutional Review Board. If you have any concerns about your rights as a participant your concerns please call 816-235-5927.
Thank you for your consideration!
",pansexual
I've had a lot of confusion and anxiety about my sexuality lately and I was wondering if people here could help me out.,"Hello dear people of /r/pansexual!

I guess I'll start off by giving a little information about myself before I go into my story: I'm a 23-year-old male, I've never been in any kind of relationship and I'm still a virgin. I've never had any interest in ""dating"" or casual affairs; if I'm going to pursue someone, I'm expecting a committed relationship. The fact that I have yet to be in a relationship can be attributed to pickiness and bad luck. I've only been truly infatuated with a handful of people and it's just never worked out for various reasons, such as them being unavailable, them being in a place in their lives where it just wasn't possible or they just simply didn't feel the same way. I guess what I'm trying to say is that I have no experience in romantic relationships, but not because of a lack of trying or want. I've previously considered myself to be straight; I've only ever had romantic feelings towards females, I find femininity incredibly attractive and I've never had any true attraction to masculinity. I feel that these three points still stand, but in recent years I've had some changes in my sexual behaviour.

A couple of years ago I accidentally came across a solo ""shemale"" video (I understand that some people consider this a derogatory term so I feel I have to explain myself: I mean absolutely no offense to anyone. I'm referring to a trans woman who hasn't had sex reassignment surgery, I'm not sure what term to use in this context, so if there is a better term, feel free to tell me.) and I was disturbed at how much it fascinated me. At first I tried to repress everything it made me feel, but ultimately my curiosity got too strong and I started to seek out similar videos for erotic purposes. After that I eventually found myself receiving erotic feelings from things such as gender bending, phallic imagery, homoeroticism and even from more questionable things like shotacon (realizing that I was getting some form of arousal from something like that really really disturbed me). At the time I just dismissed all these things as ""just a phase"", that I was just exploring my sexuality, and in any case it was just a small fraction of what I found arousing so it was easy for me not to think about it in my day to day life. I still maintained that I was straight, because for the most part I was, but every once in a while my brain would wander in to alien territory. It felt like a dirty little secret, something that I was ashamed of and could never ever tell anyone about. 

Aside the occasional bouts of shame and masturbatory guilt, I was doing completely fine not dealing with my feelings in any profound way, but lately things have changed. These past couple of months I've started to develop very strong romantic feelings (stronger than I've ever felt towards anyone else) towards a woman who is a good friend of mine and this past week my brain started wandering again for the first time since this infatuation began. I started feeling overwhelming shame and anxiety, and I felt completely despicable and unlovable, especially since I've had a couple of involuntary sexual thoughts about her with phallic appendages. I couldn't eat or sleep and I felt constantly nauseated because I was so terrified and disgusted. At this point I decided that I seriously need to start dealing with my feelings, ignoring them didn't seem to make them go away. My parents were the first people I told, and I've talked with my mom about this many times now. She's been absolutely fantastic about everything (her telling me that she's felt similar things has been especially comforting), and she's the one who brought up pansexuality, which is why I'm here now.

Recently I've been trying to embrace my own feelings (as in not trying to hide or deny anything) and then analyze and discuss them. I started researching pansexuality and I'm constantly growing more fond of the idea. I've never been too fond of any labels, but for some reason this one gives me comfort; it makes my feelings feel more natural and less perverted. But the thing is I'm not entirely sure I am pansexual since I have no romantic inclinations towards males. Is it possible to be pansexual but heteroromantic or something like that? Right now I feel that my situation is that I can have sexual attraction towards people regardless of their sex or gender indentity, but I only feel romantic attraction towards females (although I don't deny the possibility that I would some day fall in love with man).

Conclusion: Even though I've been dealing with my feelings a lot, and I truly feel like I'm more understanding and accepting of myself, I still have pretty strong feelings of anxiety, fear and shame. I've been living one day at a time, but I truly feel lost right now. One of the things that I'm most scared of is; right now there is nothing I want more than to be in a stable loving relationship with the person I love most of all in the world, but what if when I get there it won't be enough to satisfy me and I start getting desires the other person is not okay with. What these desires would be and why I don't know, but the idea terrifies me anyway.

I'm not entirely sure what I'm looking for here, but I do have a desire to share and converse with people who might understand, so if you have any insight, advice, and/or just words of encouragement or support, I would greatly appreciate that!

With Love
-J",pansexual
Coming Out As Pansexual,A while back I came out to my mum about being bisexual and she assumed it was a phase. But recently I spoke to her and told her I wasn't bisexual but pansexual. Our relationship has plummeted into a downwards spiral and she still doesn't accept me for who I am. Hopefully it gets better...,pansexual
My sis made me a pan pride bracelet!,,pansexual
I'm cross-orientated: pansexual and biromantic. Does anyone else here find that their romantic and sexual orientations don't match up?,"Hi! This is my first post on this subreddit. :-) I have openly thought of myself as bisexual, and identified myself as bisexual to others, for about six years now. I've always believed that love is love, regardless of how anyone identifies or presents themselves! However, when I heard of the term ""pansexual"" a couple of years ago, it immediately appealed to me.

My understanding of the term ""pansexual"" is that it describes an ability to be sexually attracted to people who occupy any place on the gender spectrum, without restriction. This is exactly how I experience my sexual attractions. I've found that a person's gender identity, genitals, and the way they present themselves has never mattered to me when it comes to deciding whether I want to sleep with them or not. The only important thing is whether I feel safe and comfortable enough to be intimate with them. Of course, I understand that many bisexual people would describe the term ""bisexual"" in exactly the same way – I'm just saying that this is my own personal feeling on what ""pansexual"" means. I feel that a bisexual person may (or may not) have certain gender-based restrictions on who they're capable of being sexually attracted to (which is a perfectly legitimate way for someone to experience their sexual attractions – if somebody knows what's right for them, that's all good!) while a pansexual person would have no restrictions on who they're capable of being sexually attracted to.

However, I never felt able to claim ""pansexual"" as my identity before now, because it doesn't accurately describe my romantic attractions. I've found that when it comes to choosing a romantic partner, I only feel completely comfortable and happy when that partner is a woman or a non-binary person. In the past, whenever I have dated men, I've found it easy to be physically attracted to them and appreciate who they are as people, but I've never been able to develop serious romantic feelings for them, and I have rarely been able to feel completely at ease engaging in ""couple-y"" behaviours like holding hands on the street or cuddling.

I've known for a couple of years now that I shouldn't pursue serious romantic relationships with guys anymore, because in the past, romantic attraction just didn't happen for me, the guys got upset over this, I ended up feeling like a terrible person, and things usually didn't end well. That pattern came up time and time again. :-/

This has puzzled me a bit over the past few years, but I recently read an article on cross-orientation – where somebody's sexual and romantic orientations don't match up – and realised that this absolutely applies to me. After giving it some thought, I can now confidently say that I am pansexual and biromantic, because there are no gender restrictions on who I can be sexually attracted to ... but when it comes to forming a serious relationship with someone, I need that person to be another woman or a non-binary person.

I used to feel guilty whenever I thought of guys I dated in the past who became upset when my lack of romantic attraction to them became clear. However, I feel so much better now that I understand why I couldn't develop romantic feelings for them, despite finding them physically attractive. I know many people say that ""labels shouldn't matter,"" but for me, having the correct terminology to describe the different attractions that I experience has made a significant difference to my peace of mind. :-) I am in a very happy monogamous relationship with my girlfriend right now, and I hope that it continues for a long time ... but if I ever find myself in a situation in future where I am sexually attracted to a guy, but know that I don't want to be romantically involved with him, I will never again chastise myself for it or think that I'm some kind of terrible person. I'm pansexual, but biromantic. My sexual and romantic orientations are different, and that's perfectly okay. :-D

I am interested in discovering whether other people have experienced similar situations!",pansexual
Bi and Pan Facts,"Hi my lovelies!

I wrote this status first on facebook, and then on tumblr, and was just overwhelmed with the responses of folks having never had this information before and their appreciation for it. So I figured I'd post it here, too, because Knowledge Is Fun For All :)

Bi Visibility Day Fun Fact:

“bi” doesn’t mean “girls and boys.” bi means “same and different genders to yourself.” that means bi folks are plenty attracted to the whole marvelous spectrum of gender.

(then what’s the difference between bi- and pansexual?)

in a lot of cases, semantics! generally, the difference between bi and pan folks is *how* we experience attraction - bi people tend to find different things in different genders attractive, whereas pan folks tend to find the same stuff attractive in all genders. a lot of folks ID as bi simply because it’s the more well known term :)

~and now you know~",pansexual
"Just thought I'd put this here, I made it in a rush after a test, so sorry for the shitty coloring",,pansexual
Explaining my sexuality,"I've been very open to anyone curious on my sexuality in the past. However, I explained to a friend of mine and she looked at me like it was completely outlandish. She then proceeded to ask if I liked her and when I denied it she said I couldn't be pan. After I went into more detail on pansexuality, she didn't change this behaviour. She'll point at random people and ask if I fancy them. This incident has lower my confidence in my sexuality and now I'm not sure how to tell people. It's a fear of sorts I've obtained and I really hope I can get past it. Does anyone have any advice? ",pansexual
My daughter just came out as pan to me,"She's 13 and I'm so proud of her. But more importantly, we need to celebrate. So we are having a party next weekend for her and her friends. She loves puns so pancakes are a must. What else should be on the  menu? ",pansexual
Tried explaining the difference between pan and bi. Apparently that makes me arrogant,"Well, yesterday I just thought I'd point out it was pansexual pride day on a forum on which I'm a manager. I expected ""What's that?"" and so was ready to explain. And in the back of my mind, I figured there'd be some who wouldn't get it and would just be like ""Ok, you're bisexual, whatever""

But I didn't expect people to start saying that I'm ""priggish"", ""sanctimonious"", or insulting them in any way. The hell is it I'm doing wrong here?

Quite honestly didn't think I'd be feeling a bit insulted myself, even if I should expect the ""your orientation isn't a real thing"" crap",pansexual
"Why not just ""bi""?","Not trying to be offensive. Generally wondering, just ignorant to this subject. 

If it's ""attracted to anyone no matter what 'gender'"" isn't that just bisexual? 

Help me to understand. Please. ",pansexual
My School Peers Decide I'm Gay...I'm pansexual,"I'm your classic pansexual teenager in high school, I'm 14 and I'm trying to not throw a brick at my closed minded peers. I am new to this school, this is a new school for me due to me moving schools because I didn't fit in well and my hair cut wasn't appropriate (half of my head is shaved). 
    These are my old classmates from elementary school but a lot of new faces have come in here, these are fairly normal people. You have your jocks, rednecks, wannabes, outcasts, etc. In the beginning of the year I was seen as ""Oh look! She's gay because she hangs out with dudes and she's affectionate to a chick, let's pick on her and piss her off!"" That went on for a month or two before I confronted them in the hallway during seventh period.

   ""...um..I'm pansexual"" they then exchanged glances at each other before replying ""so..you like boys and girls yet you hang with that chick all the time, you sure you aren't a lesbian?"" 
     I'm not trying to sound overreacting but I think I know my own sexuality. Am i an overreacting teenager or are they just being as normal as they can get? How can I fix this? I don't have many friends and I'm tempted to send the dark lord of smeagle to their houses...what do?",pansexual
"As an 18 year professional pansexual closted to their parents but out to everyone at school, what are some awesome things I can do for Pride Day?",,pansexual
Oh hey!,Howdy howdy!! I was actually bi for a very long time but like a lot of us the label of bi seemed too restrictive and realized I was Pan about 2 years ago. And now here I am :). ,pansexual
"Hi, I'm new here!","so, hi everybody! I recently realised that I am Pansexual. For some years now I identified as bisexual but now I've come to realise that I feel, in a way, restriced by that. I feel like I could love and have sexual relationships with anyone, regardless of gender. So yeah, I'm Pan!",pansexual
"Happy Trans Day of Remembrance! Heart goes out to those of you who are, know, or have lost anyone in the trans community.",,pansexual
"Think I might be pan, but have never had experiences and don't want to be wrong, also, fit one definition of pan but not the other.","I'm socially awkward and a 17-year old girl who has never had a boy/girlfriend or even kissed a boy/girl or had mutual interest, to my knowledge. I have liked girls since I was 11, but in a very limited amount, then really started to like boys beginning in late Sophomore year.

I am substantially aroused exclusively by female arousal and dream exclusively about sex with women. For a long time, I liked boys far more often and with considerable intensity. While aware that I was not completely straight, I felt comfortable with the label and identity.

I still don't know. Sometimes boys just electrify my skin, and more rarely do I like girls, a few times every month, but I have incredible attraction when I do. Thing is, usually this dissipates toward the girl after a day and comes back again at odd times spanning years.

Today I was watching TV and suddenly the hotness and attraction to girls in my dreams went ""pow"" at me with regards to a female character. I suddenly felt attraction to many girls, and wanted to date girls in college, which I had been considering for a long time.

When I was very depressed, there was a woman online who I developed intense sexual and romantic feelings for due to the comfort she gave me, but I did not see her physically until late in our relationship, (she's not a predator.)

For a long time since I was a teenager, I didn't feel like ""bi"" was the right label, and I became curious about nonbinary genders. Some nonbinary people online I found attractive, but honestly, I don't know if I'm forcing it.

I feel that I am open to all gender identities, but I do not think an open mind constitutes a sexual identity. In addition, I seem to like girls rarely and intensely, boys frequently and moderately, girls in a more sexual way, boys in a more romantic way, (though there is an overlap), more feminine nonbinaries, and hardly ever masculine nonbinaries though some... I may very well like all genders, but I would hardly say I am ""gender blind"".

If I do like all genders, is there a way to convey that without the ""gender-blind"" definition? When do I decide I am queer? I have a preference for men, so will this affect me at all? Tbh, my attractions to women and nonbinaries feel more like recurring yet transient experiences than traits, though this may be societal conditioning.",pansexual
Bi People Have Issues,,pansexual
Research Study on Multi-partnered/Consensually Non-Monogamous Relationships,"Hi r/pansexual!

My name is Jessica and I am a PhD Candidate at the University of Guelph. My research is primarily about motivation, satisfaction and intimate relationships, particularly among multi-partnered relationships (e.g., open, poly, swinging).
We are currently conducting a study entitled: Daily study of motivations and experiences in multi-partnered relationships. We are doing this in order to gain a better understanding of relationships more broadly as much of the psychological literature on romantic relationships has focused on monogamous interactions. We are also interested in learning more about people’s daily experiences in their romantic relationships. We want to learn more about the reasons people/couples engage in sexual activity within the context of romantic partnerships, how people experience satisfaction/conflict/ within their relationship and how they communicate with their partners. This research has received ethics clearance from the University of Guelph Research Ethics Board (REB #16OC017).

For this particular study, we are hoping to recruit participants from Canada and the United States, who identify as having a primary partner and at least one additional partner. We are also hoping that both the individual and their primary partner will be able to participate in the study. We recognize and understand that many people do not adhere to a hierarchical structure or use hierarchical language in their relationships. This particular study aims to understand more about relationships where there is a primary relationship structure/language and we hope to conduct more research on non-hierarchical relationships in the future.

If you are interested in the study, please read below for some more info about it and send us an email!

Thank you, 

Jessica


**STUDY INFO:**

Daily study of motivations and experiences in multi-partnered relationships.  

Do you identify as having a primary partner, and do you live with your primary partner?  
Would your primary partner also be interested in participating?
Do you have at least one additional partner?  
Do you see any of your additional partner(s) at least once per month?
Have you had sex with any of your partners within the last month?
Are you over the age of 18?

If so we would like to invite you to participate in our study examining partners’ daily sexual motivations. If you participate, you and your primary partner will be asked to complete an initial, 45 min survey about your relationship, your wellbeing and your sexual motivations. You and your partner will also be asked to complete a short 10 minute daily survey every day for three weeks and finish a follow up survey immediately after the three weeks are complete (approximately 35 minutes). We will also ask you to complete two short 10-minute surveys 3 months and 6 months later. To thank you for your time, couples will receive up to $144 (up to $72 per person) in amazon gift cards to participate. Canadian participants will receive gift cards from amazon.ca and participants from the U.S. will receive gift cards from amazon.com. 

All genders and sexual orientations welcome. 

If you are interested in taking part in the research, please email the address below 

**relresea@uoguelph.ca **

If you would like additional information about the study please contact Robin Milhausen, Associate Professor at rmilhaus@uoguelph.ca or Jessica Wood, PhD Candidate, at jwood03@uoguelph.ca. This study has been reviewed and received ethics clearance through the University of Guelph Research Ethics Board (REB#: 16OC017).
",pansexual
Heterosexist Experiences - study,"Hey everyone,  I posted here back in July (with mods approval). We're looking for more people to participate, so I'm posting again. If you have had experiences of heterosexism/homophobia that still upset you, and you are in the U.S., consider reading the official info below and participating! Thanks! - B
~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
&amp;nbsp;  
We are writing from a LGBTQ-affirmative research group at the [University of Massachusetts Boston — the LGBTQ UMass Boston Advocacy and Research Collaborative] (https://www.facebook.com/UMassBostonLgbtqResearchTeam) .  We have developed brief exercises to help LGBTQ people deal with experiences of heterosexism.  Heterosexism is prejudice or discrimination based on the idea that heterosexuality is the only acceptable sexuality. It is similar to homophobia. 
&amp;nbsp;  
We are hoping you would be willing to help us by sharing this information, and in turn contribute to the mental health of LGBTQ people who experience heterosexist experiences.  If participants finish the questionnaires and exercises at the times below, they will receive an $80 Amazon gift card, and if they participate at all they will be eligible for a raffle for a $100 gift card.  
&amp;nbsp;  
In total, the entire study should take three hours to complete across five days (about 20-30 minutes on four of the days and 45-50 minutes on one day).  
&amp;nbsp;  
            The study involves completing:  
&amp;nbsp;  

*A questionnaire on the first day  
*A writing exercise on each of the following three days  
*A follow-up questionnaire two months later.   
&amp;nbsp;  
The link to the survey is:   [http://www.surveygizmo.com/s3/2582177/Initial-Page]( http://www.surveygizmo.com/s3/2582177/Initial-Page)  
&amp;nbsp;  
Please share this with people who have had heterosexist experiences who may be interested. We can also send a flyer you can share or distribute at meetings. 
&amp;nbsp;  
mlIf you have any questions, please let us know by writing to us at UMBstudyschedule@gmail.com . This study has been approved by the University of Massachusetts Boston Institutional Review Board. If you have questions about your rights as participants, please contact the University of Massachusetts Boston IRB at orsp@umb.edu or 617-287-5370.  
&amp;nbsp;  
We really appreciate your support to better LGBTQ lives.  
&amp;nbsp;  
Sincerely,  
&amp;nbsp;  
Heidi Levitt, PhD &amp; the Heterosexist Experiences Study Team  
University of Massachusetts Boston  ",pansexual
Alright. Am I the only one who now really wants to come out to show people I don't care what they say?,"Or am I just trying to show off? I've always wanted to speak to someone who knows, while at the same time doesn’t support that I'm pan. I wanna hear what they say, and would just really like to make them realize I don't give a shit what they say. Anyone?

Downvotes welcome!",pansexual
Hello!,"Hello pansexuals! I recently just discovered my pansexuality. Which took me as a real shock at first, but being an old soul and comfortable with myself I'm embracing it for what it is. I hope each and every one of you know that someone  out there loves you regardless of your preferences (or absence of preferences!)  stay positive and keep on loving your fellow humans!",pansexual
One of the happiest days of my life,"After a long time of questioning and self-doubt, I've finally decided to come out as pansexual today. I am so happy with my decision, and I can easily say that today is one of the best and happiest days of my life. I am so grateful to everyone who supported me and stood by me during all the times when I was unsure of myself and when nothing seemed to make sense to me. To anyone who may want to judge or criticise me for my decision: save your breath, because you've never walked in my shoes and you don't know the reasons that led up to my decision. I am proud of who I am and what I am and I won't change my mind for anybody! 
",pansexual
Hello! (First post to this sub),"I'm 24, male, and recently (less than a year now) identified as pansexual. I'm a graphic/web designer in Tennessee and would love to meet new friends! Feel free to chat me up.",pansexual
Recently come out as trans. Looking to meet new people &lt;3,"Hello, i have recently come out as transgender (mtf). I do not dress, and have not yet begun transitioning. But I am looking to chat with fellow pansexuals on Kik messenger. My kik is RPKev! Feel free to add me. Please let me know you're from Reddit.",pansexual
How has pansexuality (and any related ideals) affected your gender identity and expression?,,pansexual
Thanks again for your participation!,"Some participants wanted to access the results of my PhD survey they kindly participated in last year. The first publication related to this survey is available online - Beyond heterosexual, bisexual and homosexual: A diversity in sexual identity expression. https://www.researchgate.net/profile/Michael_Walton3",pansexual
Bisexuality vs Pansexuality,"So I identify as bisexual, but could honestly see myself with anyone, all I care about is who the person is personality-wise.  When I mention my bisexuality to some of my friends who are pan, they act weird about it. I feel like the definition of bisexuality has changed since it first came about and that pansexuality could kind of be seen as kind of a 'subcategory' of bisexuality. Is it weird of me to identify as bi even if by definition I’m pansexual?",pansexual
Addicted to sex? Persons over 18 years who perceive they may be addicted to sex are sought for a PhD survey that investigates hypersexual behaviour.,,pansexual
Am I pansexual?,"So recently I have been thinking about the people I have dated and been attracted to, properly attracted to. 

My current boyfriend and my last, heck even my girlfriend before that, I like/liked them all because of the person they are. My current boyfriend is just amazingly smart and kindhearted, and a little bit dopey. I fell in love with his personality over the course of a few years. I do love his eyes, smile etc but I think I noticed those things after I had already fallen in love with him. 

I have had a few crushes as well, but only for certain people. People that I have seen be really passionate about something. People that have an insane drive for something, I really like that. Apart from that, I didn't really care what they looked like, if that makes sense? Once I am hooked on someone I will notice the little things about them.  Sure I can think someone is attractive but that's not how I fall in love. 

I'm just a little confused, is this my sexuality or is this just normal for most people?",pansexual
"I did NOT come out today. And I'm happy! That's all, thanks for reading!",,pansexual
"Had my dad look over my college application, it went well.",,pansexual
Wishing I had someone to talk to on coming out day.,I'm basically still half way in the closet and it's weird. I'd like to know other people's experiences. ,pansexual
Sorting out preferences?,"""Hearts not Parts"" is a common slogan among us pans...but I don't think I'd be honest with myself if I said that I don't have some preferences. How do you sort out physical/non-physical preferences? Do you find yourself looking for the same features across genders?",pansexual
Coming out as Trans MTF 22,"I really want to come out as Transgender but as of right now, I have no support in my life. It would mean the world to me to meet some lovely people on here. I'm sure there are many of you. &lt;3 I am also pansexual",pansexual
Coming to terms,"Hello, friends. I am coming to terms with being transgender (mtf) at 22 years old. I'd really appreciate some positive support and, of course, to be treated like the girl I truly am :) I'll speak with anyone, I'm also pansexual. Hmu!",pansexual
trying to build a dating site,"so i couldn't find a decent free dating site that did polyamory and/or pansexuality correctly so i started making one. can i get some advice and artwork and stuff? here's an invite link so you can see whats already up. (also i can't change the two gender selection thing. i think it has to do with the host so sorry about that in advance.)

http://more-than-expected.yooco.org/invite/jHmrwJZrZZWYlpo%3D",pansexual
Research Survey,"We are LGBTQ-affirming researchers (faculty and graduate students in Counseling Psychology) at the University of Florida and Teachers College, Columbia conducting a study focused on the experiences of stigma and oppression of lesbian, gay, bisexual, and queer people in the United States. Participation will involve completing a 30 minute online survey. Every 25th person to complete the survey will receive a $20 Amazon.com gift card. These awards will be given and all e-mail addresses discarded prior to accessing any survey data. LGBQ people of any gender identity are encouraged to participate. In order to participate you must: • Identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, queer, questioning, or some other nonexclusively heterosexual identity • Reside in the United States and be currently employed • Be 18 years of age or older

If you would like to participate, please follow this link: https://ufl.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_81aLq9SPHgdeQct

Thank you VERY much in advance for your time and effort. Please feel free to pass on this link to other people who might be eligible to participate.

If you have any question about this study, please feel free to contact the Principal Investigators, Richard Douglass, B.S. (rdouglass@ufl.edu) and Sarah Conlin, B.S. (sconlin@ufl.edu. This research has been approved by the Institutional Review Board (IRB) at the University of Florida.",pansexual
Got this from a Bi Visibility meeting in my town (x-post from r/bisexual),,pansexual
"Bit of a weird post here. Want to go to Pride, but have a marching band competition. (See description).","Alright! So, in my area (Northern Virginia), there is a pride parade on October 1st. Problem is, my school is hosting an all day marching band competition the same day.

Is there anything we can do, maybe at school, or are we just out of luck until next year? Which sucks, because I'm a senior.

Thanks for being pantastic Redditors.",pansexual
Do Pansexuals celebrate bisexuality day?,"I read this thing that it includes the ""Bi+ umbrella"". Do you guys celebrate it?",pansexual
An interview with a Pansexual Pro Wrestler called Jack Sexsmith,,pansexual
"(Survey) Sexual Identity, Happiness, and Social Support","Survey: http://kwiksurveys.com/s/7fv9pIJ9

Hello! My name is Aaliyah Gray. I am an undergraduate psychology major, gender studies and sociology minor, looking to expand current psychological research on sexuality as my senior project. My research is IRB-approved, and intends to better represent the experiences of various sexual identities using a non-binary framework; therefore, I am asking people of multiple sexualities to participate in my study about life satisfaction, mental health, and online community use. The survey will take 10–15 minutes. At any point, you can decide to not answer a question or discontinue participation in the survey. Those who participate will have the chance to win one of two $25 Amazon gift cards. More information is provided on the survey’s consent page. This survey will be posted in several subreddits, so please only take it once. 


To participate, you must be:
18 or older
Currently living in the U.S.
And, identify as asexual, demisexual, polysexual, pansexual, bisexual, gay, lesbian, or heterosexual. 

Contact agray@stetson.edu for more information. 
",pansexual
New explanation of pansexual I just heard,"I just met a girl who identifies pan. When some of my friends asked what that meant exactly, she said:

Bi people can see people in the street and think ""that's a cute guy/girl"". Pan people see people in the street and think ""that's a cute person"". 

What do you guys think about that description? I usually see the difference between bi and pan as that pan people are also attracted to non-binary people, but I also kinda like how she stated it.",pansexual
My struggle with the feeling of pan-erasure,"This is a topic I've had many an argument over and very much feel that my views and feelings on the topic are ignored and it's around the idea that pansexuality is a subset of bisexuality. I'm going to start by saying that each individual can identify however they like, this isn't about policing labels or telling people how to identify. It's more about understanding that talking about pansexuality as a subset of bisexuality means we then don't matter.

If pansexuality is a subset of bisexuality it will never matter and will never gain recognition. If we talk about pansexuality as it's own thing but with some crossover with bisexuality there is a chance we can move forward. Every time I hear someone telling me that pan is a subset of bi it makes me wonder how bi people would feel when they are told that they are just a subset of homosexuality.  

Every time I see a post about how bisexuality covers all possible options I feel like my identity is being erased.

Not sure how to personally move on from this.

Bear
",pansexual
When Someone Asks Me if I Like Guys or Girls,,pansexual
Tiny pan-cake necklace made by a friend!,,pansexual
I made my own pan pride bracelet!!,,pansexual
"Might be pansexual, kinda confused help please.",I know I'm at least bisexual. I don't mind the idea of being with a transgender person or anyone with a non-confirmative gender but in my attraction scale they would defiantly take a lower seat than traditional gender (M/F). In the end I would want to be with a good person over anything else. I just don't know if pansexuality or bisexualty is what best describes me .,pansexual
Looking for someone to talk to,"There are some days that I feel like I'm overflowing with dumb questions and I don't really have anyone to talk to. I also am worried about bothering people on this sub. Just posting this question is a little scary for me.


 I'm looking for another girl (identifying) who wouldn't mind answering my dumb questions or just talking to me in private about this whole thing. I've tried 7 cups and some other websites to talk to people but I realized I need more of a friend that I can just talk to casually. I'm hoping for someone who's been out for a while and is confident in themselves enough to support someone who isn't.  ",pansexual
Hi there! I'm a 17 year old pansexual male who really likes answering questions! AMA!,,pansexual
I love how my sister has no idea why I like wearing her bracelets (Ignore my veiny arm).,,pansexual
Pansexuality in the military,"Hello, I recently graduated technical training for my career field in the Air Force and I have arrived at my first base. I haven't made many friends yet, but I am hoping to change that. One tip I've received is to start dressing more ""normal"". I tend to wear clothes that can be described as ""weaboo"" clothing if I can coin a term. While I have no plans on changing my sexual identity, as I believe such a thing cannot even be done (I didn't choose to be this way, I simply am), I am looking for tips on how to make friends with people. I am considering changing my clothing but what else should I do? I am accomplished in many martial arts and have extensive weapons training, which seems to be a point of contention with people rather than a point of conversation when I bring it up. Also, at what point is it appropriate to mention sexuality in a conversation? Every time I have ever mentioned that I am ""pansexual"", I get blank looks or jokes about cookware. I am very easy going (something I attribute to the inner peace achieved through martial arts), so the jokes don't offend me, but I am starting to get discouraged. I'm not trying to have sex with everyone I meet, I just want to be friends. But I'm not sure what I should be doing. Every day I feel more and more out of place. I guess I am looking mainly for advice from other pansexuals who are/have been in the military?",pansexual
Bisexual/Pansexual Men,"Whenever I sit down to write this from my perspective it gets incredibly difficult and I find myself rambling on &amp; on. I want to be like everyone else straight or simply gay and never questioning my sexual identity. Let’s keep it straight and simple right? Ever since I was a young boy I feared being identified as gay. Kids and especially young boys can be mean and hateful bullies. I am the youngest of four and the only boy; Mom &amp; Dad separated when I was 6 yo and all of my sisters had moved out of the house by the time I was 8 yo.

I often wonder what happened, what experience it was that flipped my switch to AC/DC. Was it growing up as the only boy in a house full of girls? Was it not having my father around when I was a boy? I really can’t say.

I have always identified myself a bisexual man; I’ve had long-term relationships with both men and women. But I’ve also found myself strongly attracted to transgendered men and women too. I’ve even been attracted to lesbians that I know full good and well they aren’t going there and I would get punched in the throat if I attempted anything. So Pansexual is a really new term for me. Why am I going through a sexual identity crisis again at the age of 46 yo?

I often think of myself as just a perverted guy with an extremely strong libido. I have noticed also that because I’m bipolar I can go into manic episodes where I just can’t seem to get enough. I will wear my partner and myself down until we’re both practically raw… and I still want more! And it’s not always about getting a nut. It’s about the experience, the bonding, the connection with the other person. Yes I have my kinks and for the most part I am pretty submissive with any partner. It gives me great pleasure to bring my partner to the edge and back again; seeing them enjoy themselves. I like to make it more about them than me and still get mine while I’m at it. But this is not to say that I would sleep with just anyone.

The most profoundly odd thing about it all is. It’s not just a blurring of the gender lines. It’s also race and ethnicity, young and old. Sometimes when I try to explain it… it’s like they just don’t get it. They are too wrapped up in their picture perfect partner and bigotry. I see no color and I see no gender, instead what I see is people living life and making the most of it that they can.

Having good looks is one thing and yes everybody gets all goo goo eyed over you. But the biggest thing that does it for me is brains! Smarts and personality, will make me putty in your hands. It’s like this interconnection that I cannot explain, but they seem to be rare relationships to find and develop.

I do not go waving a flag about my sexuality. But I try not to deny it either. I find myself struggling with it actually. It seems difficult to be open about being bisexual, much less pansexual? A guy said to me, “Hmm what’s pansexual? I mean other than men and women – what else does that bring in?” Sometimes, I feel like the bastard step child of the LGBT community. If you’re a gay man or a gold star lesbian then you’re the standard of the gay community. The transgendered community is getting their day in the Sun with Caitlyn, what bathroom to use, etc… If you’re a bisexual female society more readily accepts you. Because what else is more erotic than seeing two women together and when you’re a guy with two bi girls you become the envy of the world, personally I don’t know this for sure but it just seems to be the general societal viewpoint.

Anytime I would identify as bi, gay friends said “He’s confused and doesn’t know what he wants.” Girls shunned me sometimes as being a perv and because I would choke up and had so much difficulty in breaking the ice I guess. I have been accused of wanting to fuck anything that walks (almost, but not quite). I think it just compounded personal self-esteem issues that I have from childhood when my grandmother would shame and ridicule me for looking exactly like my father. I always felt like there was something inherently wrong with me. Like I have some sort of poo on my face and it wasn’t coming off. Now you’re telling me I’m pansexual?

I’ve been looking for some sort of support, others like me, people that will not judge me. I know that I can’t be the only man that is experiencing these issues. Some people that I’ve reached out to think that I want to just have sex or it is some sort of invitation to it, but its more about me trying to feel comfortable in my own skin and unashamed of who I am. Not even my local LGBT community center has any sort of counseling or services for me. There are also support groups specifically for women with bisexual male partners, which is great but what about us? The guys that are struggling to find comfort in their own skin? It is so easy to get wrapped up in my own pity party, because things could be much worse.

Some days really suck with twisted and mixed feelings of feeling alone and cut off from the world. Like no one really understands. I like people, across all gender, race, and ethnic spectrums. I was asked, “So if this is the case… what is your ideal partner?” I really don’t have one… you cast your net and whatever it brings in is the dish of the day I guess. 

Do most pan people identify this way? Do most pansexual guys feel alienated from society? Where do you find support? What do you do to feel comfortable in your own skin? You cannot possibly tell me I am the only guy that feels this way.
",pansexual
Popping over from the bi thread,"Hi guys, do you guys get the betting bi tune from crazy ex girlfriend or is that a strictly bi thing? Its important",pansexual
Questions I can't answer myself.,"Recently (within the past month) I discovered I was Pan. One hurdle over, but there's many more. I'd like to ask you all some questions since you are all knowledgeable. (FYI, I'm 19 and male.)

1. How do I date men? Now, you must be thinking, ""He just said he was Pan!"". I did, but there's a slight psychological catch here. I was molested by my Father when I was three. As you can tell, having anything of a sexual relationship is a serious problem there. How does one get around that?  
EDIT: After reading through [this](https://www.reddit.com/r/pansexual/comments/4qwn8r/had_an_awesome_evening_and_want_to_share/?st=irg275xz&amp;sh=54719b66) post, I was turned on. (Which is indeed a good thing.) However, I couldn't stop my mind from brushing over mental scars while reading, and had a major headache at the end :(

2. How do I come out to people who knew me beforehand? My members of my gaming clan, especially my best friends were a piece of cake. It was so smooth it was almost disappointing. Now, my Mother and basically my entire high school class are going to be the issue. The only way to come out is through facebook and that's a tad scary. Mom will always love and support me (which is great) but stress is literally the last thing she needs right now.

3. Is being open to literally any fetish normal for Pan people? With a simple change of mindset I can change what turns me on or off. (Outside of the default preferences before the discovery, plus the issue above.) If it's sexual, I can like it. I don't feel comfortable knowing this, but it could be a great asset too.

I gladly will accept any help given, Thanks!",pansexual
um. Hi?,"I'm new, obvs. I like cats and singing and video games. 

I've never ""come out"" I think only 3 of my friends really know.  

I was raised very religiously so I never let myself think about the fact that I wasn't attracted to boys like everyone else or that my first crush was a girl. I eventually got crushes on boys but it was developed pretty late in life (like university late, I thought I was asexual for a while). 

I dated guys but I'm more picky with guys than I am with girls. I think that's something people don't understand is that I like all genders but I'm more picky than anyone I know. Not sure if this is common or not, I've never met anther pansexual person.

I'm currently in a relationship with a male identifying partner. Please feel free to ask anything I hope to make some friends and learn more about myself on here :D",pansexual
Questioning all the things,"Up until about four months ago, I considered myself to be cis hetero, end of story. Then my boyfriend of six years came out to me as transgendered. It was a shock, but I love him (he's still using male pronouns for now) too much to let this be the end of us. He's not currently considering SRS but will start HRT soon. I've been coming to terms with having a girlfriend, and have also developed a pretty strong attraction to a girl in my class which has never happened before. I know putting labels on things isn't always the best thing to do, but... could I be pansexual? Thoughts?",pansexual
Am I really pansexual? Please help.,"I fluctuate between finding my own sex attractive and the opposite sex. I can have sex with my own sex, but I don't feel like I could be in a romantic relationship with them like I could the opposite sex. I don't know why I feel that way, it's all really confusing to me actually.",pansexual
Research Study Invitation,"We are a Harvard University research team currently working on a study about the ways that adolescents feel about themselves. 

We are interested in recruiting 14-15 year olds who use this subreddit to participate in our research study. Participation is completely voluntary.

If you are interested in participating, you will complete an online screener to see if you qualify to participate. This screener will take between 3-5 minutes. If you qualify, you will be invited to complete a variety of questionnaires online. The study will take up to 1 hour and you will be compensated $5 in online gift cards to Amazon or Starbucks. 

 A few important things to know about the study are:

1.	The study includes questions and images about self-harm and include other unpleasant images. Some people may feel that these images are disturbing and may find them to be triggering.

2.	All information collected will be kept confidential. 

3.	Participation is completely voluntary. 

4.	The link we provide will send you to a website telling you about the study. Once on that site, you can decide whether or not you want to participate.
 
5.	If you start to participate and decide you no longer feel comfortable or you are no longer interested, you can end it without any penalty or punishment.

6.	We will provide links to treatment resources throughout the study, in case participants feel upset by any of the questions or tasks in the study.

7.	In order to complete the study, you will need to download software called Inquisit. This software will not harm your computer, and you can uninstall it after completing the study.

Please send us a private message if you are interested in participating. Once you contact us, we will send you a link to the screening questionnaire to see if you qualify and to tell you more about the study. 

Thank you for your consideration!

EDIT: I have just gotten approval to post the link to the study website--here it is: http://teenresearchstudy.fas.harvard.edu

EDIT: Due to iTunes policies, we are no longer able to offer iTunes gift cards as payment for this study.",pansexual
Am I the only one?,"I've noticed that a lot of pan people are focused mainly on personalities than looks. But I'm different? I focus mainly on looks, I just don't care about the gender of the person that I date. Obviously I don't JUST date someone because they're hot, but you get what I mean.",pansexual
Am I pan?,"So sorry if this post is a jumbled mess, I'm a bit scatterbrained at the moment. 

I have been thinking about my sexuality a lot lately, I recently broke up with my boyfriend who I had been with for three years.  I've always thought I was straight because I'm a female (21) who has only been in relationships with males. 

Recently I've noticed that I sometimes become attracted to people after I've gotten to know them even if I wasn't attracted to them before. 

I've been thinking more and more that I am pansexual but I feel weird saying I am because I've never been in a relationship with anyone that wasn't a man, but I'm open to the idea of being with girls or trans people. I have kissed girls before and I find plenty of women attractive, but it's been drilled in my head that it's common for girls to do that (""Oh it's just a phase!""). 

I'm not sure if I'm vastly over thinking this or what. I don't have many friends for me to talk to this about, so I thought here might be a good idea. Sorry if I'm in the wrong place!",pansexual
TIL: Rick (From the show Rick and Morty) has been been declared pansexual by show co-creator and animator Justin Roiland,,pansexual
Sexual Objectification Study (Participation Request),"
We are a research team at the University of Nebraska-­‐Lincoln and the University of Florida conducting a study about the life experiences of bisexual, lesbian, and queer women. We hope that with this study, we can contribute  to the understanding of the experiences of sexual minority women. Your participation is essential to achieving this goal, so we hope that you will take part in our online survey study. 
 
In order to participate, you must: 
•	Be 18 years of age or older 
•	Identify as a woman and as lesbian, queer, bisexual, pansexual, gay, or any other sexual minority orientation. Anyone who identifies as sexual minority and as a woman (including trans* or gender nonconforming individuals) is invited to participate. 
•	Reside in the United States 
 
If you would like to participate in our study, you may click this [link](https://unleducation.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_8v5FMx6tSgHDCdL)
 
Your responses are anonymous and your data will be removed from the server soon after you complete the study. Depending on your privacy settings, the Internet host you are using may track and save user actions. For example, social networking sites may record and maintain information about the sites and pages visited and links activated while within network. It is possible that they may use that information, linked to your identity, for marketing purposes or provide it to third parties. You may access the survey outside of a social networking site by cutting and pasting the link above into a new web page. 
 
If you have any questions about this study, please feel free to contact us using the contact information listed below. A list of local and national resources will appear at the end of the survey for anyone interested in additional support. This research study has been approved by the University of Nebraska-­‐Lincoln Institutional Review Board (UNL IRB# 20151215698EP) as well as the  University of Florida Institutional Review Board (UF IRB# 2012-U-0639) 
 
Please feel free to pass on this message to other individuals who might be interested in participating as well. 
 
Thank you very much in advance for your time!  
 
Sexual Minority Women’s Health Research Team 
 
Elliot Tebbe, Ph.D. 
University of Nebraska – Lincoln 
Counseling Psychology, Department of Educational Psychology Email:  etebbe2@unl.edu 
 
Bonnie Moradi, Ph.D. &amp; Alex Lenzen, M.S. University of Florida 
Counseling Psychology, Department of Psychology,  Email:  moradib@ufl.edu 
 
",pansexual
Is it nessesary to come out as pansexual?,"I have been comfortable with my sexuality for a few years now but Ive been having this issue whenever I make friends with new people. People tend to just assume that I'm straight and to be honest it makes me super uncomfortable because I feel like I'm not being honest? I was wondering how do you guys handle coming out to new friends or just people in general? I think its ""easier"" for gay people because when someone assumes that they're straight they can just politely correct them but when it comes to pansexuality you have to correct them and by default have to have the conversation about how bisexuality and pansexuality are two different things and honestly and blah blah blah. Is it really necessary to inform people of your sexuality? How can you come out to people without making the whole conversation revolve around it? I'm sorry if this isn't so clear - I'm rambling all of thoughts onto the page &lt;:)

Edit: Thank you so much for the advice everyone. You've all said so many nice and useful advice, it has really helped put me at ease with the idea of sharing this part of me and for that I thank you all so much &lt;3 &lt;3 ",pansexual
"I'm having some trouble. I don't feel ""accepted"" by the LGBT community and I don't know if I fit in. I feel intimidated. Anyone else ever feel this?","When I found out there was a word for what I was feeling, I was ECSTATIC. I loved knowing there were other pansexuals, especially knowing that there's this understanding and support, but I don't feel like I belong. I feel like an outsider looking in. If someone were to ask me if I'm straight, I'd say no. But if someone were to ask me if I was LGBT, I would probably say I don't know.

I know I like all genders, I just don't know why I don't feel accepted. Maybe I'm projecting or something. I'm a solitary person, so maybe the thought of a huge community causes me anxiety. I feel intimidated, like I don't deserve to be in this community or that it's not for me or doesn't apply to me.

I don't know what I'm trying to say. I just don't feel right saying I'm straight and I don't feel right saying I'm LGBT. I have a love-hate relationship with labels. If I don't have a label, I feel kinda weird and empty and when I do, I feel confined and limited. It doesn't help that I don't know many LGBT people. So I don't know. Any advice? I feel kinda ""homeless.""

Thanks for any help

",pansexual
I want to come up with a list of pan puns. Please tell me ANYTHING you come up with!,"Here's what I have so far:
Pan-da (Pan... duh.)
Secret Agent Pan
Nowhere Pan
Rocket Pan
Little Lion Pan
When I Was Your Pan
Pan in the Mirror
Piano Pan
Pan in Black
Pan of the Year
The Pan Who Sold the World
Sharp Dressed Pan
Macho Pan
Iron Pan
Spiderpan, Superpan, Batpan, any other superhero with ""man"" ",pansexual
Feelings about Pansexuality,"How do you feel from other people,
I feel lonely, i found myself as a pansexual and now, i feel different, now, my relations with other people haven't changed but i feel different and lonely because i can't find someone like me, so i was thinking, have you experienced those feelings ?

(btw English is no my birth language so sorry if i mispell some words or if some of my sentences aren't correct)

(And i don't know if it's the good place to post this here, because it's mostly about depression but it's related to pansexuality, sorry if it's not the good place to post it right there)",pansexual
This simple but awesome bracelet my friend made me!,,pansexual
Coming out as pansexual at 23,"I feel as though I was a ""late bloomer"" with regard to my sexual orientation. Growing up in a small Indiana town, my family and the community in which I was raised was very conservative. 
Correct me if I'm wrong, but I feel as though you discover at a much earlier age if you're gay, whereas it may take longer for those who identify as bi, pan, etc.
I was definitely attracted to boys (exactly what I ""should"" be attracted to, given my upbringing), but of course there was that one person who made you second guess yourself. She was so sweet and smart, and had a lot of the same interests I had. At that point in my life (late middle school), I thought that it was a ""one-time thing"" and maybe I was just curious.
Through high school, I of course had various ""lady crushes"", but only ever dated men -masculine men- given that any divergence from the sex/gender ""norm"" was severely frowned upon and therefore rarely seen where I grew up. 
Eventually I found a man I wanted to stay with and really commit to. We grew up together and my family loved him, so naturally it had to be a good idea to get engaged right? 
Well we did. Directly after I graduated high school and he came back from deployment (I was 19 and he was 22). We moved to Kansas City together where I pursued a degree in psychology, and got married May of 2012. During my marriage, I came to realize that I was bisexual; the ""curiosity"" went away and I found myself attracted to people that weren't men. At the time, I didn't know about pansexuality, therefore if I wasn't straight and I wasn't gay, I must be bi. 
I held on to that identity for a while and didn't tell my now ex-husband, but he figured it out and asked me about it one day. I shyly replied that yes, I was, but the topic never really came back up. 

Let's switch gears now. 

My family. My family is a wonderful, loving, yet conservative/religious group of folks like I've mentioned earlier. When a friend or two of mine had come out as gay in the past, my mom's response was always along the lines of ""that's sad"" or ""what a waste, they were such a nice person.""  Because I was married to a man and never actually dated anyone besides a man, there was no need to come out. So I didn't, and I think the reason why is pretty obvious. 
Not until 6 months after my divorce was final and I moved to Ohio in December 2015 did I have the guts to do it. By this time, I had done some research and met people who didn't conform to ""gender norms"" who I found myself attracted to. I finally found an orientation that I really identified with: pansexuality. I began dating a non-binary individual (we're still together and very happy) who has expanded my mind and encourages me to be myself, something I've been afraid to do. 
Coming out was interesting. I came out to my brother, dad, and mom all separately. My brother didn't have much to say about it. My dad is the most open-minded person in my family and asked questions to try to see things from my perspective (he didn't agree with it, but he was and still is supportive), but my mom... That's a different story. 
I had to plan out exactly what I was going to say to her and when I would say it. Well, that plan went down the toilet pretty darn quick. 
We were in the car headed to a nearby city to go see a movie and then it happened. 
""Now that you're single again, you should see how (one of my exes) is doing."" 
""Well, mama, he's gay.""
*insert aforementioned comments here* ""well, I'm glad I don't have to worry about that. Do I?"" 
Shit. 
I broke out in some crazy, nervous laughter for a good 10 seconds. She just stared at me. 
""Oh no. Are you a lesbian?""
""No.""
""Are you bi?""
""No.""
""What are you then?"" 
So I went on to explain pansexuality as best as I knew how at the time, and those bitter, disappointed tears started rolling down her face. She asked what she did while raising me to make me this way. She asked if my divorce made me this way. She asked if I could ever marry a man again. I assured her there's a possibility of me falling in love with a man and reminded her that I'm the same person I've always been, I'm just sharing a more private aspect of myself. 
Then there was silence. 
I didn't know what else to say. I decided that it was best to stay quiet for a while to let her process what had happened. Needless to say that was the most awkward car ride I've ever had. 
I've introduced my significant other to my family and my mom has met with us twice. She's civil to my S.O., and I appreciate that, but every time I mention them, she gets quiet. But these things take time, right? 
Anyway, for some reason I felt moved to share this. I don't know you and you don't know me, but if you find yourself in a similar situation, I'm more than happy to help support you, give words of encouragement, etc. 

Have a pantastic day! ",pansexual
Heterosexist Experiences Study,"&amp;nbsp;  
We are writing from a LGBTQ-affirmative research group at the [University of Massachusetts Boston — the LGBTQ UMass Boston Advocacy and Research Collaborative] (https://www.facebook.com/UMassBostonLgbtqResearchTeam) .  We have developed brief exercises to help LGBTQ people deal with experiences of heterosexism.  Heterosexism is prejudice or discrimination based on the idea that heterosexuality is the norm.  
&amp;nbsp;  
We are hoping you would be willing to help us by sharing this information, and in turn contribute to the mental health of LGBTQ people who experience heterosexist experiences.  If participants finish the questionnaires and exercises at the times below, they will receive an $80 Amazon gift card, and if they participate at all they will be eligible for a raffle for a $100 gift card.  
&amp;nbsp;  
In total, the entire study should take three hours to complete across five days (about 20-30 minutes on four of the days and 45-50 minutes on one day).  
&amp;nbsp;  
            The study involves completing:  
&amp;nbsp;  

*A questionnaire on the first day  
*A writing exercise on each of the following three days  
*A follow-up questionnaire two months later.   
&amp;nbsp;  
The link to the survey is:   [http://www.surveygizmo.com/s3/2582177/Initial-Page]( http://www.surveygizmo.com/s3/2582177/Initial-Page)  
&amp;nbsp;  
Please share this with people who have had heterosexist experiences who may be interested. We can also send a flyer you can share or distribute at meetings. 
If you have any questions, please let us know by writing to us at UMBstudyschedule@gmail.com . This study has been approved by the University of Massachusetts Boston Institutional Review Board. If you have questions about your rights as participants, please contact the University of Massachusetts Boston IRB at orsp@umb.edu or 617-287-5370.  
&amp;nbsp;  
We really appreciate your support to better LGBTQ lives.  
Sincerely,  
Heidi Levitt, PhD &amp; the Heterosexist Experiences Study Team  
University of Massachusetts Boston  
",pansexual
Had an Awesome Evening and Want to Share,"TL:DR at the bottom.

I got laid finally for the first time since late May. It was with a cis male (as am I) and basically our first FWB hookup. I have recently come to understand and accept my submissive nature, and was very open and clear about that way ahead of time. I feel like it made the sex a lot better, like a lot better. He identified as verse but I am a sub with no interest in bottoming, I've topped once before and it wasn't great for me. He took the dominant role just like we discussed and was awesome at it. I told him I would get involved once things got rolling but I have never been able to take initiative or make the first move.

We met at his place when he got off work, hot boxed his car and talked before we went in, and then went inside and up to his room. He threw on [Adult Swim] and ""King of the Hill"" was on. We sat on his bed and watched maybe 5 minutes, with him constantly stealing over the shoulder glances at me. I tried to make it obvious that I knew he was looking by catching his eye and staring him down. It worked, two glances later and I timed it just right so he knew he was caught.

His response? A quick lunge at my face and a deep embrace. He quickly stripped me down at that point and began removing his own clothes.  I stood up for a moment but he pushed me back to the bed, removed his boxers, and climbed on top of me. I could feel his aroused genitals rubbing between our belly's and his tongue probing the back of my that. I also started to get physically aroused at that point.

He rolled over off of me and started pushing my head down to his pelvis. I excitedly obliged and began my sub duties (I'll admit to being a newb and not very good in this department despite my enthusiasm), taking care of every inch of his thighs with my mouth before moving in for the main course. After a few fumbles I found a rhythm that was working and I could tell from his breathing and the hip thrusts. He put his hand on the back of my head and began forcing it into his thrusts. I did OK at first, slobbering and gaging came but we were both obviously enjoying it. 

A few more punches my soft pallet and I could feel trouble brewing. I pulled my head up and he responded well by letting go and letting me up. Nothing was said, he seemed to know what happened (maybe the look on my face?). At that point he lead me to engage some frotting, petting, and kissing. After that he laid back and told me to 69 him. I got into position and was taking care of him while he did an amazing job downstairs.

Then in the heat of the moment I felt something poke at my back door. Then again with a little more force, and it actually felt really good to my surprise. As he pushed a little more I moaned and pushed back slightly to signal is was OK. He would remove his finger every now and then to apply some more saliva, and go a little bit further. It felt so good, but then as I felt his finger about to pass through and in, it got pretty painful. 

In part because his fingernails were just the right length to be sharp, but also because we didn't have any lube. I had stopped and bought a 3-pack of condoms and a 4oz bottle of lube just in case but I was so nervous I forgot them in the car, and I had to park quite a ways away because apartments. We had proceeded earlier because I had a condom on me so if we needed it, we had it.

So as soon as it hurt enough to stop I just said ""Stop"" out loud and he did immediately. I knew it couldn't go any further without lube but I really wanted to push my personal envelope based on the pleasure I had just felt and he was really turned on by my rump (which really had me turned on too because no one has ever treated it like he did). He was still on his back from 69'ing so I grabbed the condom (pre-lubricated), went over and gave him a little more oral service, and then put it on him.

I stared directly in his eyes and said ""this isn't going to work, but if you are careful, gentle, and pay attention to me we can see how far it goes. He nodded, and I have fantasized for a while of being in missionary + eye contact so that is what I went for. I lied down on my back and he approached moving from my feet toward my pelvis. I put my legs on his shoulders and once he was close to me I grabbed my calves and pulled them as close to my head as I could. 

I felt him start pushing against my doorway, which felt great, and so I maintained eye contact and gave him nods when I felt him change something and it didn't hurt. Eventually we did sadly get to a point where it wasn't working and had to stop again. He removed the condom and I went down on him again for a few minutes before finishing him by hand, outside of my mouth. He took a few moments to collect himself as I snuggled his side and rested my head on his chest. He then reached down and proceeded to finish me off by hand while kissing my forehead and letting me snuggle him. We cuddled for a few minutes after and then got dressed and he walked me out to my car.

Sorry for the wall of text, but I am super giddy right now and can't stop replaying it. He was an awesome Dom/top because he listened well and took control but didn't leave me powerless; just like I wanted 😆

TL:DR I finally got laid for the first time in a month and almost bottomed for the first time.

Anyway, I was hoping my story might cheer someone else up since it made my day so great. I do apologize if it is too long or graphic.

Feel free to leave  any questions, advice, tips, thoughts, or epiphanies in the comments or send me a PM\DM.

Thank you for letting me share beautiful Pansexual community!",pansexual
"I made a pansexual mobile wallpaper, enjoy.",,pansexual
It's fine ask me ANYTHING,"Hi, my name is Matthew and I am transgender (female to male), pansexual, and in a open, long distance relationship. My friend Harry and I decided to do a video on his YouTube channel where you can ask me anything about me, being trans, pansexual, and or in an open and long distance relationship. Please leave any questions you have in the comments below and see an answer appear in the next few days on his channel. (Link below to the most recent video :) (I will also answer questions about people who are male to female transgender but the answers will come from people who know a lot more about that subject than me) 

https://youtu.be/FkHTGspdUak",pansexual
So I was clearing a paper jam,,pansexual
Pansexual Representation in the Pride Parade,,pansexual
[21F] Pansexual here!! I'm 21 from KY just looking for other pansexuals out there!! Totes down for making new Pan friends. I have SnapChat &amp; Kik! SC: Different_024 Kik: LittlePrincess094,,pansexual
Do pansexual people have standards physically?,"I've been going through a few links here but i haven't found a clear answer. Do pansexual people have physical standards? 

As a straight person,  I am attracted to a particular type - facially and bodywise (i.e strong facial bones, slim, etc) - and find other facial/body features unattractive. For both homo/hetero sexuals i know that they find physical traits attractive as well. 

In my mind, attractive physical traits correspond to the gender of that person. Strong cheekbones on a male makes a male attractive, big lips on a woman makes a woman attractive. But with pansexual people they don't consider gender, so how can physical standards be possible?

Imagine people did not have genders but were essentially entities with physical features. Do pansexual people choose between the entities due to pleasing physical appearance or do they not have any standards at all?

How is pansexuality different from bi",pansexual
22 MtF looking to chat on kik,"I have recently come to terms with being trans, and am looking to chat with people who will accept me for it. My kik is kararoleplay. Roleplay is always an added bonus :3 but not necessary. ",pansexual
What role does the physical sex of a person play for pan people? Do you get sexual responses to both sexes?,"Apologies if this is too blatant. 


I've read the side- bar description- and I find that I can relate to a lot of it. I used to be often ""gender blind"" in my attractions, and I did also feel that I was interested in the ""tea"" &amp; and not the ""cup"".

It still is the case to some degree, but part of the process of realisation that I am more gay than anything else   has been that, I just find consistently one type of cup makes it very easy to drink the tea, and I find it beautiful (same sex). 


 Whilst with the other (opposite sex), it is like the tea is not in a cup, but in an old jam jar, in the house opposite, and I have to suck it through a leaky straw suspended across the street. 
By the time it reaches me, I still feel thirsty &amp; I have to suppress the fact that I dislike the jam jar it came from. It just isn't fun. 

I just found out that the cup matters to me, because it if it is of the wrong type, I cannot drink the tea. + I do find the cups much more beautiful than the jam- jars- so this is the physical fact about my sexuality. 

So the difference for me is that despite being ""gender blind"" in some ways, I am not ""sex blind""- it matters to me - bodies of the opposite sex are not particularly sexual to me &amp; I cannot connect well to people in male bodies. 

It makes me wonder what role does the physical side play for pan people - if it ""does not matter"" - does it mean that they virtually feel the same, but you still get responses to physical sexual characteristics of people such as breasts, bums, etc, or that you don't get such responses at all, and instead you focus on personality traits? 

so in short- does the cup matter at all- does it feature in the equation at all? 


",pansexual
A Dink and A Chat 2: LGBTQ+ and Pride Month,,pansexual
First time I've seen the bi vs pan debate laid out so simply...what do you think? (x-posted to r/bisexual),,pansexual
Bf (32M) recently came out to me (28F) as being pansexual. How do I help ease his social hangups and insecurities?,"Here is a bit of background:
Bf and I have been dating 9 months. I personally identify as pansexual, a switch when it comes to power/sexual dynamics in relationships, and non binary when it comes to my sexual attractions. He grew up in an abusive and homophobic upbringing, but for the most part he has done amazing self reflection and therapy to help him overcome many aspects of his past. He has never dated anyone like me: meaning I am completely confident, transparent, and secure in my sexuality. I wont get into too much details, but through our relationship he has had somewhat of a sexual awakening and is beginning to break down those societal pressures of what it means to be a man and has had a lot of clarity  concerning the lopsided values our society places on being masculine. Last night after some deep conversation he blurted out that he thinks he is pansexual. I reassured him that I thought that was amazing he feels comfortable sharing that with me and it only makes me feel more connected, and attracted to him! He hears me, but because of his homophobic upbringing he is having a hard time accepting that he can still identify with being masculine and not be straight. Men and Women of this sub-reddit; any suggestions on how I can help him feel less insecure about this? I would really appreciate the feedback. How can I help him understand that being pansexual does not make him any less of a man? Any and all suggestions welcome, even if they stray off this topic a bit that's fine. I am just trying to help expand my thinking on this to better help transition my partner into this new chapter of his sexuality. Thanks so much. :)",pansexual
"I want to come out soon. (Pansexual, genderfluid) I am quite nervous! Any advice or sharing your own experience would be really helpful.","So. This last year has been quite insane for me.

A little backstory- I am a girl. That is- I am a female, born female. But pretty much my entire life I have had a lot of gender confusion. Sometimes it was mild- feeling odd with gendered expectations, sometimes it was severe, with full blown dysphoria. This caused a lot of pain especially in dating as I would begin to date cis guys as a ""girl"", only to have everything fall apart as dysphoria set in. The few men I braved actually talking about my issues with, responded with horror and disgust. So for many years I tried to be ""normal"" and as female as I could manage. It.... didn't work out. This might be a story some of you are familiar with- where trying to bury yourself ended with self-loathing, substance use, so on, and so forth. Everyone knows you're a wreck and can't figure out why.

Fast forward to my new beginning- in recent years, I began to understand that there was something different. I began to delve deep into /r/lgbt and from there, lots of other subreddits about gender and sexuality. Over several years, I began to quietly educate myself, feasting on the pictures and stories of beautiful, happy, real queer people. But for a long time, I was scared  wasn't ""queer"" enough, that as someone who was still searching for her identity I wasn't welcome. So I started the cycle again. I was in yet another relationship with a man who couldn't understand what I was going through, and I had one final breakdown. I could have died. And I decided I owed it to my friends, my family, and to those beautiful, incredible inspiring brave people who shared their stories to stop pretending.

So I am now living in my own space. A few of my closest friends know what I'm going through, and though I am still in the closet with the rest of the world, I know I can go up to them and tell them about a new step in my journey, and they will quietly but ferociously cheerlead for me. I met a beautiful pansexual trans girl who understands all of me. I've never met someone in my entire life who got *me*, as in- this intense inner gender turmoil. She's made me feel like myself- that the pain and agony from my ""gender issues"" were simply because I was trying to be someone I'm not.

At this point, I turn 30 in just a few years. I refuse to repeat this cycle, or waste my time any more, trying to love people who try to fit me into the box they like, and reject me cruelly when I don't fit. I refuse to be afraid to love the people I love! 

So, here I am. I'll probably come out via Facebook, because most of my family is out of state and that's often the best way to communicate, and because that is the shared platform for most people I know. Does anyone have any advice or experience with that? Also- explaining gender fluidity and pansexuality in a way that makes sense to people who have a much less nuanced understanding of gender and sexuality?",pansexual
"I understand being pansexual, but how to compete..","Ok so I'm an older male madly in love with a female that is pan-sexual. We connected like I have never connected with anyone (she has told me the same), but I know I can't compete with a woman, told her that as well, and think I lost her forever. I miss the good morning calls, texts, and feel like my world is so upside down and spinning out of control.",pansexual
Pan/Bi Themed Scavenger Hunt Fundraiser Denver Saturday,"Hopefully, this is okay I didn't see anything about posting events.

There was no representation for bisexuals or pansexuals at Denver Pride. We hope to change that.

https://www.facebook.com/events/510287859167694/",pansexual
Why Do So Many Bisexuals End Up In “Straight” Relationships? (x-post from /r/bisexual),,pansexual
"What is ""a gender""","Literally every dictionary definition of gender I can find defines it as a binary, i.e.""the state of being either male of female"". If gender isn't a binary, what is ""a gender""? How is gender defined? How is it different than personality, identity etc.?

I'm not asking what it means when someone's agender, I'm asking when someone looks up ""gender"" in the dictionary what should the definition say in your opinion, instead of ""the state of being male or female""",pansexual
Let's do something,"I have noticed that for a lot of sexual orientations there aren't sub reddits on the topic. I say we make categories for more romantic orientations as well as gender identities.


Who's willing to help?
         -Riley",pansexual
Seeking 18+ HIV Negative Men for Research Study with PAID options!,"Hi, my name is Jessica Cunningham, I’m a research assistant at the University of Massachusetts Boston. Working in conjunction with gay, bisexual, pansexual, and queer-affirmative researchers at UMASS and Suffolk University in Boston, MA, I am looking for sexual minority men to participate in a study investigating psychological strengths and sexual health.
If you identify as male, are over 18 years old, HIV-negative, identify with something other than heterosexual, and have experienced adversity in life, we would love to get the chance to interview you as part of this important research! Participants will be paid for their time and receive referrals to legal, mental health, or physical health services.
If interested, get started by taking the 20-min online screener, then sign up to be interviewed at: www.surveymonkey.com/s/MensHealthStudyPhase1 Participation in the study includes completing a 20-minute online screening to determine eligibility, and two anonymous interviews over Skype (using only audio, not video; interviews would be between 30-90 minutes long). All research has been approved by the human ethics committee (IRB) at Suffolk University.
Also, if you participated in this study over the summer or more recently, please don't participate again! If you have any questions please send me a PM or email me at MensHealthStudy@Suffolk.edu Thanks!",pansexual
"Do you have a ""Type"" that is consistent for all genders?","I am Pan but I lean a little more on the femme side in my preference. So my type: I am a sucker for geeks and artists. Artists are a huge turn on for me even if I myself am not an artist. That said, I'm not a fan of unkempt beards. I like people of either gender who put some thought into how they dress. I love seeing folks who have interesting outfits, especially if they are unconventional. Colored hair is a plus but I can't have colored hair cause of work.

On the other hand my type is not completely consistent. I like women of all shapes and sizes, I can be quite the fat admirer but, I do tend to be pickier about guys. But the guys I like, I swoon over them. ",pansexual
"Decreased libido, confused","I recently went through a break up and I think that it's killed my libido. I used to think about sex a lot. Now I can't even get horny looking at porn or comics like I used to. For me attraction is all about personality and I think that my last relationship broke my libido a bit. I mean I get a lot more things done lately, but I miss getting horny and can't seem to get that feeling anymore. My ex severely disrespected me and I think I may be turned off from men now because of it. I tend to get passionate and protective of certain women I meet and I'm thinking of maybe focusing my attention away from cis men. I feel like I shouldn't be chasing any sort of relationship, but I miss sex and giving pleasure to people. One night stands don't do it for me, I need raw emotion and connection but I can't seem to find that lately. I've been starting to research polyamorous relationships because I think I'd like to take a backseat in relationships and be a secondary partner to someone or multiple people but I don't know where to go with that. My emotions, libido, and sexual orientation is all confused and I'm not sure what to do about it. I've been thinking of attending some sex clubs or beginner dungeons nights to explore more but I don't really know what I'm after. Anyone else as confused about their sex life or lack there of as I am? I really just wanted to vent and didn't know where else to say this. Thanks for reading. ",pansexual
"Hello to all! Euro Redditors, I need your opinion!","Hey beautiful people,

I'm French and currently working on a research project on the **perception by EU LGBT of their rights situation in their country**. 

Every year, [The Rainbow Index](http://www.ilga-europe.org/resources/rainbow-europe/2015) publishes a report which ranks each EU country based on their handling of LGBT rights and issues. I want to find out whether these results reflect reality. I would love it if you could help me do that.

You can access the [survey here](https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/TNKPC8S)

If you live in **any European country** and you're interested in giving me a hand (hehe) for this project, here are questions you should answer (you can PM me your answers if you'd rather):

* 1- How do you **perceive** the state of LGBT rights in your country? (Let me know how you feel on a daily basis at home and **where you are from**)

* 2- How do you **reach this perception**? (What means do you use: personal experiences, social media, news, organisations...)

* 3- Are you **familiar with** the Rainbow Index?

If there is anything else you'd like to add, please feel free to do so! 

I'm also available on Kik for a chat, find me on: JoWhte.

A million thanks and hoping to hear from all of you soon! Don't hesitate to ask questions.

*Smooches*
",pansexual
(Survey Closes April 20th) [Research disproportionately excludes GSM - We want to change that!] Seeking participants for study on sexual well-being in couples. ALL gender identities and sexual orientations welcome! [Have Your Voice Heard In Research!],"I am a Master's student in Clinical Psychology at Queen's University, and my passion is in conducting inclusive sex research and making sure that LGBTQ* voices are all heard in research. I am currently completing my master's thesis that looks at how different couple constellations negotiate and navigate sexual problems.   

We are currently recruiting participants in intimate romantic relationships who have been dating a minimum of three months for an online study on sexual problems and sexual well-being. We are looking for participants in ALL relationships with any level of sexual satisfaction, with or without sexual problems or concerns. We greatly appreciate everyone who is able to participate and/or able to help us spread the word. Thank you for your help in conducting inclusive sex research! 

#*****To participate visit: https://surveys.psyc.queensu.ca/SWBR.aspx ~Note: There is also a 'save and exit' button in the survey if you would prefer to complete it over multiple sittings.",pansexual
Pansexuals &amp; Omnisexuals at Seattle Pride 2016,"Posting this here for any pan or omni people who are interested in gathering to participate in the 2016 Seattle Pride parade. Allies are welcome! :)
If you’re interested head over to the [Facebook page]( https://www.facebook.com/PantasticSeattle/)!

I hope this can reach some people in the area! ^-^",pansexual
SO i have a (maybe) obvious question...,Can a pansexual still be superficial? Like gender doesnt matter to them as long as their partner is still attractive?,pansexual
Am I bi/pan?,"Someone on /r/questioning refered me here when I asked if I was bi. I've only dated girls but I've fantasized about both guys and girls before. I really like the idea of dating anyone(male, female, cis, trans, etc.). I'm really confused.

",pansexual
pansexual bumper sticker,,pansexual
So I read your sidebar and your definition of pansexual...,"To make it simpler for myself, it's saying that the pansexual person only cares about the sex with no regards to the gender. Because for a while now, I've been feeling a bit confused. I've been masturbating to gay porn and now whenever I think about being with a guy, or a girl, or both, I just think about how good it would feel to get my dick sucked or stick it in somebody's *private* hole. I don't know what to think of it other than horniness. 

Any type of advice or suggestions would be helpful. I'm not feeling desperate or ashamed, just lost and confused. 

And one more questions, how many of you felt liberated and more happy after you came out?",pansexual
"""Youre just doing it for attention!""","After being out as pan for a while ive come across this a lot. Specifically people calling me a feminist, tumblr user, special snowflake, attention whore, etc. Its extremely frustrating because I feel I cant mention my sexuality ever without being shoved into a stereotype. Anyone else struggle with this? How do you deal with it?",pansexual
A quick question. (long text),"In very recent times I've been looking at sexuality, and my gf sent me a sexuality test (I know tests don't prove anything) but it came up as strait, then i took it again and it came up as pansexual. (never heard of it before) so i did some research. *Que research montage. Reading several articles and videos about what a pan is (cooking instrument lol), but as I did more reading/watching it would fit more and more to myself. I would actually recall times when I said a guy was hot, etc. Getting to the point, I don't really know how i feel about being a pan. Is it common to not know how to feel? Should I be feeling sick a little? Is it common for there to be a male pan? (sorry for the long text, this is the only place i really trust to talk about it)",pansexual
Stupid Question from a BiBro,Is pansexuality as an identity its own separate thing or is it an additional label added to bisexuality to further define the attraction?,pansexual
Find Out Your Sexuality (Coming Out),,pansexual
The After-Effects of Coming Out,,pansexual
"For the first time in my life, someone told me my sexuality doesn't exist, and I'm pissed.","It was in a Facebook thread, and I had commented mentioning that I'm pansexual. Someone asked me what it was, and someone else immediately replied to them, saying ""It doesn't exist."" Myself and another pansexual person defended ourselves, saying that it does in fact exist, but obviously nothing could be done. It just made me so incredibly hurt and angry, especially since it's the first time I've personally experienced something like that. I mean, I'm pansexual, and I exist, what more do you need? Ugh. I don't get people.",pansexual
[Research disproportionately excludes GSM - We want to change that!] Seeking participants for study on sexual well-being in couples. ALL gender identities and sexual orientations welcome! [Have Your Voice Heard In Research!],,pansexual
Coming out to Mother,"Well I came out to my mother and she didnt take it lightly. She told me that Pansexuality isnt real, that I am either Bi or straight nothing else. She also told me that I was going to go to hell and that she taught me better. Has anyone else had this situation and what did you do? I want to teach my mom that this is a thing and just ask her to accept me. I could use some advice. ",pansexual
My 13 yo just came out to me,"So I am mom and my kid just came out to me.  I am surprised.  My family and ex (her dad) are super cult like religious, I ran screaming from all that when I became pregnant with her.  I just have a really ignorant question; Is she too young?  I was the victim of a sexual crime at a young age so I don't have my own experiences to pull from.  She is my world and I love her no matter what, I am just feeling a bit flabbergasted.  Thanks in advance. Much Love",pansexual
How to explain to people it's not a phase?,,pansexual
I'm looking for pan communities and websites about it,"Hi, I'm am currently working on a project about sexual minorities (such as pans, asexuals, etc) visibility. I need reliable sources of information about any of those groups (I already have sources for asexuals and bisexuals, but pansexuals and poliamorous are very hard to find at the moment)",pansexual
[Repost] Sexual Minority Women's Health Research,"Participant Recruitment Post

We are a research team at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln and the University of Florida conducting a study about the life experiences of bisexual, lesbian, and queer women. We hope that with this study, we can contribute to the understanding of the experiences of sexual minority women. Your participation is essential to achieving this goal, so we hope that you will take part in our online survey study.

In order to participate, you must: 
• Be 18 years of age or older
• Identify as a woman and as lesbian, queer, bisexual, pansexual, gay, or any other sexual minority orientation. Anyone who identifies as sexual minority and as a woman (including trans* or gender nonconforming individuals) is invited to participate. 
• Reside in the United States

If you would like to participate in our study, you may click this link: https://unleducation.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_8v5FMx6tSgHDCdL

Your responses are anonymous and your data will be removed from the server soon after you complete the study. Depending on your privacy settings, the Internet host you are using may track and save user actions. For example, social networking sites may record and maintain information about the sites and pages visited and links activated while within network. It is possible that they may use that information, linked to your identity, for marketing purposes or provide it to third parties. You may access the survey outside of a social networking site by cutting and pasting the link above into a new web page.

If you have any questions about this study, please feel free to contact us using the contact information listed below. A list of local and national resources will appear at the end of the survey for anyone interested in additional support. This research study has been approved by the University of Nebraska-Lincoln Institutional Review Board (UNL IRB# 20151215698EP) as well as the University of Florida Institutional Review Board (UF IRB# 2012-U-0639)
Please feel free to pass on this message to other individuals who might be interested in participating as well.

Thank you very much in advance for your time!

Sexual Minority Women’s Health Research Team

Elliot Tebbe, Ph.D. 
University of Nebraska – Lincoln 
Counseling Psychology, 
Department of Educational Psychology 
Email: etebbe2@unl.edu

Bonnie Moradi, Ph.D. &amp; Alex Lenzen, M.S. 
University of Florida Counseling Psychology, 
Department of Psychology, 
Email: moradib@ufl.edu",pansexual
14 and pansexual,"Hey! I'm fourteen and I'm a pansexual teenager.

The reason I identify as pansexual is because I have had crushes on girls, guys and non binary people, and are sort of in a relationship with a non binary person now. I'm also open to dating any gender and don't really include gender as a factor for dating people.

So far I'm out as bisexual instead of pansexual to my parents and friends for a few reasons.

1) No one knows what pansexual means.

2) I only realised I didn't feel *quite* bisexual.

3) People would think I'm weird and have sex with pans.

So far, quite a few people think I'm bisexual.

So, any advcie? I'm kinda scared and worried at the moment. Any comments are **greatly** appreciated!",pansexual
A little Pansexual Cake,,pansexual
"So, i found that i was Pansexual.","Hello. My name is Dimitri Wayland and i identify here at reddit as Ichy. Annd, im like 99% sure that im Pan. For most of my life (Won't share age, sorry.), i tought i was straight. Like, never tought of being attracted to someone that wasn't of the opposite gender. Then, by reading books and participating on the communitys, i found out the LGBT. I tought something like ""Hey, cool. Not really me but im okay."". Then, a year or so passed, and at the start of this year i tought: ""Hey i don't really care if im dating a woman or a man or whatever i just care about what is the person personality"". At that time, i dindn't know Pansexuality, just Straight, Gay, Lesbian, Bi. But know im really indentifying with the Pansexual concept. I think that im really Pan. Also, do you think that coming out with a cake is a good idea? Cake is good.",pansexual
I made a cute Pansexual t-shirt,,pansexual
Bisexual - Why it is so hard to accept yourself,,pansexual
Really really struggling with this,"I have no term except pansexuality to describe my orientation simply because it is so random, confusing, and unstable. It can be anyone, at anytime, and at one moment it can be intense, and the next moment it will seem as if it never happened. I am an open minded person, but the lack of stability in my sexuality has driven me close to insanity and I have suffered from depression and suicidal thoughts for some time.  I don't feel like I belong anywhere, with the gay community, with the trans community, with the straight community, even the bi community. ",pansexual
13 and Pansexual,"Hey guys! This is my first time posting to Reddit, and I thought that this was a good place to start. I'm 13 and I think that I identify as pansexual but I am still quite confused. It's hard being open to the world, and every time I say that's I'm pan to someone, I wait for them to ask me if I have sex with pans. Anyways, the point of me posting about this is that I wanted to ask people a question. I don't really 100% know if I'm pan, bc I am attracted to all genders/sexualities yet for some reason I tend to be more 'nervous' around females and I become more self conscious. It might just be the whole stigma surrounding boys and girls and such, but I have noticed that I tend to sometimes notice females allot more then I notice men. But I am still open to all relationships no matter their gender or sexuality, as I wouldn't turn down someone just because of their gender/sexuality.",pansexual
Did anyone notice the Deadpool emojis? There's a unicorn :3,,pansexual
Showing my pride even cod :D,,pansexual
"I found out that I was pansexual, I have been so happy, but I need some help coming out to my parents, can someone please help?","Around 2 weeks ago, I found out I was pan and I was so happy, I am not going into details but I have a simple question, if I come out to people a bad idea or a good idea, my best friends know but I am scared to tell my parents, they're christian and they might get mad (they're not like parents of Leelah Alcorn but they're still quite homophobic). I need some help.",pansexual
Looking for interviewees to discuss pan/bi labels and bi=binary debate,"Hey folks,

I'm working on a piece for Diva magazine (divamag.co.uk) about pan vs bi labels and the bi = binary debate. I'm short on female/female-spectrum pan interviewees and wondered if anyone here might be interested... Let me know! Cheers. Lottie. charlottedingle@gmail.com",pansexual
I just proved to myself that I am in fact pansexual,"Male, Teenager.

--

I have believed that I am pan for 2 years. My friends often joke about me having sexual relations with a table, and all is good. Over the last couple of days, have found myself questioning whether I am Pansexual, Bisexual or Heterosexual (I seriously doubt I am Homosexual). Well, long story short I realised I have had a crush on a female and a Transexual (Male to Female), both purely because of personality ^^Okay, ^^the ^^straight ^^female ^^looks ^^really ^^pretty, ^^but ^^whatever. I actually ended up asking out the Trans, and I am now a happy pansexual in a relationship I guess!


--


Am I a pansexual, or do I still count as Bi?",pansexual
Almost absolutely sure I'm pan,"Hey, so I made a introduction post, here: https://www.reddit.com/r/pansexual/comments/43ey52/so_uhh_hey_looks_like_im_pan/, yesterday (maybe 2 days ago?), I'm like 99% sure I'm pan. However, I do have a problem. I'm not as attracted to men as women. Here's a breakdown.

Cis and trans women (no problems at all I'm most attracted to them),

Gender fluid or bigender (no problems at all here.)

agender, and non binary (again probably no problem, but I haven't ever really met with or dated someone non binary before)

Cis and trans men (I'm a little attracted, but not as much as the others)

I realise gender is a huge spectrum and that these are just some of them.",pansexual
"So uhh... hey, looks like i'm pan.","Hey ☺, so... I realised i'm pan. My name is Rain and I'm transgender and pansexual. For the longest time I was straight, then I thought I was lesbian, and now I realise I like all genders equally. So... Hi. 😂",pansexual
"How is ""Pansexual"" not an offensive term?","As an example. Say someone is born a male, but has transitioned to a female. They now identify as a female. Yet, when someone is attracted to that person, and they call themselves a ""pansexual"", instead of a ""bisexual"" ""lesbian"" ect. Arent they basically saying that this person IS NOT a female like they prefer, but something else instead? Im confused as to the logic of this. Even if someone is born with both genitalia. How does being bi sexual not cover people who are attracted to them as well?",pansexual
sex repulsion? i'm not sure? help?,"hello hi reddit.
so, i went to google first and typed in a hundred different searches with no luck so i thought i'd turn to this little sub-reddit for some advice.
i'm not sure how to word this exactly, but i think i might be experiencing some level of sex repulsion. i'm currently not in a relationship (but i do have feelings for a close friend) and have casual sex every few months or so. i've always been perfectly fine with hooking up and it's never been a problem for me. a couple months back i was hooking up with someone when it happened for the first time. i felt disgusting, i wanted this guy to stop touching me, i started crying during foreplay, and i just laid there choking back my tears wanting it to end while he finished. after the nightmare ended i sat in my bedroom crying, shaking, and so confused. nothing like that had ever happened before and it terrified me.
i steered away from sex for awhile after that because i was scared. i ended up hooking up with a friend and it went smoothly to which i was very relieved. but the other night i dipped my toes back in the water only to find those same feelings of disgust coming back in a different way. foreplay was fine, no big deal. but the second it turned into actual penetration i felt sick to my stomach and wanted to throw him off of me and make it all stop. i took some deep breaths and told myself to chill out and managed to calm down, but i'm confused.
has anyone else ever gone through this? i feel broken and weird and i don't know what to do to fix this. ",pansexual
"New to Van, where to hang as a Pan?","Hey I'm now new to Vancouver, where are the good spots?
Any bars/clubs that cater to bi/pan/Trans etc?

Also if you live in Van, wanna join me to see the Deadpool premier?",pansexual
Ace or pan,"Ok so I just found this sub (honestly didn't know there were subs for gender/sexualities) and I have a question.

Am I ace or pan? 

Like, I've only ever been in one relationship but I never really felt anything for the other person (I broke it off with them for this reason). And I never really see myself in a relationship, sexually or romantically. I have had crushes, but those are cut short when I find out the person is a jerk/shallow. Sometimes I think I have a crush on a friend but I'm not really sure? Idk its hard to explain.

I mean I do masturbate but I never think of anyone or watch porn (tbh porn is funny, I just watch to laugh lol). 

So can y'all help me out? Or is more info required?",pansexual
Watching The Expanse and noticed something near the end of episode two in the bottom left:,,pansexual
"Oh tinder, you've outdone yourself.",,pansexual
How is a 16 year old guy like me supposed to find a guy to date?,"Looks like it would only be acceptable for me to date girls, even though I have a preference toward men and non-binaries.",pansexual
I think my Pusheen is Pansexual,,pansexual
On Questioning,"Ever since I was a little girl, I always envied the little boys. I lived in a place where all that I was exposed to was straight, and I was jealous that the little boys would eventually be able to choose their spouse out of the female population. I thought that girls were so pretty and graceful that it was easy to see who you would want to marry.

Ridiculous kid logic, I know, but the thought remains true. I was jealous that the little boys could be attracted to girls.

I grew up a bit, and towards the end of elementary school, I realized that I was in fact attracted to boys. And in middle school I learned about how some people are gay. I was honestly quite intrigued by this. I didn't know anyone that was gay, and I didn't truly know how any of that worked. And the more that I learned, the more that I realized that that's something that I've felt all along. Why I thought girls were so pretty and why I was so jealous of the little boys.

But I liked boys, so I pushed the idea away. I couldn't be gay. I liked boys.

It wasn't until the end of middle school that I learned that it was possible to like both genders. I had heard stories of people that are bisexual, and my thoughts were ""Yes! That's what I am!""

But that didn't feel completely right. I wasn't ever attracted to people because of their body parts and looks. I always liked people because they were smart or kind or funny. Sure, I appreciated appearance, but I was never truly attracted to someone because of it. 

Then I finally learned about pansexuality. Attraction to personalities. I didn't realize it at first, but it perfectly described me. I began to identify as pan, but only to close friends because I still lived in a place where LGBT+ people are barely tolerated. 

I identified that way for a while, and I still do, but since then, I started dating a guy that's perfect for me. I started losing interest in everyone but him. Including girls. He began to make me question my sexuality even more. Maybe I was just straight the entire time and just making a big deal of things because I was unsure.  

I still don't know who I am, or who I'm attracted to, or if I should even care at this point. My boyfriend and I don't plan to break up, and if I never date again does it matter? Do I really need to know if I'm pansexual if I'm going to stay with him?",pansexual
"Gaby Dunn: ""Polyamorous, Pansexual, and Proud"" (x-post from r/polyamory)",,pansexual
I just need to write some thoughts out.,"So. I've only within the past year begun to identify with being pansexual. I've always sorta known I was bi, but never explored it or ""came out"" in any way. Most people likely assume I'm straight. I knew I wasn't straight, but hadn't taken the time to actually sort out and 'label' my feelings and attractions. 

I am a cis woman, married to a cis man who was my highschool sweetheart. We're in our late 20s, and started dating halfway through highschool. We are in a monogamous relationship and have both said we'd be too jealous to try anything else. So that's fine and easy. I love my husband dearly. I've only been with other cis ""men"" (really, boys not men at that age, Lol) before my husband. 

So determining what my sexuality is isn't exactly relevant or important in my life, but I want to sort it out for myself. I think I'm pansexual. I'm like 90% sure. Unless there's something I'm missing, I've finally figured it out. I find myself sexually attracted to anyone. I think I saw someone wrote ""hearts not parts"" and it really resonated with me. Bodies are different in all sorts of ways, and while I have preferences, nothing is a deal breaker. I think everyone has preferences though right? I mean blonde vs brunette, short vs tall, broad vs lean, etc. I find myself attracted to anyone, not just cis people, which I think it's what stops me from being comfortable saying bisexual. It just doesn't feel right for me. 

I feel weird actually saying I'm pansexual though. Admitting it (admitting isn't the right word, but whatever) to myself and my husband was easy, but I don't think I'm going to ""come out"" as pansexual. On one hand, I really don't need to. The plan is to never have to date again, so it's kind of a useless piece of information. Also, I don't want to potentially cause any issues for no reason. My mom probably wouldn't care, but I know it would make my dad really uncomfortable. We've had a shaky relationship in the past, so I don't need the stress of causing more tension there. 

Also, I feel guilty using the term pansexual when I've had absolutely none of the struggles of the lgbt+ community. Since everyone probably assumes I'm straight (since I've never said otherwise and it's pretty much the default) and I'm in a monogamous heterosexual relationship, my life has been simple and comfortable in that regard. I've never been shamed or ridiculed for my preferences. I've never been disowned or hurt because of my choice in partner. My husband and I naturally conceived our children. We had no trouble getting married. I just don't feel like I ""belong"" in that community because I'm not living any of it in my life. I recognize that I have a lot of privilege concerning my sexual history and life and I don't want to claim a part of something I don't deserve? I feel like if I say I'm pansexual and make it a ""thing"" to come out then I'm making the conversation about me.. It just feels selfish. 

So that's where I am with all that. I dont even know if all that made sense. I just needed to get it out. Thoughts/advice/concerns?

Thanks. :)",pansexual
Soooo....I'm Pansexual! :),"I know that this is one of those things where it's strange to be telling the internet (where I don't know anyone) such a personal thing, but in all honesty, I'm the only one who knows this about myself and it simply just feels good to write it down and tell the world ~ not because it's my sexuality really, but because I want to celebrate my discovery of something important about myself and my no longer state of being slightly confused. I've always questioned why do people who are not straight feel inclined by society to announce their sexuality ~ if straight people don't ""have"" to announce such things, we don't ""have"" to either, (in short, people who are straight should also be announcing their sexuality, so that equality forms ~ at least in my opinion ~ so that not only non-straight people are announcing that they're ""different"" ~ there will instead be no ""difference"" and everyone will feel natural and there will be less insecurity for certain people) but, in my case at least, it's a personal thing where I'm not really sure, I just feel like announcing it ~ again, not because I want to announce my sexuality per se, but because I want to announce a discovery of myself and to share my happiness :) Thanks for being here to celebrate with me haha :)",pansexual
"Short-handing my orientation away from pan, and being presumed ""easy"". [x-post with r/bisexual]","I just wanted to throw this out there and see if anyone else has had similar experiences. I'm 28 [cis m / San Francisco] and have identified as pan since 22. Most of the times I've used the word ""pan"", people don't know what I'm talking about, or have a skewed perception, so I've found it's easier to just say ""I'm queer"" or ""I like both"" (if it comes up at all) and avoid being forced into an educator role.

That said, when people think you're bi, or think you're pan, it seems like they assume you must be hypersexual, attracted to everyone, and quietly hoping for a mixed-gender orgy at all times - along with other stereotypes, like ""so you're just a (confused, immature) bisexual who wants to feel like a special snowflake"". Has anyone else experienced this brand of stereotyping as well?

For me, the opposite of those presumptions has actually been true - when I was a young teenager, I thought I was straight and was attracted mostly to a wide variety of girls. As I aged and became more intimate with the true nature of my own sexuality, my tastes became narrower and narrower, and now I am one of the pickiest people I know. There are very few people - men, or women - to whom I'm attracted. So for me, being *capable* of arousal with cis males, cis females, and everything between actually made it harder to find partners who *do* arouse me.

If anyone else has dealt with this brand of stereotyping and is willing to share their experience, I'd be grateful.

Edit: My first gild! Thank you, kind stranger!",pansexual
"Just updated facebook to say ""interested in men and women""","I'm not really ""out"", some of my friends know, my boyfriend kind of gets it, but definitely not my family or their friends. I still don't feel like bringing it up because why poke the sleeping monster when I'm dating a dude and my family thinks I'm straight? Changing my facebook status is like a tiny rebellious act to me because no one is likely to come across it any time soon, but it feels awesome to have finally put that there. It took a lot of stress and anxiety in my life to get comfortable putting that there, if I had brought home anything but a cisdude I would not have been able to procrastinate this conversation that long. I'm slowly working on getting my religious family into LGBT friendly territory, but I'm still terrified of taking that plunge. So cheers to baby steps I guess? 

Sidenote: I wish there was a better way to express genders and sexualities on fb profiles :P ",pansexual
Pansexuality&amp;Sexual Liberation,"Do you think sexual liberation comes with being pansexual? I don't think so but I'm having an argument with a friend of mine who does. Like, just because youmre pansexual does not mean you're sexually liberated, right? Right? Am I insane?",pansexual
Hiya!,"I'm just an awkward person who loves to talk to people.^^ So, if you don't mind talking to a half-Jewish girl who loves everyone, I'm your girl. ",pansexual
New to pansexuality,"Recently, I've been exploring my sexuality, and in doing this I've discovered pansexuality. It feels right, but so did demisexuality (at first). What are some good sources that can help me explore pansexuality more?",pansexual
I don't know what i am,"I'm agender teenager who doesn't know who they like. I've really only had one crush in my life, who was female, and since then i've never had another person I've felt romantically attracted to (im also asexual). I don't know what i am because I do find non-binary people, some males, and some females cute but I've never really had a romantic attraction to them. Soooo I'm very confused",pansexual
Date app PRO TIP: Just put pansexual in your write up.,Putting Pansexual in your profile for your dating app is just so much easier I find. The right people tend to message.,pansexual
Need help figuring shit out,"Hi, I'm a 23 years old autistic MtF. Since my early teenage years I've considered myself asexual since it makes the most sense. I don't find anything appealing with watching porn, and I haven't ever been able to masturbate. The sexual stuff just isn't there for me.

Now I'm transitioning and have been four months on estrogen, and while what I've written above is still true there's something new that has made me start to question things. I've found that if I let my mind wander to a scenario where I'm imagining myself really close to someone - like in a shower or cuddled up in bed on a cold winter day - it stirs up something in me, and it feels good.

Note that this only works if I think about it in a really ""squinting"", abstract way, the magic is lost if I go into more detail. It just feels like something more than an intellectual idea though since I've never quite felt this emotion before. I'm sorry if this doesn't make much sense, I'm really confused myself and could use some thoughts. Oh, and I posted it here since it doesn't matter what gender of the person I'm imagining is and I've considered myself panromantic before.",pansexual
Can I consider myself pansexual?,"So I'm female...
This is somewhat irrelevant info, but I don't really feel like I identify with any gender. Rather, I just kinda do what I do and like what I like as a human.

Anyways, I have a boyfriend of over a year whom I care a lot about and am sexually and emotionally and mentally attracted to. I am also, however very attracted to women (and I mean like biologically female: gender identification/femininity isn't really relevant to me). I have never been with a woman and didn't really start to discover or be okay with this fact 'til I was already in this relationship.

If I haven't ever been with anyone who isn't a male can I even be pansexual? I feel like I am and could see myself being in love with females or males (who identify with any gender, really) but I haven't ever given it a try because I'm sort of just now discovering this about myself. I also don't really plan on venturing out as of now because I am in a committed relationship and intend on staying in it.
I'm just confused on how to feel about all of this I guess. Thought maybe you guys would have some wise words!
Thanks babies &lt;3

(And in case anyone was wondering, my boyfriend knows I'm attracted to both males and females- I'm super open with him about all this stuff)

Edit: Just wanted to add that it's not the label that I care about. More so I am unsure if I can confirm my pansexuality without ever having a non heterosexual experience.",pansexual
Nobinary are the cutest!,I'm Pansexual and I have a slight preference to Nonbinary  people BECAUSE THEY ARE SO ABSOLUTELY CUTE I DIE A LITTLE. I just wanted to say that and its okay to have a preference right?,pansexual
Thoughts on Pan vs Bi?,"As everyone experiences sexuality differently, it follows that everyone has a different perspective on what the labels mean. What is the difference between bi and pan to you?

From my understanding, bisexual is an attraction to two or more genders. Some people say it's just liking binary cis people but most who define it as that aren't bi so I don't think a lot of bi people feel that way (plus that delegitimizes trans men an men and trans women as women).

Pansexual is attraction to all genders, but for me, (I am panromantic, demisexual) I see it as attraction regardless of gender. Though I know that not all pan people have that particular apathy towards gender.

So for me, pan and bi are very different (one being attraction to a variety of genders and one being attraction regardless). What are your thoughts?",pansexual
May you all feel this fabulous today!,,pansexual
[AMA Request] Would anyone be up to try and get Tim Miller and Ryan Reynolds to do an AMA for our community?,"I know this is an action movie, but I'm curious to see how we are represented. Plus anything that can shed light on Pansexual issues is a good thing. 

If you are up for the idea, tweeting Ryan or Tim would help. It seems I can't do formal AMA requests without at least 20 people for a celebrity. 

I know I've done a few Deadpool posts recently, but I'm just tickled purple yellow an pink that a major movie studio is interested in bringing representation to us. Yes this move is an economical one, but that is also part of the process of wider representation.",pansexual
Non-binary people,"OMG I can't get over how cute non-binary people are. I love them. 

Anybody else really like non-binary folks? :3",pansexual
"Little comment thread from an AMA from years ago. If you are into Community, or just want proof that there are people that ""get it"" read on.",,pansexual
Hearts not Parts (not really),"I know us pansexuals are known for our acceptance of any gender/Non gender and love for who people are, but shit. I HATE EVERYONE. The only people I actually want to date are my close friends. Everyone sucks, I'm sorry. Am I the only one here who feels this way?",pansexual
literally EVERYONE is attractive to me and its awkward because I want to bone them all,"26/F/polyamorous in an open relationship with husband and girlfriend. Recently ""outed"" myself as pansexual/polyamorous and it makes sense that I have always felt this way.  

Problems? I am literally attracted to everyone. Every. Single. Person has something attractive about them that makes me want to f*ck them. Because of this, I'm extremely quiet and introverted because it would make it awkward for me to ever try to act on these thoughts. 

Does anyone else get this? Is it ""normal"" for pansexuality?",pansexual
"Movie Deadpool is pansexual, confirmed by director",,pansexual
Your Stories - a pro-feminist vox pop work - is looking for submissions,"Hi all,

A local theatre company in Brisbane (Australia) is putting together a show about peoples' experiences living in a society dominated by gender and sexual binaries, and it's going to be primarily composed of stories that have been sent to them. We're doing a short, confidential, online vox-pop through google forms asking for either a short story about your life or for a letter you never wrote. It takes less than five minutes and contributes to pro-feminist exposure. This process is open to everyone and anyone of any gender or sexuality, indeed the more the merrier.

*Full Disclosure: If you flick through my reddit account, you'll see I am a cissexual white middle-class male. While I did the programming I am not involved in the writing in any way and do not read the responses. I assure you that these submissions are confidential and will go towards creating a pro-feminist, sex-positive piece by queer authors in a major local festival.*

If you're interested in participating or know someone who might be, the link is here:

http://goo.gl/forms/mH429HlnRj

Thanks for your time.",pansexual
Overwhelmed,So I am wondering if this makes any sense to anyone. I can't stop being me no matter how much I want to color inside the lines. I have been in the military and worked with law enforcement so that reinforces the need to conform to the rules that others have set for me. I have never really seen how my friends and family see the world. I myself despite all things but my sexuality am black and white but when it comes to what attracts me I just can't seem to describe it. I accept people for where they are at and do not judge or have any real expectations. I have never been driven by what people look like. I only seem to see the heart and soul of the person. The person's mind is what keeps me captivated. I have problems accepting who I am because I feel that I am so different from the people I meet. When I hear them talk I just realize how much of an outsider I really feel. Does anybody else here feel alone because of our sexual identity? I mean my close friends know that I am pansexual and so do my parents but it can be difficult on relationships when no matter how much you try to explain it when you yourself aren't quite sure how this works but still know that you are different. That doesn't even begin to describe the disaster that is me when I am in a relationship. I was in a relationship with a girl that was bisexual and it was a disaster. She knew I was pansexual but yet insisted that I see the world from her point of view because I still could sleep with both genders so she felt that this made me bisexual. The ramblings of my mind go into overdrive trying to figure out my place in this world and for some reason there is a lot of fear in not knowing my place or knowing people like myself.,pansexual
So... Why wasn't I told that Deadpool is Pansexual?,"He's not my favourite superhero, but he's still super cool. Maybe doesn't help with the stereotype that Pansexuals are hypersexual.. But I'll give that a pass because Deadpool is plain Cray Cray.",pansexual
Is it normal to have preferences?,"I've recently realised I'm probably pansexual, but I'm not sure. I guess I prefer those who are female, except not feminine men (in that case I prefer masculine). Is this type of preference and stuff at least somewhat common amongst pansexual people or not really. 

Also disclaimer: I'm still quite young so this is based mostly off attraction rather than sexual experience (unless jacking off counts lol)",pansexual
I bought my wife a new scarf for autumn to celebrate our pride and love for each other.,,pansexual
"I'm really conflicted and upset right now. I need some advice, please...","17yo cis girl here. A little info: My mother is open and accepting of me, and she's the only one in my family I've outed to, other than my lesbian cousin and her mom(aunt). The rest of the family is either homophobic, have overly rejecting old-timey catholic values, or both. Another note, I'm out to all of my friends, and am actually very close friends with two other fellow pan girls!

Anyway... My mom and I were talking one day, and it somehow went to the topic of my sexuality. She said to me, ""I don't think you know what you are.""

Wait, what? I of course asked her to clarify. She then said, ""I'm pretty sure you don't know what you are yet. You say this is what you are, and I'm not saying it's not valid, but... I urge you to not identify as something so quickly until you date someone of the opposite sex.""

I'm absolutely steamed. This is *who I am.* Now that I've discovered my sexuality in the last few years, I've felt more comfortable with myself and being in my own skin. So what if I haven't had the opportunity to date someone of the *opposite sex* yet? This doesn't change who I am!

I've explained it to her so many times... She's supportive of me, but just doesn't seem to understand. I'm crying hot, angry tears and don't know how to stop them. This is the worst. I've already explained everything that I can to her, and it's hard for me that she doesn't understand... She's the biggest part of my life right now, so what am I supposed to do if she can't *completely* accept me?

**TL;DR- My mom seems to think that I'm not allowed to identify as pan until I date someone that is not a born male. Thus, I'm so angry that I'm currently sobbing.**",pansexual
Bisexual or Pansexual resources?,"One of my cutie baby bi friends asked, and I realized I didn't have any.  So do they exsist, or are they eluding me somehow?  I've been to /r/bisexual , /r/lgbt , and etc.  But didn't see anything bi or pan specific links on sidebars.",pansexual
It's been a year since I came out as pansexual!,,pansexual
Stay positive and believe in you.,"I came out 2 years ago as pansexual. I was 26 at the time. I just have to share that at the time, everything felt like it was working against me. My parents had a strong reaction, it wasn't super positive, but it wasn't worst case scenario. Things are so much better now and I wouldn't have imagine such inner peace and calm. Just remember to stay true to you. Speak up when you need to and when you feel someone is treating you unfairly. Find a few great friends and allies and keep fighting. It does get better, this is not how your story ends. Sharing positive vibes since 1987.",pansexual
Couple Year Pansexual here. Flood me with Questions!,"I know there's a few posts like this, but i'd like to give my few cents about pansexuality. I'm actually specifically Panromantic, Demisexual, but either way pansexual still works as a title.
If you have any questions about what it's like to be, etc etc, please do ask!
EDIT: I'll always be watching for replies, don't worry if you feel you are 'too late'",pansexual
My Struggles with pansexuality,"hello forum,

I am a 17y/o from SE England, and identify as pansexual. I have grown up in a small town where being LGBT was generally accepted, however it was just gay, bisexual or lesbian people in my town. so anything other was quite unheard of.

In the past couple years I considered myself as bisexual but when I realised that gender wasn't just a biological thing and was how you identify and how you feel as a person. This made me realise that I could love someone however they identified. From this point I had looked into this to realise this was a thing and found out the name.

Now I identify as pansexual, and it is a struggle coming out to new people because of the constant explaining that it isn't the same as bisexuality. (and that I don't have a kitchen equiptment fetish)
Another struggle is that their never seems to be anyone in my town or in towns around that are non-binary when it comes to gender. so it almost becomes a case of me being bisexual despite identifying as something else.

Thank you for reading. if anyone has some advice or wants to talk you can message me on kik: my username is dxmsellen.
-x-o-x-o-x-",pansexual
"I think it's time we start a PANdemonium! Let's talk flair, and r/pansexual decoration!","**OK all you lovely PANthers. I think this sub needs a little colour.**

**The last thing a pansexual reddit user is, is drab. In fact I think we're all a little weird and I love ya!**

SO I am officially opening some suggestions for images for flair to decorate your username, and looking for suggestions to spruce up this sub.

Come on all! We love anything not dead and with a pulse, as mentioned by someone else, we are the wildcards in a deck of Uno.

We are weird, inclusive and the funnest bunch around.

**So here are my suggestions**

*Take all the flags available for sexual and gender identities, but go further than that.
* Include some less used pansexual and other identity logos.

*Anything fun that starts with ""Pan"" and is a thing should be flair option.*

* Panther
* Panfrying
* Pantsuits
* Pantyhose  (for the fabulous of course).
* Pantone colour chit (shut up I'm still at heart a bit of a graphic design snob).
* Pandas
etc Also dibs on Panther... ok you all can have one too.. maybe comes in pink yellow cyan black or overlaid with the flag
* Unicorns using appropriate colours
* A chameleon, because we can kinda be anywhere (could also be overlaid with flag colours)

*Anything that relates to being a ""wild card"".*

* The joker card
* Uno Wild card (Seriously for the one who said this before I can't stop laughing at that comment).

*Popular culture references*

* Charlie Day's face from It's always sunny in Philadelphia (specifically from the episode when he yells ""I'm The WILD CARD!!!"" and jumps out the back of a moving van) ... actually dibs on charlie ;).
* Dean's face from Community (as his character is Pansexual).
* Miley Cyrus's face

**Need suggestions of not white people**

*Random little logos*

* Rainbow
* Rainbow with the Pan colours
* Small heart with pan colours
* A cog with X over it (not parts, get it?)

Would also like some suggestions that include people not exclusively identifying as female or male. Because everyone from girls and boys that dress up as each-other, to trans people, to the Genderless needs to be included. So I would defer to them for these suggestions. Admiral Akbar's face could be funny to some, but it can be terribly offensive to others. I don't identify as a ""trap"" thus I don't get to make that call. I would happily use Charlie Day's face to represent myself, but only I am able to make that call. So be conscious of your suggestions.

Remember we're all weird, so lets make this place fun, silly and most of all inviting. Some people might be deep in the closet, some people might be just here for some laughs, but we all win when are positive together. ",pansexual
I made a pansexual flag theme for my keyboard :D,,pansexual
"Comfortable and experienced Pansexual guy here, maybe I can help field some questions","Pansexual male here, very experience, and currently dating a guy.
I've dated women, MtoF trans people, gender queer, other gender and non binary. I've had few serious relationships, but I don't fault it to my sexuality. My sister is straight and she has the same dating issues as me.


I know understanding your own sexuality is hard. But take it from me... 

Rule number one, you define what pansexual (or any label you choose or not choose) means to you. 

Number two, no one can define it for you.

Number three, when you feel you don't sit on any end of any spectrum, the world is your oyster and take it as a blessing. Because yes, some days you do get to ""choose"" what you like and other days you don't choose, and other days you just don't know. 

Number four, rule number three may not apply universally.

Number five, and this is the most important rule, be yourself, because you can only be you. When I was first experimenting, I put on a more stereotypical effeminate character a few times, it wasn't me. Nor was being a beefy stereotypical masculine type. If walking around with a tree costume asking Australians if there is a garden somewhere to take up root is comfortable to you, then be that. Because with 7 billion people, statistically there are at least a few people that dig that. I put right on my dating apps that I like weird people, because they are awesome.  

Number six, there isn't any more rules, because unfortunately it is up to you to rationalize what makes sense and what you like and don't like. Moreover, how other sexual identities understand themselves likely don't apply because of how fluid it can be. That said, I've found bits and pieces from many sources about known gender and sexuality types can be relatable, when you piece it together as a whole. Perfect example of how different Pansexuality can be, I feel I have spheres of preferences that can be as specific as a body oder, emotional, dates, cuddles, bed fun etc. Generally I prefer Trans body smells, cuddles with Women, and taking a sub role with Men. But those preferences are often found unreliable, as I am frequently pleased in unexpected combinations of spheres. At least.. that is how I rationalize it, and I never know what the future holds.

Yes the village can sometimes be scary. It isn't, but it's not easy when you feel you are forced into one sexuality type. Just remember, a lot of this is self inflicted. Yes there are people that will stick this idea into your head, I know this because I have a very good friend whom genuinely believes I will end up fully Gay, from his own experiences. But only you are in control of you, not them. Overcoming this, makes any Village show it's true colours, a place of welcoming.

Last bit of advice, when you feel ready, put right on your profile for Tinder, OkCupid, whatever app you use that you are Pansexual. Because if they aren't ok with that from the profile, hiding it and reviling it later wont work either. I put right on my profile that I am (and I'm paraphrasing here) Open, pansexual, and Trans friendly. The guy that I am seeing was drawn to me because of this. He had a limited understanding of what pan was at the time, but his curiosity only drew him closer as I explained. We've been dating 7 weeks now.

So with that said, I'm sure many people are scared, worried, confused, or even just curious. But maybe I can help. Please ask me anything and I will try to answer. Please keep this thread a safe space for everyone. ",pansexual
So many Pan colors in this music video !,,pansexual
Absolutely cannot accept that I am pansexual..,"Yes, I will say it online. Yes, I am subscribed to /r/genderqueer and frequently lurk it. And have said I am pansexual there.

But I cannot accept it myself, in reality. I have tried talking with this about my current therapist, but she isn't very .. specialized in this sort of stuff. I have talked about it with my partner but as I tried to say the words, I just felt .. incredibly stupid, and insignificant, and a great deal of self-hatred. I was raised in a conservative Christian family, though I do not live with them, I visit sometimes I hear comments about how ""being gay is just wrong"" and how ""[queer] people are just gross."" Being GQ/non-binary, and pansexual, I almost burst out crying hearing my family say this about me ..

Anyway, has someone had a similar experience? How did you get over being stuck in denial/self-hatred and accepting who you are?",pansexual
"Learning new words, good by bisexual hello...?","I am 29, I have had a long confusion about my sexuality. I realized I liked girls around sixth or 7th grade, maybe earlier.  I knew I liked boys in maybe fifth grade. Though as I got older and my first male experience didn't pan out and I had my first girlfriend, I thought I was a lesbian. That lasted from 11th grade till freshmen year of college. Then I went back to being bisexual, and loving cis men and cis women equally. Now that I have gotten older and work with the public in retail, I have found their are more then just one gender and three sexualities.  I find I like (all depending on each individual, not all in one catagory) cis men and women, some trans men and women, transvestites (think of the comedian Eddie Izard) androgynes women (like Ruby Rose, I think that's her name) and and I guess gender bending women, like masculin but still retains some femininity. I also like really masculine men, like the lumberjack look.  

Now with all that in mind, am I pansexual or polysexual? I don't really know... Can you help me out.  Not that it truly matters, I have been with the same man for 7 years, but it would be nice to know.

Thanks so much",pansexual
"Thoughts on ""gender blind""","I've seen some discussion online about gender-blindness  and its relation to pansexuality

some people have been upset that a lot of people explain pan as having gender-blind attraction. They don't personally define it that way nor do they feel gender blind themselves. What do you all think? 

I'm curious to see what different sides of the Internet have to say. Also have any of you taken issue with the term ""gender blind"". I've heard some critique and am interested in other people's opinions. 

Edit: wording (autocorrect)

",pansexual
Staying true to myself,"Recently I have had so many life changing things happen. It's kind of freaking amazing. I have also come to the conclusion that I need to be true to myself. I was always really good at hiding my interests, hobbies and even the way I dressed because I have always had this paralyzing fear of not being accepted. I have come to terms that style wise I am like Hyde (from that 70's show) if he were a blonde girl that is. I have come to accept that I love video games and manga, I like going to cons in cosplay. I love playing the shit out of the drums. And at times I am gender fluid but most of all I am a pansexual. Holy crap it felt good to say all of that. ",pansexual
I have trouble believing that not everyone is pan. Help?,"It's really hard for me to see non-pan people and accept that they're right about their own orientation. A part of me thinks that everyone is pan, and those who deny it are close-minded or just haven't realized it yet, even though I know that's not true. For me, realizing I was pan was a natural part of growing up and learning about myself, so it's easy to think that other people just haven't had that epiphany yet.

Do you have any tips to help me get through this mental block? I feel like a bad person right now, and I'd love to have my view changed.",pansexual
"I'm not pansexual, but I've realized recently that all pansexuals love Nicki Minaj",,pansexual
Introducing /r/LGBT(+)Weddings!,"Hello! I thought some of you might be interested in the newly formed /r/LGBTWeddings.  

This new sub was created a space for queer people to share wedding advice, questions, pictures, articles- anything! While same-sex (or otherwise queer) weddings are mostly just like any other, there are a few unique challenges and practical issues surrounding planning a same-sex wedding, and not a lot of resources to help. Same sex marriage is new and there's no blueprint to follow! /r/LGBTWeddings hopes to become a place where people can figure it all out together as a community.

Additionally, after so many years of hiding, it's so lovely to see queer folks publicly celebrating their commitments to each other! /r/LGBTWeddings will also be a place to post pictures and recaps of your wedding, your friends' or family member's weddings, or others you might find around the web.

Note that we are not limited to just same-sex weddings or people planning same-sex weddings: we want to hear from everything and anything involved with being on the LGBT/GSRM/queer/QUILTBAG spectrum and weddings. Are you a bi or pan person feeling ennui over heternomativity at your opposite-sex wedding? Come commiserate! Not sure how to dress your genderqueer bridal party member? Ask the experts! Having trouble explaining your polyamorous lesbian triangle commitment ceremony to your grandpa? We'll help you strategize!

Come check us out! All are welcome :)",pansexual
Confused af,"Hi. So i have this gay friend who has been going out with guys only since i can remember but lately he confessed to me that he's been going out with this girl, this is the first time actually and it's not your typical going out. He told me it's the first time he felt that way with a person. I mean deep shit. Anyway the thing is he's confused af all over again about his sexuality. So i told him he might be pan or bi. Anyway am i right or wrong? I dont wanna confused his sexuality also. ",pansexual
Can I be pansexual?,"Basically can I be pansexual? I like all gender but prefer feminine people. Does this make me pansexual or not? I like men but only if they are a bit feminine. I do not like muscle body builders of masculine men. Does this stop me being pansexual? 

Thanks  ",pansexual
Does anyone know the pantone numbers for the pan flag colors?,wiki has the bi flag's listed but I can't seem to find any info for the pan flag.,pansexual
Miley Cyrus confirms she is pansexual,,pansexual
"Miley Cyrus says she's 'pansexual,' leaving fans very confused",,pansexual
16M confused asf fml,"So like I've come to terms that I am pansexual. But here's the thing. When it comes to relationships, I'm only interested in some women because I think it's more important and deserves more attention and I feel it needs to be considered more. But when it comes to having sex, it's so weird. Male, female, transgender, like I'm always interested. I also have absolutely no standards when it comes to it. Big, small, skinny fat, old, young, I probably want to have sex with everyone. Am I just horny a lot?? Like what is this shit? Why do I want to have sex with everyone?? Is this normal???",pansexual
Survey for pansexual/LGBTQIA+ people: what do you want out of healthcare?,"You may remember an earlier survey I posted about LGBTQIA+ experiences with healthcare providers. Pansexuals face some unique challenges in getting high-quality care from providers. Well, this is a survey I'm helping a medical school classmate with that looks at it from the other direction: what do you WANT from healthcare and healthcare providers? What's your wishlist? We're hoping to help educate current and future docs about what patients would like to see. This is text-heavy, but probably will take less than 15 minutes. 

https://redcap.iths.org/surveys/?s=YPCYYJCEC8

If you have questions or comments about it, please feel free to ask me! I'm technically a co-researcher on this one (and bi/pan myself) and I'd be interested to know what you think. If you participated in the last survey, we still absolutely want to hear from you on this one. And please do share it if you think you know people who might be interested!",pansexual
Pansexual vs Bisexual: The difference?,,pansexual
Apps?,Has anyone found any good apps to meet people on or just socialize with other queer people? I have yet to find a good one.,pansexual
Im confused about my sexuality :(,"I am genderqueer, but was born female and go by female pronouns. I am 15. And since I was 10 ive been confused about my sexuality. It kind of haunts me everyday that I just cant tell what I like. In 6th grade I started identifying as bisexual, in a more carefree kind of way. As I realized it wasnt a face and that I was attracted to more than just females and males, I discovered the sexuality ""pansexaul"" and thought that defined my sexuality pretty well. So from 7th grade until now thats what ive been going with. I only have one friend and he knows. I recently got into a break up with a boyfriend of 10 months. Im heartbroken yes but I think its a good oppurtunity for me to discover more about my sexuality. I know for 100% certainty im sexually attracted to all genders. Male, female, ftm, mtf, genderqueer, gender non binary, bigender, etc. But what im confused about is my romantic feelings. I know I can feel romantic feelings for a male, but its difficult for me to picture myself with a girl. I have extremely low self esteem and this had made me doubt myself. Ive been called a ""attention whore"" and ""special snowflake"" a lot for my sexuality, and now im beginning to wonder if maybe I am just doing it for attention, or maybe im really trying to surpress it. I honestly cant tell anymore. So, is it possible I can have feelings for girls but its just hard for me to imagine it? Or maybe im just sexually attracted to every gender but not romantically? And if I am only sexually attracted, can I still consider myself a pansexual? Or would I just be straight with some sexual kinks? Sorry if any of this is offensive to anyone, im just extremely confused. If i missused a gender or anything like that please tell me.",pansexual
"Seeking Cis Male Pansexual Participants for a Suffolk University Research Study (X-Post /r/lgbt, /r/queer, /r/bisexual, others)","Hi, /r/pansexual! My name is Anthony, I'm a research assistant at the University of Massachusetts Boston.

Working in conjunction with pan-affirmative researchers at Suffolk University in Boston, MA, I am looking for sexual minority men to participate in a study investigating psychological strengths and sexual health.

If you are a biologically-born male, over 18 years old, HIV-negative, identify with something other than heterosexual, and have experienced adversity in life, we would love to get the chance to interview you as part of this important research! Participants will be paid for their time and receive referrals to legal, mental health, or physical health services. 

If interested, get started by taking the 20-min online screener, then sign up to be interviewed at: www.surveymonkey.com/s/MensHealthStudyPhase1 

Participation in the study includes completing a 20-minute online screening to determine eligibility, and two anonymous interviews over Skype (using only audio, not video; interviews would be between 30-90 minutes long). 

All research has been approved by the human ethics committee (IRB) at Suffolk University. 

If you have any questions please PM me @ /u/UMB-RA or email me at MensHealthStudy@Suffolk.edu

Thanks!
",pansexual
"Please tell me about your experiences with healthcare providers--the good, the bad, and the clueless: 10 minute, anonymous survey by a queer medical student",,pansexual
Why is pansexuality always excluded from LGBT social apps? I'm always forced to pick bisexual or other.,Even Google marks it as incorrect.,pansexual
Just a note...,"To anyone coming out as pansexual to their friends (if its a serious situation then ignore this): always specify that you don't have sex with pans or that will come up in conversation. Here's an example. Thus is when I mentioned to some girls in my class.
Me: did you know I'm pansexual?
Girl 1: yeah
Girl 2: No! Thats sounds cool
Girl 3: huh. Do you have sex with pans! Lol
Girl 4: what does that mean
Me: it means I don't care about sex, only personality #heartsnotparts and no I don't have sex with pans
Girl 4: ha ha! *insert my name here* has sex with pans HEY EVERYONE *insert my name here* HAS SEXUAL INTERCOURSE WITH PANS
Me: *sigh*

Just as a kind of rule I alway include the fact I don't have sex with pans and I just wanted to let any pansexuals that didn't know about this little joke that the world knows of and warn them of it. ",pansexual
Pansexuality 101: It’s More Than ‘Just Another Letter’,,pansexual
Vote Democrat! We Support the Rights of All regardless of Sexual Orientation! More Info In Comments!,,pansexual
am i a bad pansexual?,am i a bad pansexual if how hot someone is plays into my attratcion? am i allowed to place such a high price on appearance?,pansexual
Anyone have 'types'?,"I haven't figured out whether I've got a type for women or nonbinary folks, but I've discovered that the men I find most attractive would probably pass really well as women after crossdressing.

Share with the world.",pansexual
I feel like I need to talk about my sexuality.,"First of all, this is mostly confusing because I'm in a committed, long term relationship. I'm a female, married to the guy I've been with for 5 years. When we started dating, I was a totally different person. I don't know if I was straight even then, but for religious reasons I didn't even consider anything else as a possibility. Now, I'm an adult with different feelings, less raging hormones, and no religious barricades on the way I view sex. I completely reject the notion of binary gender, and I don't feel like sexuality is a black and white issue.

Already being in a relationship when my views on sexuality and gender changed makes it kind of difficult to figure out how I really feel. In no way do I want to be with anyone else, I just kind of want to talk about it and figure out who I really am. For starters, the reason I think I am better described as pan than bi is because I don't care about gender at all. I don't care about genitals, identity, etc. of my current (or hypothetical) partner. Even my sexual attraction to people is not an attraction to their body, but to who they are as a person. When I am in a relationship, the reason I want to have sex is not to satisfy a physical urge, but the desire to bond emotionally with the person I have feelings for. 

It's really frustrating to try and explain this to people. A lot just don't understand that pansexuality exists. If I try to explain it, people will say I'm just bisexual and need to be a special snowflake, and talk about identifying as some made up, inanimate object gender. I just feel like, ""yeah, fuck me for actually feeling a certain way. Forget that there's a name for it and it's legitimately different than bisexual. I'll just not be anything you haven't already heard of, because I don't want to make you have to learn anything new."" 

My gender identity is confusing as well, and that's something I've never discussed with anyone, not even my husband. I don't want to make a big deal of it or make him feel awkward, but I still want to figure out who I am as a person. It's important to me, but I just don't know sometimes. I know I'm not trans. I sometimes even feel a bit of dysphoria when someone mistakes me for a guy on the internet or something. But I also don't really feel like a woman. Sometimes, I feel like everything about me should be the same, except I should have a penis. I have dreams where I'm a man all the time. I fantasize about being a man and having sex. It just feels right. I have a really short haircut and look boyish, and if I ever get a glimpse of myself in the mirror looking particularly manly, I'll get giggly and look at myself a little longer. But I don't have any bad feelings about the parts I do have. I like my boobs, I like my vagina. I guess I kind of wish I had it all. Maybe gender fluid is the best word, but I never feel totally one or the other. I always feel like both/neither. I don't know what to call myself, and I wish I did. ",pansexual
Confused?,"Hi. 

So, I'm 16, and really confused.
Here's the thing. I really do think I could be pansexual. I don't feel like I could discriminate or leave anyone out because of their gender when it comes to being able to love someone. 

But right now, I say I'm bi. Why would I do that? 

I'm weird like that. I wanna be sure. Until earlier this year, I called myself straight because I'd never been attracted to a girl. I didn't feel like I could say I was bi because what if I was wrong? Well, then I was attracted to a girl. And I've been attracted to them since then also. So I was like okay, that's at least two bases covered, I can say I'm bi now.

But I still don't think that's who I am. I feel like I'm pan. But I'm afraid to say it? Y'know? I've never been attracted to a non-binary person but I know I could be?

Do you think I should just get over it and say what I feel? Or should I keep saying I'm bi until I'm sure? 

So confused here.
",pansexual
"Gal here, need some advice about confidence approaching other gals?","Hey! This is my first post here, and I really need some advice.

I'm pansexual, and I have been for as long as I can remember.

But my awful mother, who was fairly abusive, told me that it was just a phase, and I shouldn't date any girls, because I'll just break her heart when she finds out I was just going through a phase.

10 years later, and I still fear entering a same sex relationship, because of this insecurity.

Can someone here give me some advice on how to overcome this insecurity, and become more self confident approaching the same sex?",pansexual
"Problem interacting with people, I think it might be my sexuality? [F28]","I've always had problems with finding and maintaining strong relationships (mostly friendships) because I think I might be pansexual.

Preamble: I am an empath so I tend to feel others very strongly and generally feel my way through life more than think through it. Most of the decisions I've made until now (career, love, hobbies) have been fear based (more so the latter) and I've wound up in a place where I've lost almost all of my friends, don't interact with my family as much as I should, and generally have a cloud of lies that follow me wherever I go. I am at a standstill with my studies because I feel like I don't belong in the program I'm enrolled in, and I have no job and I feel like this all comes back to me not being comfortable enough with my own self and sexuality to be able to connect with other people who share the same values as me.

I mean, I'm in my late twenties, I know people come out all the time and I know it's normal to question your sexuality for a long time before coming to a conclusion, but as of right now, the only person I can stand to be around who I actually feel comfortable with is a female friend who is bisexual (same age). I haven't mentioned this to her, and I don't want to because I know she has a crush on me and I don't feel like opening that door because I see her as like a mom to me. I don't know if I'd date a girl, although I made our with one once years ago, it didn't go very far because it felt unsatisfying.

I think it's just the vibe that I emanate to people. Because I'm an empath I can pick up on the moods of other people almost instantly (hasn't stopped me from making bad decisions or saying bad things - I can make mistakes often) and I notice that other people pick up on my vibe (which is very tied to my sexuality presence, by the way) and they either: a) come closer and engage with me on a sexual level, b) come closer and don't engage with me on a sexual level, c) notice when I'm sending out vibes that I are tied to my sexuality, then recoil when I try to get closer because they themselves are uncomfortable with their own sexuality, or d) recoil completely because my vibes are too much to handle and they don't want to give me ideas or they're scared of me.

Basically, I love and feel attraction for everyone (straights, trans, gay men, lesbians, bisexuals, queers) the last real relationship I was in I felt was love, despite being stifling, and since my breakup with him, which I predicted almost a year into our relationship, I've been struggling just to figure out who I am since then, have alienated almost everyone I know in the process. I would be talking to a counsellor instead of being on reddit, but I can't take advantage of that yet because school benefits don't start for me until September.

As I write this I don't feel comfortable knowing other people will eventually read it, and I don't want to make any conclusive statements, but I need structure in my life, I need to assert my identity, and I'm tired of feeling like I can't connect with people who understand, or better yet, with people who don't understand but who I can still connect with anyways.

Also, I need help finding a way to reign in my sexuality as this has got me into a lot of trouble. I try to please everyone on a social level and this has been taken advantage of many times. I was molested once when I was in grade six, basically scaring me away from sex until I was in university. I was raped when I was 21 because I didn't know what ""alarm bells"" were and what they meant until after the fact. Both these, and plenty other unsavoury sexual experiences were a result of me not being able to say no. Oh, did I mention my dad passed away when I was 16? That's OK, I've made peace with it, might be a moot point, but I feel it's significant in who I am at this point.

I think that being my ""flaming"" self makes others uncomfortable, and I don't want to do that, but I need to be comfortable in my own skin. Basically I need to learn how to pull my sex energy back because I've only just realised that I send signals out to people all the time, and I want to have some control in how others perceive me.

I think this is a stepping stone that I can place which will help me be more fluid and comfortable in my interactions with others and I can't reason it out myself because I don't know what I'm doing. I wish I was like those other people who can separate their mind from their heart, but I'm hopelessly emotional, and I can't think properly when my emotions are out of proportion.

I want this to be a step forward for myself, but I'm feeling so lost and need guidance from people who have a good grasp on sexuality and relationships to make an informed decision in owning myself and being good to others.

Carrying this ambiguity of being constantly judged is worse than I've ever done to anyone and I want to overcome it and find people who are on my side so I can move on and be with who I'm meant to be with and be who I'm meant to be.
Looking for: wisdom, practicality and sincerity.

Frightfully yours.

Tl;Dr I think I'm pansexual and I think it's getting in the way of me creating/maintaining healthy relationships",pansexual
"Pan-fam, I'm struggling.","So, maybe this would be better off in r/offmychest, but I don't really care, I feel the need to speak to an audience who probably (definitely) understands my current struggle on a personal level. So, as I have been out to my friends for quite some time, about two years now actually, I have for the most part gotten past all of the ""so what you're attracted to cook-ware hahaha"" bullshit we all go through, which is nice. However, because most of the people I choose to have flings with (with their knowledge of a lack of seriousness to the relationship of course, leading people on is shitty) have been male, I have been getting a lot of flack for my supposed lack of pan-ness. As if somehow because the people that I have chosen to be intimate with are of the opposite gender as of recently, I am now straight, or moreover always have been. I got used to my parents' ""straight until proven queer"" attitude towards the whole thing, but its very frustrating when friends refer to my sexuality as a ""high school phase"" simply because the people I've been attracted to recently haven't been of the opposite gender or gender non-binary people. Its becoming very difficult to keep my cool in these situations, how do y'all handle it??


Better question, how do I politely tell people to kindly mind their own fucking business about my sexuality??? Controlling the impulse to lose my shit at the next person who pretends to know my sexual preferences better than I do is incredibly exhausting. Send help or booze. Or both. ",pansexual
My shirt is pretty pan,,pansexual
Am I Pansexual Or Straight???,"Hey I'm a 16 year old girl. So here's the thing I have been attracted to males for as long as I can remember. It wasn't until I was 13 that I found females kinda hot too. Even She males could get me going. But every time I think of dating a girl I get uncomfortable with the idea. Yet I have a crush on my best friend WHO IS A GIRL!  I've told her and she was flattered, but uninterested. Anyway I'm unsure what I am anymore. Am I pansexual, but can't except it? I'm very confused and like some help please. ",pansexual
Hello... New biguy here and looking for solid advice on how to start first encounter with another guy.,"Hi Everyone. I'll keep this short. I am a 27yo male from Western Europe and have come to the United States for work. I feel like it is more difficult to experiment and be myself here.
 
According to the kinsey scale I am mostly straight and lean into being bicurious. I already knew this and it is nothing new.

What I want advice in is that I am looking to take the plunge with another guy? I don't really know where to start as bisexual men are a minority and hard to find. I signed up for grindr but I dont know if being bicurious turns gays off and I dont want my first time to be with a stranger/ someone on a hook up site like grindr.

Is there a website for us? My bi friend told me it would be preferable to be with a biguy or married man in the closet as statistically they are less likely to carry STIs. Also, I don't want to ""come out"" or any of that. I am happy being straight and being perceived as such. I am happy who I am and my sexual curiosities are no ones business outside of my private life.

Any questions just ask!! 
Thanks",pansexual
Coming out to family; I tried coming out as bi in the past - help please?,"Hello all! As the title reads, I tried to come out as bi to my family after some experimentation while away at college. They thought that it was just a phase, and I pretended to be ""disgusted"" by sexual activities with another male (This is half true because I wasn't attracted to the person I messed around with - I was more concerned with trying it out). Now I have a few years of thinking and experiences which led up to me discovering that I'm actually pan. I still live with my family so I want to be able to be myself with them. I'm starting to become depressed because of my repression. 

My questions are:

How should I go about coming out and make it believable/taken seriously?

Should I try and explain everything to put it into perspective for them?

What other advice do you have for me?

Thanks in advance for the help!  :)

UPDATE:
I came out to my mom today and she said that our family will love me and accept me anyway that I am. She needed pan to be explained and I did my best as well as showed her charts that illustrated gender/sexuality spectrums, and how they affect each other/don't affect each other. So far, so good!   :) ",pansexual
Coming out at work,"I'm a 28 year old, white, divorced male whose trying to find out wither or not to come out at work. I work in a military environment, as a contractor. I came out as Omnisexual to my family last September, since then my home life has improved while my work life has crumbled. I feel like its because I didn't come out at work also. There are gay jokes day in and day out where I work. I am lost here, there are more than just my company in the room I work in. I've expressed my concerns about the jokes but nothing has been done. If anything its gotten worse since I talked to her. This puts me in a really tight spot, would coming out at work stop the gay jokes while I'm there? I don't know what to do in this situation. ",pansexual
I would like some advice . . . (x-post with r/bisexual),"I'm a 20-something bi/pan woman. I spent the weekend with an amazing girl, and it sounds like we're going to get together, which is great. I told a really good non-binary friend (whom I've had a crush on for a while), and I'm afraid that they have a crush on me. I'm not sure whether I'm monogamous or poly, and I'm so afraid that I'm making the wrong decision, especially if my friend really does have feelings for me. Does anyone have advice for this situation?",pansexual
Everyone welcome Tarfu as a new moderator!,"Everyone, let's welcome /u/tarfu as a new moderator for /r/pansexual. He stepped up to offer support moderating our sexy subreddit and I'm glad for the love and support. :)",pansexual
Pansexual themed beer??,,pansexual
Kik pals?!,"I use kik a lot (although it's a kind of 'anonymous' kik - not my full name or picture) and I'm wondering if anyone would want to talk there? Just casual conversation about anything.

About me: I'm 19 and a dude who is trans but pre-t. I like video games, writing and reading fiction, watching soccer, and hiking/camping. I'm kind of a total shut-in with extreme social anxiety, graduated from (home) high school last month, learning how to drive soon so I can get a job, just wanting to make friends! Anyone wanna be buddies?

My kik is dashwrites.",pansexual
Misunderstood sexuality,So last night I went to dinner with my dad and I asked if he called his dad and he said yes and he also said that his dad asked if I was polyamorous and I got pissed Because I am not im pan and I came out and I clearly typed pansexual in my post. polyamorous is when you have a relationship with multiple people and they know about each other. That is not me in any aspect of this. Why he was told this I do not know. In the end my dad told him that no I wasn't that I was pan but he explained it to where Im bi but ill be with anybody.,pansexual
"Our local Pride Parade is tomorrow, and I handmade this sign to fly as I walk!",,pansexual
"[Casual conversation] I ""pass"" as straight and can't decide whether I should come out","I [F] am pan, but I'm in a hetero relationship and have only dated men. I never tell anyone what my orientation is unless it comes up or they ask. I'll talk about my SO, but I see no need to announce my orientation. Anyone who doesn't know me well probably assumes I'm straight, since that's generally seen as the default.

However, I know one of the biggest driving factors in the LGBT rights movement is that so many people came out of the closet, and virtually everyone realized that they had LGBT friends, family, and colleagues. I know no one *needs* to come out, but sometimes I wonder if I should come out for the sake of visibility.",pansexual
how to explain pansexuality to others?,"hey, friendly neighborhood pan here! 

So even though most of my close friends know I'm pan, I still publicly ID as bi even though it is not my actual sexuality. I do this because it's really difficult for me to explain pansexuality to people who have never heard of it. I'm not good at dealing with the usual ""Isn't that just bi?"", etc. 

Now I know what pansexuality is, but I think the reason I understand it so well is because I experience it. But I want to start ID'ing as pan publicly, so my question is, how do you explain pansexuality to people who don't have a clue?

Thanks :) ",pansexual
"Finally identify as a Pansexual, hoping for some advice.","EDIT: Thanks everyone, I actually told him about my orientation today, and he took it really well. Still haven't mentioned the crush thing, just because its not something that really matters right now, given that we live far apart and it's not an issue that will be coming up. 

Hey everyone, I'm pretty new here.

I'm a 25-year-old male that finalized my divorce to my wife a few months ago. She told me three years into our marriage that she was bisexual, and that got me thinking about my own sexuality.  Given that I lived in Alabama for most of my life (I am now in Denver) I have never been in a homosexual relationship. However, I am definitely interested, and I have been thinking about it more and more. 

Anyway, I've told my mom, and she has been really supportive (She said she didn't think she'd have to go into girl stuff because she had all boys, but aside from the occasional ribbing, she has been wonderful about it) but there is something I have been worried about, and I'm not sure if I should even do it.

I have had a crush on my best friend for as long as I can remember (but it wasn't sexual. He's like a brother to me, but I get that feeling in my stomach whenever I get to see him), but I don't want him to freak out about it. I would much rather keep my sexuality private, especially because I don't see him in a sexual manner. I'm just afraid if I told him my orientation, that he wouldn't want to be my friend anymore. 

I know this is probably trivial, but it's been eating at me for a while now, and I just don't know what I should do. For some reason, I feel like he should know, but I don't know if I should tell him. 

Anyway, thanks for reading, and I'm glad to have found this subreddit. It seems nice. ^^",pansexual
"Hi,new here",Hi im ivy and im 17 and I identity as pan and I've came out to a very supportive family but not friends and im just lonely and will talk to basically anyone who is nice to me. Yeppp that's me im so awkward its funny 🐧 ^.^,pansexual
Thought you might appreciate my outfit for pride,,pansexual
Unsure,"Can I still call myself pan if I have only ever personally been attracted to 1 cis male?  I mean, I know I can call myself whatever I want, but words mean things.  I also like tons of trans guys, trans girls, cis girls, and all sorts of non binary folk.",pansexual
Hi. Coming out as bigender and pansexual. Help needed.," Well, I'm in a strange position of being in a triad (with two other bio males), 32 years old and finally being able to identify as bigender, pansexual and submissive. 

I know one of the definite reasons that it took me so long is the abuse of women I have witnessed, the sexual abuse that my female family members have went through and sexual shaming and threats of being disowned if I ever got a girl pregnant. This led to an extreme fear of hurting people, especially women and children (I was physically and mentally abused). This also led to a fear of harming people smaller than me which led to a LOT of body image issues and anxiety since I'm 6'4"".

It's endlessly complicated. LOL

In any event, I am still terrified of getting a woman pregnant but strongly desire unprotected sex with a woman. Preferrably I would be totally submissive. I'd pamper her (massage, cooking, etc.) and sexually please her until I earned my reward. But that's a big overblown fantasy that would probably make me have a panic attack if it just plopped into my lap today.

Anyway, guess I'm just looking for validation and advice. I'm interested in trans individuals as well but I'm not sure how to approach them either.

TLDR been gay 32 years. How to women?

*edit* I'm going back and rereading this. You all really helped me during a rough time.*",pansexual
Is there any point in trying anymore...,"Hey everyone. This is my well technically first time posting something on reddit. I just want to share experience and I don't really know how to start this or know if I should post this but here goes I guess...

I'm pansexual (already out, my mother and my sister knows but my dad doesnt and I don't really go around telling people I'm pansexual unless they ask me about it), brown asian male (Thai) , 18 years old living in New Zealand. I've always known that I was different from everyone else ever since I was little where usually I never cared about genders or looks or anything and I feel very blind when it comes to liking people mainly other guys. 18 years of my life I've only ever had 3 people that I've really really liked and it just started last year right after I turned 17. I've never been in a relationship or really wanted one (mainly because no one has ever really liked me before in my whole life and I'm not gonna lie, I'm not the best looking guy out there and personally I think I'm like really below average when it comes to looks which could explain why) but this new guy came to my school and he turned my life upside down but he was fully straight so it really crushed me and confessing helped. To be honest I still really like him a lot even now but not seeing him anymore since I'm in University or College but I still get random pulses of feelings of him which still crushes me every time. This guy was my first crush ever and like the word crush, it crushed me. My 2nd crush was one of my female friend who happens to be pansexual as well but again it crushed me because she was already taken by my other friend who I'm close with so I couldn't do anything. These two crushes happened during highschool which was in my last year or grade there.

My 3rd who is also a guy that I met at my halls of residence and he happens to live right across my room. During the break before university started, I went back to Thailand and I arrived quite late so I missed orientation week and a few days of staying in my halls of residence after I have arrived, he introduced himself to me and we got to talk quite a bit and started hanging out. I felt like he was giving me mixed signals because every time I turn to him I'd end up catching him looking at me and smiling while looking away and because of the type of person he was (he was very sweet and genuine and I'm a sucker for genuine people because I'm genuine myself and usually when I say something, I really mean it and I don't act fake like a lot of people do. I'm not trying to be arrogant or anything I promise. I just speak my mind quite a bit when it doesn't affect anyone badly or at all and usually when I see a chance, I go for it immediately), I immediately fell for him almost like how I fell for my first crush and when I asked him out, again, I was crushed to pieces because he was straight and because I've never been liked by anyone before in my entire life, I didn't know any signs or anything.

Also this next part kinda relates to the first part but umm yeah sorry I don't really know how to do these things or reach out to people or anything at all... 

So when I was little I've never been really popular or anything and making friends was kind of hard and it still is because I have huge trust issues and I think I read the lines wrong when it comes to people who are just friendly and people who genuinely want to get to know me. So yeah, ever since I  was little, I would move schools or towns quite a lot and when I was about 6, I moved to New Zealand from Thailand and during my 5 year stay in New Zealand, I've moved schools 3 times (technically its two schools since I had trouble with an inexperienced teacher in year 5 at my 2nd school which resulted in me being expelled and I moved back to the first school) and houses 4 times which was why I never really had any close friends that lasted more than a year or two due to constantly moving and another reason is that whenever I try reach out to people, I get rejected immediately or no one approaches me and to be honest I don't know what I'm doing wrong and when people don't push me away, I end up becoming the ""pet"" of the group where I'd do anything it takes just to make them like me which lead to me having trust issues because after I turned 14 (however I started becoming aware of my sexuality when I was about 7 or 8 even though I started puberty at 10), I realized that no one liked me for who I was and only pretended to like me so that they could use me but when I wasn't around anymore, the people I thought I was friends with just threw me out like I was yesterday's garbage and because of this very reason, I ended up having trust issues and I started to push people away if someone tried to get close or I just end up being alone. I know being a lonewolf isn't necessarily a bad thing and at most times I enjoy it but then sometimes I end up feeling just completely broken and like the walls that I put up to hide my true feelings was smashed to pieces and I end up having a meltdown in my room from time to time.

If you are still reading this, thank you so much for putting up with someone like me and if not I'm terribly sorry you had to waste your time again on someone like me.

Anyways so yeah. I really don't know what to do at all. All my life, I've been treated like unwanted trash. I've never truly experienced what it's like to be wanted by anyone apart from my family but family's different. I've never been liked by anyone and usually people just ignore me. I'm not socially awkward, maybe a bit shy due to insecurities and I get along with people just fine. A lot of people I've talked to tells me that I dress very nicely, very clean and well groomed and I don't smell and also that I'm a likable guy, that I'm sweet, genuine or funny, something along those lines but I personally think they're just being nice because if I truly was what they say I am then I wouldn't be treated like I am everyday where people just pretend I don't exist, and also the fact that I'm fugly already guarantees the chances of that happening already. Don't tell me that appearance doesn't mean anything because it does and even though the majority of the people here including me are pansexual, we wouldn't even know about a person's personality until we approach them and let's face it, if there was 2 other people trapped in a room with you, one with a not so friendly appearance and isn't very attractive but is the nicest and most wonderful person in the world while the other person is very attractive and looks very friendly but has the bitchiest and worst personality in the world, naturally we would approach the attractive person first because we wouldn't know what kind of person that person actually was until we approached her and the only reason why we actually did was because that person looked trustworthy and attractive and if anyone says that they'd approach the ugly person instead of the attractive person, you're just lying to yourself, and I believe that's what people think of me. Appearance is the first and most important thing in getting anyone interested in anyone or anything and since my case is people treating me like this because of my appearance, is there really any reason or point in my trying anymore?

Again... Thank you so much for people who read from the start til the end and I'm terribly sorry for the long post but I'm not good with expressing my feelings because I've never had anyone to express it to before.",pansexual
Lost my gay virginity!!!! Have you? Share your story,"(Excluding ages and grade) There's this guy whom apparently is gay (And is actually named Gabriel like myself), though he’s not really effeminate he’s just fun and playful, and I've been attracted to him for about a year now, it’s like I'm gay just for him man, I have never had feelings like this for any guy whatsoever, so about two weeks ago he was looking at me weird while we were eating at our table during lunch, there were about 8 to 9 people on the table which are basically my group of friends, and I had this weird boner man, just because he was looking at me then I looked back and he just raised his left eyebrow and continued playing SMITE, the next day basically the same thing happened and he started rubbing his leg on mine, nobody noticed but it was like my dick was on steroids cx, on Monday, first day of finals (I live in Puerto Rico, our school years go from August to December and from January to May) the hole group decided to go to the movies to see MAD MAX (which is great btw). We all went on my van (I have a 1966 Volkswagen Type 2 Kombi), so we finished the movie we headed to the mall's Sbarro and we ordered like 3 pizzas, then we just roamed around the mall and Gabriel stopped in Starbucks Cafe to buy a latte or something, we just said we'd wait for him on the Microsoft Store (which was downstairs) so we're heading down the escalator and I have this sudden urge to pee (so I tell the guys I'll go to the bathroom)... I come out and as I'm heading for MSS there's Gabriel, we get together and head to MSS but none of my friends are there, so I started texting one of them but she didn't answer, then we headed for GameStop because we thought that's where they'd be and we just started talking while on our way, we started joking around and then he poked my nose, then about 30 seconds later we were just poking fighting and so I grabbed him from behind and started poking his belly and tickling him. We landed against one of the huge touch pad maps for the mall. He got all giggly and I was so nervous because I had the biggest fucking boner of my life, we sort of held each other and he pressed himself against it, and gave me that left eyebrow again and I literally fucking lost it so I started cringing, like 11 seconds in I went like fuck it, and fucking kissed the fuck out of him, so he pulls back and says ""The van?"" to which I replied ""Yeah, the van!"" and we walked rather fast to the Parking lot, we head to the van and I open the side door, and leaned the back seat completely to the back so it felt like a bed (Backseat did not belong to the van, we added it). So he just sits in the back while I turn on the van for the air conditioning (also added its one of those sparse ones so we have AC ventilation holes and in some key points of the van), turned on the lights and pulled down all the front and side curtains, I turned back and started getting close to him and we were like 3 inches away from each other so I grabbed his legs and pulled them up as he leaned back, and I leaned on top. He was wearing really tight red shinnies (I guess that's how you write that) I started unbuckling his belt and jeans while we were making out and slowly grabbed them and gently pulled them up with his underwear until they were completely off to his ankles, I've always thought he'd have a big one but it was about 5 inches erected, but it was so clean and shaved, my face immediately went ^~^, he was wearing a grey hoodie and he was playfully covering himself with it, so then he sat and started unbuckling me, while looking at me with those green eyes of his. I've always shaved everything like really well, which is why i found that he shaved as much as me pretty awesome, guess he felt the same way, he looked so stoked, I'm about 7 1/2 inches erected, I mean it’s not that awesome but I'm proud Ig cx, he started rubbing it while licking me from bottom to top, you see I'm not the worst looking guy eve, but my Addams apple is abnormally big which is why I've only had two girlfriends in my whole life, but this was the best blowjob I've ever had, while he deep-throat it he wiggled his tongue around at the same time and it was amazing, I couldn't help it and I came like 8 minutes in and he looked so surprised, some creeped out his mouth, but then he just cringed, went down and swallowed it, since I got off I laid him down and started giving him a handjob and tried to blow him as well as he did, trying to copy him and whatnot but not for so long, so I saddled on top of him and he knocked me down to the side and put my feet on his shoulders, and rubbed his dick against mine, he reached for his back pack and pulled some lube I assume and he smeared it all over his dick and mine then he rubbed some on me toot cx,  so we started doing anal, well I received, he did it so calmly and passionately though, it felt amazing, about 20 minutes and some different positions later he felt he was going to cum so he pulled out lifted his dick and tried to catch it with his mouth as it just blasted upwards, I grabbed him and put him on the seat and licked the cum from the top of his hoodie, neck and face and I put it in his mouth while kissing, I mean I didn’t spit it in, it was more like letting it slide in I guess, He asked if I had done this before, which was literally the first word either of us said up to this point, I said that it was my first time with a guy, He looked shocked and said “nice” with the weirdest fucking cringe ever,  so he started jacking me again and once I was completely erected he rubbed more lube on me and turned around and positioned himself like so: http://viralplug.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/11/anal-turtle.jpg (picture) (Which btw, never did I imaging could be so sexy) just putting my hands on his ass and neck, without even thinking about it I scraped most of the lube off and just went in without any second thought, basically the opposite of the sweetness that he used, It was like I wasn’t even thinking of how it might hurt him or if he felt pain I just rammed the fuck out of him. He kept moaning while making this really sexy giggle I swear I was in there for like 25 to 30 minutes. Basically the same as before but he was the bottom, when I was about to cum I told him that I was gonna pull out but he insisted I kept going, at this point we were laying on our sides and I came inside of him, after like 40 seconds of giggling I took it out and he turned to me and we just laid there for about an hour kissing handling each others dick and talking, I put his boxers on and he wore mine, just because, and I gave him a ride to his house, then I drove back to mine and shortly after I realized that I had left the rest of my friends at the mall… for the other two days we made out at certain points, he’d grab my crotch whenever I walked pass him when none were watching, I don’t think I’ll ever do this with another guy, so idk it was something special and I think I really like him. 
HOORAY FOR PANSEXUALISM!!!",pansexual
How does a pansexual dress?,"I have run into a great deal of trouble with this. While the gay community, and straight community pretty well have dress codes, no one knows how to identify a pan/bi sexual individual. There's much to be said about getting to know a person, but sometimes first impressions are all that count, you know? My current style is a mix of both, a little for the guys, a little for the girls, but each seems to identify the pieces meant for the other. It ends up a terrible mess where everyone assumes I must be attracted to the other. What type of fashion do you use?",pansexual
Told my little gay brother I'm pansexual,"His response?:Ok, so what about children?

Me: Are you talking about pedophilia?

Bro: Um, nevermind. 

Me: Facepalm",pansexual
So I'm new to this idea.,"So I am a male 21 years old. I thought I was straight... Then gay... Then bi... Then gay again... Then bi one more time. After a long discussion with my boyfriend and basically saying that while he is still physically attractive to me. My love for him comes from the fact that he physically and emotionally loves me back. That's the thing I've always wanted was an emotional connection of ""wow this person truly cares about me and loves me."" 

That being said I am really confused as to where I fit into the community (the pansexual community or just the whole lgbtqa community) and was hoping for some form of advice or guidance to understand and accept how I feel. 

Please and thank you for the help. Also if I offended anyone or did something wrong, please don't hate me I'm new here. ",pansexual
Oregon’s Bisexual Gov. Bans Conversion Therapy,,pansexual
"Well, it looks like I've found my home :D","Nothing too helpful or inspirational here, I'm just excited to find such a large and comfortable community. Thank you all for being here, you're all awesome.",pansexual
I need an answer,"I'm a fifteen year old girl. Every since I was seven, I knew what sex was, I knew what attraction was. I had my first puppy love with a girl. My first kiss was with a girl. But I also liked guys. And I don't mine transgender people, or anything else. Since I was a young child, I felt attracted to both genders(as there were only male and female in my neighborhood). But, I now know of other genders and I feel as if I could be in a relationship with them if there happened to be a chance. I also can't, for the life of me, judge on looks anymore. Only personality.  Could I be pansexual?",pansexual
[Vent/need advice/lost] I feel like my compass is just sitting and spinning..,"I've been dealing recently with the realization that, while I'm omni/pan I don't feel an urge to pursue any gender.

I've had physical relations in the past. But I've realized that while I enjoy sex, and I do have sexual urges, I don't have sex drive. I mean, I feel the desire to have sex, but (even when I had a partner) never with a specific person or gender.

I was always in relationships to love, and be loved. Sex was icing, but it was always... mechanical.

I've been thinking of relabeling as demi-pansexual (I know it's my own choice to do so.) But, I just feel.. lost and alone.

Sorry if this is a little too personal or even off-topic, there isn't too many people that would get this in my life (or even in reality I think..), but I feel safest talking about it here.",pansexual
"/r/LGBT Library is Open! Educational studies, sources, videos and discussions on all things LGBTQIA",I'd like to invite everyone at /r/pansexual to subscribe to and contribute to /r/LGBTlibrary! A place to stay up to date with studies into all things LGBTQAI and other educational resources. ,pansexual
coming out,Just came out to my boyfriend... God it's a relief to know it doesn't phase him. He's very supportive and... Wow this just feels great ,pansexual
It turns out male sexuality is just a fluid as female sexuality,,pansexual
What is it like to be gender blind?,"I am a closeted male teen. I have known about my feelings for girls since before i can remember and for guys since i was about 13. I have only dated/had sex with girls, but i really really want to date a guy.

I have had crushes on both guys and girls. Sometimes i will feel a preference for one gender for a few weeks or so. It fluctuates, but generally its about a 50/50 split.

I have heard the term gender blind a number of times, usually when someone is explaining the difference between bi and pan.

I am attracted to all genders, i would consider dating and sex with all genders including gender neutral people or any other non cis gender identification.
Gender would never dissuade me from being with someone. Is this gender blind? Does my vaguely fluid sexuality make a difference?

I fantisasize about sex with guys and girls but to me, these are two differnt kinds of sex. Is this relevant?

I know different people may have different views on this topic, but i would love to hear your opinions.

Thanks in advance!",pansexual
"How would I know if I'm pansexual, and not simply bi?","Where I live, the LGBT community isn't very big. I don't know that many gay people, and I don't really know any transgender or genderqueer people. I'm not really sure how I'm supposed to define my sexual orientation, I haven't had any opportunities to really get to know anyone who isn't cis. I mean, I've dated some masculine girls and some feminine boys, but not anyone who has decided to change their pronouns. 

Where do you draw the line between bisexuality and pansexuality? 

Does anyone else sometimes have difficulty discerning between aesthetic appreciation and sexual attraction? ",pansexual
Pansexual Pride - The largest Pansexual group on Facebook,,pansexual
Hello there!,"After a post on r/gay and explaining how i am, i think this is where i am meant to be. I got pointed in the right direction and i ended up here. After reading a few topics, i am extremely pleased to see that i am not alone with the way i feel. I've always been extremely open minded about everything in my life and i think its contributed to me being this way. 

Anyone got any tips or advice for people who have finally figured this out for themselves? I realize i've always been like this but it'd help to hear from everyone else :]",pansexual
Can someone explain to me the difference between bisexuals and pansexuals?,,pansexual
Pansexual Characters in Popular Fiction,"Are you interested in having more pansexual characters represented in popular fiction? 

Me too! 

I believe that positive media representation is essential for any group who is seeking social understanding and acceptance. As a pansexual person, and a writer, I am taking the opportunity to write from a fiction book based mainly on my own experiences with coming to terms with sexual orientation and gender. 

I'm very interested in collecting feedback from others as well, and have this novel represent a cast of characters who feel familiar, authentic, and sympathetic. 

To read and comment, either visit http://www.wattpad.com/myworks/33746809-the-m%C3%A9nage

Or, message me. ",pansexual
How do you explain what pansexuality is?,Every time I come out to someone I have to explain what pansexual means. How do you explain what being pan is to people?,pansexual
Why The Grand Budapest Hotel's Bisexual Protagonist is a (Complex) Revelation,,pansexual
Message me?~,I'm a girl who is quite bored and would like to Skype someone. Message me and I will respond! :D ❁,pansexual
variations on pansexuality?,"I'm conflicted over whether or not to identify as ""pansexual."" 

I relate to the first part of the definition on this page: the ""potential for sexual attractions, sexual desire, or romantic love, towards people of all gender identities and biological sexes.""

But when the definition goes on to say that gender may be ""insignificant or irrelevant,"" I have second thoughts.

It seems to me those are two different things -- either you're open to relationships with all genders and there are specific things you are drawn to about those genders, OR, you find gender irrelevant and, as I've heard some people phrase it, don't worry about ""what's between a person's legs.""

The second concept (being gender-blind) reminds me of this sarcastic response: ""Thank you for seeing past the aspect of my personality that I fought for decades to legitimate.""
(http://daniellelavigne.com/post/102556610078/gender-blind-made-as-a-critical-response-to-a)

I understand that a term like this can encompass multiple definitions, and I think that in general the term is the closest to my orientation that I've come across yet. But if I identify with a particular label only for people to Google it and find definitions that don't accurately represent my orientation ... that doesn't really help.

I want to be associated with the first definition (being open to all genders) but not the second (finding gender irrelevant). Does anyone else share this perspective?",pansexual
Academic study (online survey): The Experiences of Pansexual and Polysexual Identified Individuals,,pansexual
"Ohio dad stabs gender nonconforming child to death, tells police that ‘son was in a cult’",,pansexual
"Really, really confusing feelings for a friend","Im a female high schoooler and am having very confusing feelings for a female friend whos pansexual. If i werent crushing on her id talk to her about it, but as things stand im not sure what to do because i think i might also be pansexual. Im very very open and liberal so being lgbt+ doesnt worry me but i just want to know for sure. I keep trying to drop hints/flirt with her because i really want to talk toher about it, but i kinda wish she'd initiate the conversation. Any advice?",pansexual
I am a female Pansexual with a homophobic family. AMA,,pansexual
"I need help, advice, anything","I am a 20 year old pansexual girl. I have had a friend for a while, lets call her J, who's got a ton of bi/gay/pan friends, and when I was 16, she introduced me to one named V. Well long story short, V and I messed around, and only AFTER that happened she told me she had a fiance, at which point I opted the fuck out and just brushed it off.

Well flash forward 4 years to this weekend. I was at a concert when J showed up with a few friends, one of them we'll call M. M was all over me, walked right up and called me hot multiple times, danced with me, flirted with me, and told me she wanted to hang out. When she added me on facebook, I obviously stalked her and SHE'S BEEN MARRIED FOR 2 YEARS.

Why does this keep happening? Am I a homewrecker or a magnet for dissatisfied almost married/married women? Are J and her buds secret swingers or something? Should I talk to J? Should I talk to M?
Help me!",pansexual
"I wrote my coming out story to a zine, and it got published!","Hey everyone, this is my first time not only posting here (okay I've commented two times but actually posting a post is the first time) and also on reddit. Anyway, I'll cut to the chase. 

I'm a young Australian person and I'm also a writer, and so I'm apart of a Facebook group that gives opportunities to young writers and one was a zine for people who are apart of the LGBTQ+ community to submit art whether it be paintings, drawings, photography or written works. I decided to submit my coming out story to them and see if I was able to make the cut (spoiler alert: I did). 

I didn't go to the event that they had because I live a bit too far and public transport would have been a hassle but anyways, I went to see if they posted it online and they did! 

http://alexzineproject.com/portfolio_page/melissa-taylor/ (that's specifically my work) but if you want to check out the online zine http://alexzineproject.com/zine-issue-1/ there's that. So it'd be awesome if you guys had a look at it! (also mods if this is somewhat self-promo not ok then delete... if you can, I'm too old for a nineteen year old I don't know how reddit works)",pansexual
[Question] Should my parents know if I am pan? Is it their right as my parents to know?,"My parents aren't super conservative, but I know things would change if they knew. My dad would probably grow distant, even hate me for being a ""perverted gay"" or something. My mom would say how it's just a phase and that I would believe anything I see the internet to make me think this. She'd probably become more depressed. I don't know about my brother, I know things would change. We are really close, and I don't want to ruin our friendship. What if I wanted to date someone who isn't a guy, though? Would it be best to tell them, rather than surprise them? ""Hi mom, hi dad. This is my gf and oh yeah, I pansexual."" My brother doesn't believe in pansexuality and says it's the same as bi. I know it's difference, I used to think I was bi. I don't know, this may be just a rant or something, but it's an important question for me.",pansexual
One hell of a day,"Today I wrote a letter to my ultra-conservative Christian parents in which I came out as poly and pansexual.  I am a nearly-forty-year-old cis-man with kids and until recently have been terrified of their response, but something broke recently and I needed to get it out there to start healing myself, and maybe, just maybe, heal the rift that has grown between me and my family.

I don't know how they will respond.  I have my assumptions, but I'm being uncharacteristically optimistic in my hope that it will have an ultimately positive affect. I wish I could have this conversation with them in person, but they aren't exactly the type to listen for the sake of hearing, but rather for the sake of rebuttal.

Why am I posting this here?  I guess it's part asking for support, and part illustration that it's not too late to be honest with yourself and those around you.  

Whether or not this post gets any attention I hope it can help somebody. ",pansexual
Confused and just need to vent a tiny bit?,"I'm a 17 yr old female, and I've identified as pansexual for almost a year. I've found this label to best describe me right now, but I'm still figuring stuff out :) Basically I've only ever been with males, and my relationships tend to last longer than usual (at least for a teenager lol), which is not always a good thing because they drag on and I'm bad at emotions. I have a boyfriend right now, still a relatively new relationship, and I'm pretty happy. The problem is that I've recently had bigger eyes for women, and I always have been attracted to women but it's more so this time. Nothing personal against my bf of course, but I tend to find boys bland and unattractive, while women are like WOW... hello.... not only physically but personality wise as well. I don't really find my bf physically attractive either? It sounds strange to say to myself but I'm not super attracted to him, its mostly a romantic thing.

Sorry for the wall of text, I'm not really sure what question I'm asking here or if I'm asking one at all. Just another confused hormonal teenager here. I guess I'm just wondering if any of you have had a similar situation when you find one gender more attractive than another, and what you did about it.",pansexual
Homecoming! Not like high school.,"I have very recently come across the term pansexual! It felt like I was finally reading a description about myself that I did not need to edit or add to or qualify. People would tell me oh you are just horny, or you will like anything that breaths, when I described myself and my sexuality. But there is a word. One single word that lets me know I am not a slut, easy, or without standards. I simply do not see gender but the entire person and what they offer the world. 

This is my homecoming and I am thrilled to be here. ",pansexual
Thread for pansexuals who've only dated one person/gender,"So, I've only ever dated one person in my entire life, who happens to be male.  I'm female.  It's because of this that I was very hesitant about figuring out my sexuality and coming out.  At first, I figured it didn't matter whether or not I liked other genders because I was (and still am) hoping to be with this man forever.  I also worried that people would accuse me of making it up to be included (most of my friends are lgbt).  I spent a year or so with this mentality, until one night when I was looking up pansexuality and felt so excited and identified with it so much that I couldn't hold it in any more.  It was part of me, and I wanted the world to know, even if it changed nothing about my love life.

However, I've still only been with one person, and that makes it weird sometimes.  I actually had a friend actively argue with ME over MY sexuality (""What do you mean?  You're straight.""  ""No, I'm pan.""  ""No, you're straight."")  I had to explain to him that heterosexual relationships did not equal heterosexual people, and the whole thing was really weird.

I also feel a little weird when I go to LGBT-related events, like when I went to my local city's pride parade this past summer.  I wore a pansexual-themed t-shirt that I created and I tried to include myself in things, but I don't really feel like I completely have the right to be included.  I've never dated a woman or trans person, so I've never had to deal with the abuse and harassment that most of the lgbt population has seen, I don't have to worry about laws preventing me from marrying my boyfriend, etc.  I'm not saying I want those horrible things to happen to me, either.  I'm just saying I never know if it's entirely appropriate to include myself or not.

Anyone else with similar experiences want to post their own stories and takes on the situation?",pansexual
Came out to my wife with a suprising result,"My wife and I have been together 12 years and have been faithful to each other thet entire time  but I have been been keeping a secret from her that I am pan.
I told her last night while we were having sex that I thought I was pan since I am turned on by people regardless of sex or sexual preference and she took it well. 
Tonight we had an in depth conversation where she told me she was also pan and had been feeling like that for awhile now. 
It felt good talking openly to her about it and admitted that I often fantasize about sex with men, sex with women and men together and trans and that I watch porn and masterbate to that type of porn.
I have been fantasizing about this for long and I woul love to experiment with the same  sex but it will take time to convince her.",pansexual
Father needs advice,"Long time lurker. Need some advice. My 14 year old daughter just came out as pansexual, a term I had never heard of until tonight, and I'm trying to figure out exactly what she means. My wife is upset, she's not as open/accepting as I am. I'm just trying to figure out how one identifies as this. All my daughter talks about is how hot boys are. She just had me take her to a One Direction concert a few months ago. What do I need to do for her to know that I accept her regardless? Is/could this be a phase? Any advice would be appreciated.",pansexual
/u/linlorienelen made some cookies I think you all will like!,,pansexual
Should I come out to my sister?,"Hello! I apologize for this post, I haven't really talked about this to strangers before. I am a pansexual female, and still in high school. I'm out to my friends but I haven't really had a public outing yet. My parents grew up in Soviet-era Russia, and despite becoming a bit Americanized, still have pretty conservative views on sexuality, premarital sex, etc., so I dont plan on telling them anytime soon :/ On the other hand, my sister is recently graduated from university and is a decent and reasonable person, and has very open views on sexuality (I'm actually questioning if she is completely straight?). I'm pretty okay with my pansexuality and I don't think it's such a huge part of my life that I have to tell everyone (it's okay if you do), but I'm considering telling my sister because it would make it a little easier for me and it could even bring us closer. I guess this is more of a personal decision but any experience/advice with this is welcome.",pansexual
Cliché Question: Am I Bi or Pan?,"So, I'm still semi-closeted. I identify as bisexual, partly because that was the first label I found to fit how I felt.  
  
The bi part, as in two, never bothered me, eventhough I acknowledge that gender isn't binary and it can be fluid. I also can be attracted to a person that doesn't identify as neither male nor female (I hope I got that double negative right).  
  
I can understand that pansexuals say that they are rather interested in character and I totally feel that, but I guess I'm shallow because, well, what can I say, I like hot people.  
  
So, please tell me if this is utterly fucked in the head and I should reconsider my label or if this actually makes some sense.",pansexual
Am I pansexual or straight?,"I'm the type of person that doesn't fall for people very quickly, rarely gets crushes/feelings for anyone. The thing that does get my attention is if the person and I connect on an intellectual level. Someone that has an open mind and my sense of humor. 

I would date any person of any gender if we had that connection(at least, I'd like to think so...) 

The thing is, the only people that I check out are men, only think about men and penises. If I see a ""cute girl"" I would say she's pretty, but wouldn't be attracted to her. Same with other genders. The only reason I'm debating this is because I can see myself dating all genders, but I might see it as an exception, maybe?
Only because I don't connect with people on that level very often and if I did find someone that I connected with, I'd most likely fall for them. 
If I found a connection, I wouldn't care what genitalia they have because I'd want them for who they are. I hope I made sense... ",pansexual
Slightly scared to ask this question!,"I'm seeking the possibility of wether being with/dating someone polyamorous is included in something at least some pansexuals would be into. I'm pan myself and would like to explore the possibility of me being polyamorous, but don't know where/who to start with. So I suppose my question is - would you even go there?",pansexual
"Bi to some, Pan to others",Does anyone else identify as Bisexual to some people and Pansexual to people who are more likely to be familiar with the term?  ,pansexual
I don't know how to describe my sexuality besides Pansexual,"I am attracted to almost literally everybody. Ever. There are very few exceptions to this rule. Almost every single person out there, cis or trans, guy or girl. Right now I label myself as Pansexual because, well, technically I am. Is anyone else like this, or something of the sort?",pansexual
Hello I'm pansexual!,"Greetings and happy new year for those on the Western calendar. For those of you on various calendars that are not on a new year until later, happy previous new year for whatever year you had celebrated.

That said, I am happy to subscribe to this group and acknowledge that I am a pansexual myself. I don't recall exactly when I first heard of the term pansexual, but it was within the last year. I always considered myself bisexual, but once I learned about pansexuality, I immediately identified with it. 

I'm not just bisexual...I am attracted to any person. Everyone deserves to be loved in some way or another. And I am very much perfectly happy with that. I am here for you, to care for you and make sure that you are respected like everyone else. And if we want to have fun, we're no different than anyone else: after all, we are all humans. ",pansexual
Who among us expected the lull after the storm of coming to terms with your sexuality? (If such had been the case for you),"I've always thought that the lack of content on /r/pansexual (and even /r/bisexual) to be somewhat unusual.

In my case, I remember living through years of internal strife in order to get to where I am now. Of going alone through the process of learning that some things you have to learn by yourself and ignore the presumptuous world around you, and feeling ungrounded about it the whole time.

But then as the storm abated, the waters lowered and stilled, and the uneventfulness of it just seemed surprising, unmatched to the flurry that brought me here.

I am pansexual, and that's it. It's naturally and comfortably me, and I rarely feel the need to discuss it except as a yearning for others to share my point of view so that they too might in the joy and freedom I feel over the comparative constraint one might feel others have. Otherwise it's just natural and uneventful, and I almost feel disappointed about it.

The only thing I can rationalize to explain this is that the state of pansexuality is a kind of evolutionary threshold that solves many of the problems that came before it. It's a plateau of gentle ease, and the only meaning I can derive from the preceding storm is that it was wholly unnecessary. I've read many of your stories about how it came so naturally to many of you during and even before puberty, and aside from an absence of outside confirmation until you were old enough to decide for yourself, the only problems came from those around you who hadn't readily accepted your sexuality.

I can't help but imagine what a society, unconstrained by discriminative sexualities, might be. (fine print: I am not equating non-pansexuals with the practices of oppressive discrimination. It's just a good term to accurate describe a particular thought. The idea of discrimination is not inherently oppressive. There's nothing immoral about discriminating against broccoli, or the smell of sewage, or paper cuts, for example.)

Anyway, thoughts?",pansexual
Calling all UK pansexuals!,"Say hi below, and maybe leave a little description of yourself :)",pansexual
Where are all the pansexuals at? :) &lt;3,,pansexual
It feels very hard to accept myself,"I am afab nonbinary, sometimes I feel like a nonbinary girl. But in this scenario I thought I was a cis girl.

I know I am pansexual, I self identified this way when I was 12 but no one knew what I was talking about, so I came out as bi to most of my friends. One friend who I thought was a best friend began to avoid me and act passive agressive towards me. I asked another friend why passive friend was acting this way and she told me that passive friend thought that me expressing attraction towards girls in magazines or irl was me being attention seeking about being bisexual. I was shocked, hurt and confused. I did the same thing with my other straight friends who would be like ""yeah! she's cute!"" so I didn't understand why this was a problem. I felt ashamed and I never made up with that friend.

This, along with other things that have happened in my life like sexual trauma and internalised misogyny have made it very hard for me to accept my attraction to girls or feminine people. I feel as though I'm objectifying them and their bodies, and I feel disgusted with myself.

Just wanted to share because I'm really struggling with this right now.

Any thoughts/advice on how to accept myself more?",pansexual
Regarding Aces and Cakes,"Okay, so I was thinking last night, Asexuals are Aces. Their symbol is a cake.

I'm thinking for us, we're called Panzers and our symbol is a tank.

What do you think?",pansexual
gotta love lizzy the lezzy's page,,pansexual
confusing sexual identity -_-,"Still not entirely sure what I would call myself, but my sexuality is DEFINITELY fluid. My attraction is usually towards cis-women (hetero), but also a lot of times toward t-women as well. However, I've never really found a particular attraction to t-men. Although I don't actually feel attracted to males per se (i.e. If I am in a crowd of people, I have a tendency to just check out girls, I never look at guys) but at the same time, I have a lot of gay fantasies and have hooked up with guys before. However, there are some men where I can say to myself ""wow he's pretty cute!"" And in addition, I am very picky about guys who I would hook up with, FAR more picky than if I was with a woman. Out of 3 sexual encounters I've had with guys, I've only enjoyed 1 and was grossed out by the other 2. Of the one sexual encounter i had with a t-girl, that was my favorite.

The thing is, I definitely go through different periods. Most of the time I'm just attracted to girls in general (trans or cis, but mostly cis), sometimes I will just have homoerotic fantasies instead and prefer to be with a man. Or sometimes, it will be any combination of those three sexualities. It definitely gets confusing at times, but even more so frustrating because I have a girlfriend (cis) and sometimes I just feel like I'm not as sexually into her as I am other times. Sometimes I just really want to experiment outside the relationship but she isn't okay with that so it leaves me seriously conflicted at times. But I love her very much, so I wouldn't just leave her.

Just wanted to know if there is anyone else out there like me, though granted as we understand how complex and unique sexuality can be, I wouldn't be surprised if there are very, very few. And I know maybe this isn't strictly pansexual since I am obviously not gender-blind, but it's the closest thing I can find where people understand sexuality in a much more complex way than gay/straight/bisexual.",pansexual
Don't Mess With Pansexuals! (Digital Drawing),,pansexual
"""Does that mean you fuck pans?""","Is it wrong of me to get annoyed when people say that? I mean, I dont get to annoyed, but my general response is, ""God that nonstick copper bottom pan just really gets me going."" Do you get the ""fucking pans"" line as I like to call it? And how do you respond? Also, animals, do you get that one too? I usually just shudder at that one.",pansexual
Do I need to come out?,"So my parents are both incredibly accepting and have multiple gay and bi friends. I (18,m) am pretty sure I'm pan and maybe slightly genderfluid. I've come out to my friends, but I'm wondering if I actually need to come out to my parents, I'm 100% certain they'll be happy and accepting of it (which I know is incredibly lucky) and I think if I were to one day bring home a guyfriend (or someone less binary) they'd probably not bat an eye... Is there any particular reason I should make a point of telling them? and if so how? (I'm painfully shy and anxiety prone). 
x",pansexual
How many of are you are sexually fluid?,"Hello! I was wondering how many of you have a more fluid sexuality, in that you attraction shifts from one gender to another? I ask because very recently I have experienced a shift from a primarily heterosexual attraction to a pretty strong homosexual attraction. Now I post this in pansexual because I value the person over gender identity, but I can imagine that there is some fluidity out there.",pansexual
"Today one of my friends stated the tired old bullshit that ""bi people are greedy"" and he didn't get why I was upset!","Ok, firstly, I don't identify as bisexual, I am pansexual, but with this particular friend I simply use the term bi as he doesn't quite get the distinction between bi and pan. 
Today we had seen the movie ""Pride"" and I mentioned that it completely glossed over the notion of Bisexual or Pansexual people and that I felt that was a big oversight in a film celebrating LGBT rights and acceptance. 
He didn't seem to think that this was a big oversight and I let it go because I didn't feel it was worth a debate, so, whatever I guess. 

 BUT then out of nowhere he says, ""You know, you're so lucky you're bi, because when you go out to a pub, you're guaranteed to find someone to go home with."" and I basically said, ""Uh, nope, that's not how it works"" and his response was basically, ""well if you can't find a guy to get with, you can look for a girl, so you basically have a guarantee of getting laid.""

Two things bothered me about this, firstly, ""Bi/pan people are greedy"" and secondly, a film celebrating LGBT rights completely glossing over bisexuality/pansexuality. 

Does anyone have thoughts on this?",pansexual
My pansexual tattoo! :3,,pansexual
Figuring out who you are.,"Since I was young I always found myself looking at boys and girls. I liked them both and I had crushes on both and I never had a second thought about it. As I grew up I went through a phase where I didn't crush on anyone, but as I got into middle school and high school I started liking boys. I saw nothing wrong with that and knew it was just me becoming a teenager and crushing. That was until I was fifteen and I met this girl in an after school club. I don't know why, but I became infatuated with her. She was pretty, smart, and so nice. It was strange to me because I felt this overwhelming need to get her to notice me and be friends with me and like me. I didn't know why I felt this way, but the more I looked into it the more I knew I had a crush on her. I didn't want to admit it though. I thought maybe it was a one time thing and I'd get over it. I eventually did, but I didn't get over girls. I still liked boys, but I liked girls too. After those years I swore off relationships and moved on focusing on school. As I got into my first year of college I started noticing these feelings for girls once more. I had dreams of being with other girls and to say the least I liked the idea. However, I didn't know what it was and I thought there was no way I could be gay. I was under the impression there was straight gay and nothing else. I tried so hard to ignore this feeling and convince myself I was straight. As time went on I began to accept that I liked girls. I came to terms with the fact I wouldn't mind if a girl asked me out as long as she was a nice person and I liked her. Same with boys I wouldn't mind if they asked me out either. This evolved into me saying that I don't care what my partner has in their pants I just want someone who loves me for me and will make me happy. I didn't care if they had a penis or a vagina and boob, if they were assigned male or female at birth, if they chose not to identify as either. It didn't matter to me at all. What mattered was the person inside. 
This brought me to a point where I knew that I wasn't necessarily straight, I knew I wasn't gay, but bisexual didn't seem to fit right with me. Of course with the help of the lovely internet I found out what pansexual is and that there are other people who are attracted to people in the same way I am, not caring about gender or gender identity or anything like that. Needless to say after finding this out I am a lot more accepting of myself.",pansexual
The Pansexual.,,pansexual
Commenter on an otherwise really well done YouTube video about Pansexuality keeps claiming that Pan is a slippery slope to Pedophilia. Can we drop some education (or at least discussion)?,,pansexual
When people ask who I'm attracted to.,"It bothers me when they can't grasp that Pansexuals usually are attracted to personalities first and looks second. That's the line between people who are Bisexual and people who are Pansexual. It really hurts when people say ""isn't that just Bi"" because it's not and it gets to the point where I get tired of arguing with them and it makes me frustrated.

Anyone else get this problem too?

I don't know I'm just trying to find a place where I can talk openly to other pansexuals and I just so happened to come across Reddit.",pansexual
Do you want to win an Amazon.com gift card? Then take our survey on HIV testing for young men who have sex with men! We will make it worth your time. :D,"Hello!  We are conducting a 20 minute survey targeted towards young 18 to 24 year old men who have sex with men who live in the US.  For your time, you can participate in a raffle for one of various Amazon.com gift cards.  Here is the link to the survey: https://pph-illume.ad.brown.edu/dev/Collector/Survey.ashx?Name=HIV_TEST_ENGL.  Thanks and please upvote! ",pansexual
Is this what I really am?,I'm still not sure. Could somebody who i can trust please talk to me and help me out. I've been battling with my own sexuality for a long time this one seems to fit me best but how can I be sure? I realize this is short compared to other people but i'd rather not throw all my information out unless i can trust someone.,pansexual
I Think I may have found what I am but.. There's always a but,"This is a very interesting and exciting time in my life, I am diving in and holding nothing back,

My whole life I have wondered what I am, recently I was telling my friend how I feel towards people and she said I was pan. So I of course went on line and researched exactly what pansexual was. It has honestly been the closest single word definition I have come across, but there's still something missing, and it scares me sometime, other times its exciting! its a hodge podge of emotions

So a little about myself and what I am.

I am attracted to everything, but not in the normal sense, I never understood catcalling, Porn never really worked for me. I could never just get aroused in public at the site of someone attractive even if they were completely my type. If I dont know them I cant be attracted to them. I have always been very numb to blind attraction,

However once I get to know someone I find interesting it usually takes about 2 dates or equal acceptable timing and I am fully attracted to them, and I mean full on ready to rumble.
Its never diminished over the length of a relationship, its like a switch, once its on it on
It takes pretty much the same amount of time to turn it off say it doesn't work out. 

For example. I am 24M 
I recently started seeing this really cute guy, we hit it off really quickly, I knew i was attracted to him the moment we met. However it wasn't until our 2nd date about half way through the date, I even remember what we were doing when the switch turned, I was fully attracted to him without any question. It was a really cool feeling and I was immediately excited, not horny just excited to feel the attraction kick in! The point is, I had to know him or at least get to know him before I could become attracted to him.

This has happened several different times with different partners. Gender means nothing to me, it is 100% the persons attitude and personality that allow me to be physically attracted to them. 

My question I guess is, am I Pansexual? Everything I have read has talked about blanket attraction without borders or being gender blind and such but my attraction isnt based on any kind of physical attributes, If I find someone attractive mentally then no matter what they look like physically I will be attracted. I either love it all or love nothing.

This is exciting and scary for me, im really sorry for formatting in advance
",pansexual
"I finally figured it out, and everything makes sense to me.","My main reason to post here is so I can meet others who share my view. Mostly because I don't know anyone who thinks/feels like this and it would be nice to. Here's the story.

Resent events have lead me to question my identity.. I always thought I was bisexual. It never truly made sense to me, but it was closer to the truth than heterosexual. Then I found the term pansexual. It describes how my attractions to people in general develop. I don't pay attention to gender, it has never been a huge factor to me. 

Main reason I came to this conclusion is because my partner is transitioning. People ask me why I am still with her even though she is no longer a male. I simply say because her personality is the same, and that is why I lover her. But it is so hard for some to understand. Even those who know I ID as bisexual question it. 

I hope that made sense.. Have a wonderful day everyone!
",pansexual
Any else bothered by this?,"Yesterday was bi/pan/genderqueer visibility day, but almost everything I've seen has just called it ""bi visibility day."" It kinda bothers me that pansexuals are getting ignored on the day dedicated to not being ignored",pansexual
A really sweet story about my date two nights ago :),"Just as a heads up I mention **self-harm** in the post. It's literally just a mention of my scars but I thought I'd let you all know in case that bothers anyone.

So I've seen this really cute person a few times now. We hung out once and went to a GSA meeting where I ended up meeting a few old friends from high school who turned out to be queer, which was fun.

They saw my self-harm scars then and asked about them (in a really nice way, not an intrusive, rude way), but I didn't really know what to say so I didn't really give them an answer. It's pretty obvious in my opinion what they're from though. That, combined with my awkward non-answer was enough for them to guess I'm sure.

After that we had a few dates that ended with some awesome kissing (on the beach and on a harbor bridge!).

Anyway we were out the night before last, and I was driving and wearing a tank top (scars are on my right shoulder) so they were completely visible to them in the passenger seat. 

So we were at a stoplight and they literally just out of nowhere leaned over and kissed my scars. It was just a tiny little boop but christ I felt like I was melting inside.

I'm getting kinda teary-eyed writing this out right now too actually, it was just the sweetest thing anyone's ever done :)

I didn't know what to say or do, I wanted to drop everything and hug them really tight but since I was driving, I didn't think that was wise, heh. I'm definitely going to tell them how much it meant to me next time we hang out though.

So yeah I've been on cloud 9 since then and I just wanted to share that since it completely made my night!!

E: in case it wasn't clear I'm posting this here because I'm GQ pan (he/him is fine) and they are genderfluid",pansexual
Married and a little confused,I feel like pansexuality may describe me perfectly. I'm scared though because I'm married to a wonderful guy and I love him dearly.  We also have some adorable twins. But...  I feel like I fall in love with everyone. I will have an amazing conversation with someone and fall in love with them and daydream about them. I could accidentally touch someone and instantly see something in them I never saw before. This also makes me severely aroused to be around them. I feel like these feelings may one day hurt my family and I really don't want to do that.  This means old young fat skinny everyone...  I am a naturally flirty person and when I drink it's triple to quadruple fold.  I don't know how to approach this with my husband and I don't want it to ruin my relationship.  Does anyone have any tips and am I actually pansexual?,pansexual
Welp my GM found out I'm not straight,"I try my best to keep my personal life and work life separate. If people ask me about my sexuality I tell them but it's not like I go around telling everyone I'm not straight. Was talking to my GM today about a coworker we use to have that I never got along with. While this coworker and I didn't get along for many reasons one was because he overheard myself and another talking about how I'm into guys and girls and such. GM asks me about it since we were on the subject of said coworker. Apparently another coworker whom I've never told about my sexuality told our GM that I was bi. While I was tempted to correct her and say I was pan I decided to leave it be so I wouldn't have to explain what pansexual meant. While my GM didn't act weird or anything when I told her I wasn't straight still bugs me that she knows. I really just don't like my coworkers knowing much about my personal life because it's personal. Blah, my apologies for the random rant just annoyed slightly.",pansexual
So today I was tested.... (I think),"Last week, I finally came into finding my pansexual gender identity in which I celebrated with a friend over breakfast before telling her. She was pansexual too so she was happy for me and glad I found myself on my own identity without any influence on her part. Well today at work as we were going on lunch I had the usual funny argument with a guy that likes to start fights with me (I always win :P) but then as I go to my friend (who I came out to) she was standing next to my co-worker and i told them both I got into another argument with ""him"" again. She says laughing ""Why is it always the lesbians that like to pick on the gay guys."" Time seemed to slow down for a second when she said that because in my head I literally yelled ""I am not a lesbian bitch, I'm pansexual!"" (Sorry for bluntness I just want to say how it really happened) A week ago I would've found this completely funny and responded normally. 

In comparison to me finally accepting myself as pansexual, I've never come close to defending myself so strongly mentally when I identified as a lesbian. Do you think I was tested? and do you think how i reacted is normal? or have I not really accepted myself seeing as I said it mentally and not verbally?",pansexual
Im pretty sure...,"So if I can have sex with anyone, and I mean anyone, male in male body female in female body, male in female body, female in male body, fat skinny young old, attached, casual, or just a person to pass the afternoon with, I assume that means I'm pansexual right? Im still trying to figure out how to define the myriad of sexual emotions i feel towards people, and I thought maybe you guys could give me advice. I like girlish boys, and boyish girls, and ultra feminine girls and super masculine guys, and basically anyone under the sun besides children (never could understand the attraction) and just want to make love to everyone. Can someone give me a word of advice here?",pansexual
Pansexuality isn't a well defined term… from my point if view.,"I've noticed that many people in the pansexual community disagree on the various ""requirements"" of being pansexual. For instance, I am sort of confused on whether or not I would fit in here. I am a cis male who is only romantically attracted to girls or those who identify and express themselves as girls. However, I am sexually attracted to all genders. Could use some sage advice. ",pansexual
"Yay, alternate religion AND sexuality to come out as!","So, I have a bit of a dilemma. I'm in a very Irish Catholic family, and I happen to be a pansexual laveyan Satanist. Now, my family isn't likely to react well to either of those things, so I'm turning to the internet for advice. Should I come out about both all at once and just get past all the fallout as quickly as possible? Should I instead do one then the other? If so, which should I bring up first, and how long should I wait before I bring up the other? I realize I'm probably being needy, asking for advice from people with no idea what my life is like in detail, but I've been going through a lot lately, and my judgement hasn't been very good.",pansexual
Deciphering Pansexuality (X-Post from LGBT),"I've long identified myself as a bisexual. I didn't know what pansexual really meant. I have aways been open to all genders and types of people, and I realize now that I'm not bisexual because I'm not limited to attraction/loving just the male and female gender. I knew a long time ago that there were more than two genders but it's taken me this long to connect that with being pansexual (info. can be sparse).

Can other pansexuals confirm that I'm getting this correctly?

:D
",pansexual
Pansexual and/or Bisexual,"Hi 

So I consider myself both Pansexual and Bisexual and I was just curious if of the people here in /r/pansexual, how many out you exclusively use the term pansexual and how many of you would also use the term bisexual.
If you use both terms, what is your reasoning for using both. I genuinely am interested in this and would like to know your opinions. 

I'm also a youtuber and have done a video on the topic (http://youtu.be/osZxrqBJuSQ) while the responses have been good, it hasn't quite scratch the itch I have for people opinions.

So it would be great if you would let me know your opinions in this area, do you use both labels? if so what is your reasoning for using both? and if not do you think its bad for someone to use both labels?",pansexual
Help us find out more about pansexuality! Have your voices heard :),"Here is some queer friendly research from The University of Sydney investigating diverse sexual identities. Help represent the pansexual community by filling out the survey!!! Have your voices heard.

Follow the link below: 
https://www.psych.usyd.edu.au/limesurvey187/index.php?sid=69311&amp;lang=en
 ",pansexual
Need advice :&lt;,"Hello everyone

(I don't know if this is the right place to post this but here goes)

So yeah I'm pansexual and I've just found out that title that describes me best about 2 years ago because I always thought that bisexuality just didn't fit me because I've never really cared about whether the person is male or female or what he/she looks but what I cared most was how he/she treated me and other people etc.? Anyways so I'm not really open about my sexuality or myself and only a few people I really trust (I find it really difficult to truly trust anyone so when I say people I trust, I mean the people that I would gladly take a bullet for because those people mean a lot to me and I feel completely comfortable with them with anything really) knows that I am pansexual but I don't have a problem with telling people that I am pansexual if they directly ask me. Anyways I'm a 17 year old male and I just had my first ever crush. Yes I am serious. I personally hate the idea of having a relationship and I don't really end up liking anyone at all but when I first saw my crush, my heart started beating really fast when he's around and I enjoy that feeling but my problem is that my crush is a STRAIGHT male... The problem with that is he's very straight and possibly homophobic and I'm not really friends with him so I don't really know much about him. I know it's ridiculous, the fact that I don't know anything about him yet I find him to be very nice, gentleman like and when he's within my ""radius"" xD, it just feels really nice and I just can't help but secretly look at him and admire him... 
This is honestly making it really hard for me because I cant stop thinking about him at all even though I know that, one I don't have a chance at all because like I said he seems to be very very straight and possibly be homophobic and two, he's out of my league... Like 100 times out of my league, that's just how it feels and if somehow he ends up being bi or bi-curious which will never happen anyways, I still won't have a chance xD

So yeah... How do I keep him off my mind? It's been almost 4 months since I started crushing on him and friends and other places like youtube etc. always say to ""keep your mind busy by doing activities, reading books or playing games etc what ever you enjoy"" which does not seem to work at all and the crushing slowly making me go crazy since after I've finished reading my book or doing work or school work he just pops directly back in my mind again.  ",pansexual
Letter to the SJWs,"Stop nitpicking. Honestly. Pansexuality is one of the most free and open sexualities in the world. Chances are there are VERY few people with any sort of gender prejudice in our community. If we say we're pan cause we're into (insert general non-cisgender label here) we are NOT saying that we believe that person is not a man or a woman. We are saying we have no problems with any sort of transgender person. Binary or non-binary. Do not call me a cissexist again or I will have MANY colorful words for you. I have been lectured about this SO many times, I am done listening to it.",pansexual
Came out to family -- wasn't believed?,"Anyone else have this happen to them?

They think I'm just idealistic and I believe in love so much. I don't have the courage to be like, ""no you don't understand i think these many genders are HOT, not just tolerable or acceptable.""",pansexual
Stuff pansexuals need to know,,pansexual
My boyfriend gave me this to show that he accepted who I was,,pansexual
What should I do?,"My family is very much against homosexuality of any type. Conservative religious and all that. They have no idea I'm pansexual, but they do know that I dislike them discussing their views about it in front of me, but they do it anyways and laugh when I get offended. I'm far from ready to come out, but how can I tell them that I want them to stop talking about it in front of me? I've mentioned it before and my dad said he talks about it ""because he loves me."" I told him that didn't make sense and he just said he was never the brightest. Why won't they take me seriously? Do I need to tell them to get respect about it?",pansexual
Not sure what to do...,"Well yes all my posts have been in DPP, so I hope that won't look bad on me. But I am unsure what to do. I id as pansexual. So anywho I been talking to this person online I meet on a dating site. They said they where female. We talked over the phone and voice on Skye and trun on cam but never did anything sexual on cam. So anywho. I got to like this person very much I won't say love but just about. So the other nite I got a text from them saying they where male and just enjoy  having female side. Which I am ok with. It's not the fact they are make and Id as both male and female. It's the fact they waited so long to tell me, it feels like I been lied to all this time. I just unsure what to do.  ",pansexual
I need help.,"I need some advice on coming out to my father. I've already came out to my mother, it went very well. She said she had her suspicions, then we continued to drink our G&amp;Ts and watch Strictly come dancing. But coming our to my father is a bit more difficult for me. you see, my father and I can't hold a casual conversation. Every time we talk, it turns into multiple hours of him lecturing and dictating to me. He is also quite close minded, to the point where he tells me that I should cut my hair short and stop wearing so much black clothing (Note: most of my clothing is brightly coloured). Although we don't see eye to eye on many thing, I love him and I want him to know the truth about who I am. How can I tell him without getting lectured into next Wednesday? 
Thank you for taking the time to read this and for any comments you leave.",pansexual
"""I've got more than one membership, to more than one club""",,pansexual
Just came out to my best friend,"And holy crap I feel good. She's completely cool with it, being the grand human she is. And, after I explained the other thing I came out to her with, which was being gender-fluid, she was also great with that. 
I'm sure you're all kinda tired of these posts, but I just really, really, really, wanted to let people know, as I'm in more than an ecstatic mood as it stands.

So yeah.",pansexual
Just found this subreddit.,"I was going through random reddits and eventually thought to myself ""hmmm, I wonder if there's a reddit for pansexuals"" and there you guys were. I immediately felt like I was home. I read through the side bar and some of your posts before subscribing. 

I come from a tiny town that the slightly larger towns all around it haven't even heard of. The kind of place where anything different is beaten down and anything unheard of is usually likened to devil worship. I figured out I liked both males and females when I was in elementary school, though at that point I hadn't even heard of the term bisexual, let alone pansexual. 

By middle school I started becoming a little more comfortable with my sexuality, though I still didn't talk to anyone about it. In high school I began to get more curious about gender and sexuality and by my senior year I finally heard the term pansexual. I still told people I knew in person who I trusted that I was bisexual and began exploring this new identity online. The only thing I really found was ""Ew, don't tell people things like that"" or ""So....you like pans?"". 

I feel like I've had to hide this part of myself my entire life. Its just nice to find a place where I can feel accepted. The city I live in now (only 30 minute drive from where I grew up) is having a pride festival in October. I'm excited to go and hopefully finally feel comfortable enough to tell the world who I am. ",pansexual
Storms,Amazing thunderstorm happening here right now! Anyone else get aroused during storms?,pansexual
Coming out.,"I know that this particular community seems to be getting over the whole coming out thing and not really knowing what to do, but none the less I find my sell in that position. My parents are by no means fundamentalists, my father can be rather conservative when it comes to social issues but isn't close minded. My mother cried when she found some notes of mine back in highschool saying I liked a boy I knew at the time but I know she wouldn't really care either way...  I guess I was hoping that someone here would have some advise for explaining pansexuality to my parents because I don't think metaphors about tea and and their pots is going to work here.",pansexual
"If anyone here has a trans partner, you may be interested to know new subreddit straightandtrans is now open for your comments and submissions.",,pansexual
Strong trans* attraction?,"Lately I've noticed that a high percentage of the people I'm categorizing as extremely attractive are trans*. Does this mean I have a fetish, or do you think there could be something about hormone levels or slight androgyny? 

Must add, Buck Angel is the most beautiful human being I've ever seen.",pansexual
I am researching the dating of Pansexuals for a web series,"The series stars an extraverted asexual and her new roommate, an introverted pansexual, as they develop a friendship and deal with the social impact of society trying to define their sexuality. I would like to conduct some interviews to fully understand how to best represent Pansexuality via Skype or Google Hangout.",pansexual
Every time!,"Every time I form a close friendship, I end up being sexually attracted to them, even if they aren't my ""type"". I know demisexual is when you feel attracted to someone *only* when there is an emotional relationship, but what is it when I end up with sexual feelings *every time* I get close with someone, and I also still feel attraction to other people as well? ",pansexual
LGBTQAQ shunning?,"Has anyone else had this happen to them? I've been closeted a long time, and came out to a gay friend who is always supportive. I sort of got kicked around and called a pretender. :/",pansexual
Any sapiosexuals here?,"I never know exactly how to refer to myself in conversation. I usually say I'm straight these days, as mostly I find it's men I'm attracted to. But my two major relationships were with women. Sometimes I say I'm bisexual, other times pansexual, as I'm not particularly bothered by what someone's sex happens to be, or was.

But what I think I really am is sapiosexual, that is, attracted to a certain kind of intelligence, regardless of the body it happens to be attached to. Oddly there doesn't seem to be much of a community around that. Anyone else feel this way?",pansexual
Friend says she's pansexual,"But she bases it on that she doesn't ""connect sex and romantic feelings"" basically. Don't know how to put it, English isn't my first language but do you understand what I mean kind of? I did not think that was a part of pansexuality so if it is, let me now, and if it's not do you have any suggestions on what it might be?

Ps. I didn't tell her she was wrong and not going to suggest anything else and that's not why I am wondering. I am just curious and would like to now because I recently learned about pansexuality.",pansexual
Thought I was gay. realise i'm pan but feel i'm lying to people.,"Hey so 19M. I came out as gay a few months ago to my friends and college class. But I've recently discovered what being pansexual is and how much I identify with it. So I know feel that if I'm saying to my friends that actually I'm not gay I'm pan. Then they will think I'm lying or that I'm making it up.  

Thoughts would be greatly appreciated! ",pansexual
First Year Out,"Hi all, I don't really post here, but I've been subscribed for at least a year and a half. A year ago today, I came out publicly as pansexual on Facebook and I wanted to let you all know that it's been a year full of support and acceptance rather than hatred and harassment. It's been quite a journey and I thought you all would like to know :)",pansexual
Questions about gender,"I am in a committed relationship with a man, but I have been attracted to my female friends before. I find myself not really falling for someone unless I get to know them and we really click. I identify as being pansexual and I've never had a problem with it, but as I've gotten older I've noticed how much I always had trouble fitting into the gender mold. 

I'm biologically female, and I recently had a baby. Lately I've felt the pull towards femininity, but I have a feeling that was just the hormones and maternal instincts kicking in. Otherwise I have always felt in the middle of the gray area. I love acting in plays, but I always prefer playing the roles of men. And I make a convincing boy, but because I'm a girl I question if that has some sort of deeper meaning. I don't identify solely as a boy or girl, but is it weird to just not feel like I belong to any group?",pansexual
"New sub, my story (Wall of text) and a rant/question to top it off","hello everyone. this is my first post so excuse any mistakes or incorrect language, just thought i'd introduce myself and share my story, F(20) .

i understood i was different from an early age (around 5) i was watching TV an noticed women provocatively dancing and suddenly realized i had feelings that 5 year old girls aren't meant to have towards other girls but for boys, which coming from a very religious background (dad was training to be a vicar) i buried deep in my subconscious  and didn't think about till i was 8 and meet a girl in real life who i had feelings for, by then i thought i was a lesbian and totally terrified of this revelation ignored any feelings i had for anyone, i went most of my school life not dating, basically condemning myself to a life of asexuality (if i couldn't be 'normal' then i didn't deserve love)  sure there was the odd guy here and a few drunken kisses at parties with both genders but it wasn't till i was 14 and meet a guy that i realized i could have feelings for both genders, but it didn't stop there, the boy was bi and opened my eyes to the whole LGBT community and i honestly thought i had landed in heaven, i came to terms with the fact it was possibly and okay to like guys and girls and then one final revelation happened, i had a thing for trans people, along the lines of ' if they were a sweet and kind person with kind eyes i just couldn't help myself', it was like my sexual mind was finally open and i couldn't get enough so like a selfish kid in a candy store i wanted everything and anything.

i happily drifted around in non committed circles going for who ever made me smile or was just up for a bit of fun but i hadn't fallen in love at all, sure i had had crushes but not dated anyone ever. then i meet my bf at the time we were 16 both not 100% straight and both ready to dive into what ever life had to offer, 4 years on we're still dating, which leads me to my rant.

im a pansexual girl dating a bisexual guy and all my friends just think im strait and putting a fancy name to it, which hurts because i've explored so much into my sexuality and its take so much time for me to come to terms with who i am that when close friends think its a 'phase' or a 'joke' i get a little defensive, my question is how can i get my friends to understand my sexuality without coming across as some sort of sexual hipster?? 
hope everyone is having a lovely day and im very excited to, hopefully, become a part of this community ",pansexual
My BF4 emblem :3,,pansexual
"Identifying as ""gay"", ""lesbian"", or other typically-homosexual terms","Hey pansexual pals, I wanted to ask around and get a consensus of what you other pans think about being identified by typical ""homosexual"" terms. When I'm around my other LGBTQ friends, and even around some people in general, sometimes I find myself being identified as a ""lesbian"" even though this really isn't 100% true. I mean, I accept it, because I honestly relate well to a lot of ""lesbian"" things and watch ""lesbian"" films, etc, etc, but it really creates confusion sometimes when I tell a guy I like him and he goes, ""But aren't you into chicks?""

So how do you guys feel about this? Because pansexuality is like bisexuality in the fact that we seem to be unicorns and seem to not actually *exist* in normal culture, I feel like we get easily grouped into this hetero-homo binary. What do you do about it? Do you identify as these terms?",pansexual
What is Pansexuality? | Pansexual VS Bisexual,,pansexual
Thought you folks might like my new custom keycaps,,pansexual
My Pansexual Bracelets ... Made two of them :D,,pansexual
I did it on Facebook,,pansexual
Confused...,"  So, some of this might sound a little odd and maybe won't make much sense (it's early in the morning and I should really be asleep), but I am genuinely curious and didn't know who else to turn to. This has bothered me for a while.... I just stumbled upon this subreddit and feel like I need to get this off my chest.... Let me explain:

  About a year ago I realized that I'm bisexual. Most likely. I mean, I'm definitely attracted to girls, although I've never actually been with a girl. Only guys. Recently, I realized that I also find some transgendered people attractive, too. (Side note: I've always noticed that no matter how attractive the person is or what they look like, if they have a bad personality then they are absolutely unattractive to me. I'm really mostly attracted to a person's personality, and I've been that way my entire life.) I haven't found a sex or gender that I'm not attracted to, really. I think I might be mostly attracted to men... but, then again, I've only ever been with men.... Maybe that's just bias/confusion from only having been with men?
  I've had crushes on girls that I've been around (nothing too serious, since I'm currently in a very committed and loving   relationship) but i've never actually been around a transgendered person before; I've only seen interviews, or pictures, or porn. I guess I'm wondering if it's possible that maybe just the porn alone turns me on? In other words... I've heard of straight women liking lesbian porn and straight men liking transgender porn, so maybe I just like watching the porn but wouldn't actually be attracted to someone that's transgendered?? I really don't think that's what it is though.... But how can I be sure? Maybe I'm just second guessing too much or overthinking the issue.
  I used to identify with being straight (mostly due to my extreme sheltered and Christian upbringing), but I've always known deep down that I'm definitely not straight. So..... What am I? Has anyone else dealt with this specifically?
Any advice? Questions? Tips? How/when did some of you first realize that you're pan sexual? Is there anything you can tell me or advise me about? Should I really worry about a 'title' this much? I really hate not knowing and saying that I'm bi when, in all honesty, I don't know what I truly am. It's just doesn't feel right.",pansexual
"A short video about gender roles, learning from the opposite gender and a good friend who enjoys cross dressing",,pansexual
Facebook annoyes me :(,"Wanted to change my 'interested in men' to 'interested in everyone' but you can only choose men, women or men and women. Also noticed gender is only male or female? Ruined my day a little bit. ",pansexual
Need some advice on coming out to my girlfriend,"This is a throwaway account. I am a mid twenties male, and since puberty I've known that I don't just fancy girls. I experimented with a couple of guys when I was younger, and I've identified as pansexual since I was about 16/17. The people that I have fallen in love with in the past have all been girls, some who I have told about myself and some who I haven't. 

The girl I am currently with, I have been with 4 years and I plan to spend the rest of my life with. I've never cheated on her and I never intend on doing so. She's my best friend, and we have an emotional and sexual connection that I have never had with anybody else. Sounds pretty straight forward, right? 

Right at the start of us going out, we got drunk one night and I told her everything. I told her I am pansexual, and for me that means that I'm not attracted to guys AND girls, but just people, regardless of parts. I don't really remember the conversation, but I couldn't stay the night because I was going to watch a friend's DJ set later. The next morning I found some texts on my phone drunkenly saying that I have a hall pass, and I can sleep with as many guys as I want. Obviously I hadn't taken her up on it, but I could tell from the text that she was a bit freaked out. So that morning, absolutely hanging, I went to hers for breakfast, and I brought up the subject of the texts. Literally as soon I mentioned them, she said she had deleted the texts and asked if we could not speak about them, as she was embarrassed. I know I should have asked how she felt about what I told her, but I was crazy about her, and my thinking was that she would bring it up when she was ready. She never did. To this day, I still don't know if she knows.

There's a couple of small things that have stopped me from bringing it up again. There was one time I asked her to play with my ass during sex, which she did, but when the subject of girls sticking their fingers up their boyfriends' asses came up with her and her friends, she joined in with them when they said they were doing it to get their boyfriends to stop trying anal. Another time, her sister discovered that the guy she was seeing was bisexual, and that he asked her to use a strap-on, and the two of them were rolling about laughing and mocking the poor guy. Usually when something like this happens, I'll come out with ""people are people, if it's not hurting anyone then good on them for keeping things interesting"" or something quite vague like that, but I really got the impression that it had made them uncomfortable. Every time someone we know comes out, it's always the same shocked reaction with jokes and uncomfortable laughter.

I decided that I wouldn't really need to tell her. I've explored my sexuality enough to know who I am and what I want, and since I don't plan on sleeping with anybody else again, I figured why does it matter?  Not once have I ever told anybody I'm straight, so I don't feel like I've been lying (although I do realise lying by omission is still lying), but recently I've started an arts project that could potentially mean I will have the spotlight on me, and because of the content and the message I am trying to send, people will ask about my own sexuality, and I don't want to lie.

So before I go much further with this thing, I want to get everything out in the open with her. I know superficially she is not homophobic, but I do think that there is some subconscious prejudice there, and I don't want her to see me any differently from how she sees me now. 

I would appreciate any advice on how to bring this up, any good ways of explaining things that you may have used with your own SOs, and how they reacted/if your relationship changed at all.

tl;dr - I told my girlfriend I was pansexual when I was drunk 4 years ago, don't know if she remembers and need help bringing it up/coming out. ",pansexual
I'm a little lost and confused with my self.,"So I've identified with being a lesbian for a while now. The hat fit... almost a year ago. And I've been out of the ""closet"" for about 2-3 years now. Only ever have been with a girl. 

Now, I've done my research, and looked long and hard at my self. I favor personality and characteristics over gender and appearance a lot, although I won't lie that there are still things appearance wise that I favor over others. I'd go so far as to say as that I care about gender very little, and it annoys me to an end that is hard to describe. I would forgo it completely if I could.

I suppose the question is, can one grow/change in to a different form of sexuality? Can this seriously be just a phase? And If yes, how do I go about going, hey this is a thing now with family and friends?
",pansexual
Participate in a research study!,"My name is Elliot Tebbe, and I am a counseling psychology graduate student at the University of Florida.  I am conducting a study about the experiences of trans* individuals. With this study, I hope to contribute to the understanding of trans* people’s experiences and health in order to better meet the needs of trans* populations. Your participation is essential to achieving this goal, so I hope that you will take part in my study.

In order to participate, you must be at least 18 years of age, reside in the United States, and either identify within the trans* umbrella (e.g., transman, transwoman, FTM, MTF, genderqueer, gender variant, gender fluid, bigender, and others), or have experienced a gender transition but do not identify as trans* (e.g., stealth). If you would like to participate in my study, please click on the link below: 

Please note that depending on your privacy settings, the Internet host you are using may track and save user actions. For example, social networking sites may record and maintain information about the sites and pages visited and links activated while within network, and may use that information, linked to your identity, for marketing purposes and may provide that information to third parties. If you would like to participate, you may follow this link or you may access the survey outside of a social networking site by cutting and pasting the link into a new web page: [https://ufl.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_86u6fZFYnkZhBBz](https://ufl.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_86u6fZFYnkZhBBz) 

Thank you very much in advance for your time!  Please feel free to pass on this email to other eligible individuals.

If you have any question about this study, please feel free to contact us at the contact information listed below. Also listed below are resources for anyone in need of additional support. This research has been approved by the University of Florida Institutional Review Board (UFIRB #2013-U-1296). 

Elliot Tebbe
(Counseling psychology graduate student)
Email: entebbe@ufl.edu
Phone: (352) 327-8864

Bonnie Moradi, Ph.D.
(Counseling psychology professor)
Email: moradib@ufl.edu
Phone: (352) 273-2159


Resources


Phone numbers: 
The Trevor Project 's 24/7 Lifeline:
866-4-U-TREVOR (866-488-7386), 

National Suicide Prevention Lifeline: 
1-800-273-TALK (8255)

Online, live chat services: 
Trevor Chat, the Trevor Project’s online messaging service:
[http://www.thetrevorproject.org/chat](http://www.thetrevorproject.org/chat)

Transgender Service Prevention Hotline Service Online:
[http://www.lauras-playground.com/chat.htm](http://www.lauras-playground.com/chat.htm) 

Additional resources: 

Gay &amp; Lesbian Alliance Against Defamation’s (GLAAD) transgender resources:
[http://www.glaad.org/transgender#resources](http://www.glaad.org/transgender#resources) 

National Center for Transgender Equality’s resource page:
[http://transequality.org/Resources/](http://transequality.org/Resources/) 

Laura’s Playground resource page: 
[http://www.lauras-playground.com/tg_resources_laura.htm](http://www.lauras-playground.com/tg_resources_laura.htm) 
",pansexual
I need help telling my parents.,"I am lost. I know i'm pan and have told two of my friends and they supported me, as one is FTM and pan and the other is MTF asexual. But I have no clue on how to come out to my mom, and gramdma, who i live with, and my dad, who I don't live with and only facetime on weekends. Please all tips and advice would be appreciated (I'm 15 and male) ",pansexual
Pan turned lesbian?,"I've been on /r/pansexual for quite some time now and love all of your posts.

For clarity, I'm female.

For as long as I remember I've always been pansexual (I called myself bi for a long time before discovering pan). I've dated and had sex with girls and guys with no issue. Gender just didn't matter to me. I've only dated guys over the past year or so (Just how it worked out). 

I've been with my current boyfriend for about 6 months. He's perfect in almost every way (I won't bore you with details). We are in an open relationship, free to date whomever else we like and would love to have a triad with anther girl.

So here is the big issue; Over the last 2 months I've started losing my attraction to guys, at first it was just not being physically attracted to men but attraction was still possible if we hung out and got to know each other. This has sort of declined to the point where I have no attraction to men and the idea of a relationship feels wrong for me. I just can't seem to have any romantic connection. 

This has slowly started to affect my attraction to my BF. Right now I still want to be with him. I don't find him physically attractive but still get turned on when he talks to me and touches me. It seems to have affected our sex life, I just get bored and tired during sex and want to stop.

I'm really hoping that has something to do with not being with a girl for such a long time and after dating girls I start to become more pansexual. Then again, I may be clutching at straws :( 

Any advice is appreciated but I'm not sure it'll do any good.",pansexual
Sooo I guess I'm pansexual...now what?,I'm just kind of realizing this and accepting it.Do I get a flag or a shirt or something?,pansexual
Pansexual Pride (x-post from LGBTBliss),,pansexual
Does this make sense?,"I have been in a relationship with my husband since I was 15 (I am 30 now). I love him and am extremely committed to him. But over the past few years, I have begun to reconcile and realize some aspects of my sexuality. 

When I was younger, I was a ""tomboy"", and actually, looking back on it, I found females attractive before males. I also grew up in a very Christian and conservative environment, so honestly, I just never considered it. 

For the past year, I've identified as bisexual, as I find both men and women attractive, and thought that, if I weren't married, I would consider a relationship with a woman as easily as another man. However, in the past while, I've thought that it may not be as simple as that, and also realizing with more research that gender is more fluid than I had considered, especially talking with a friend who does not identify as either male or female. I'm realizing that I find not just males and females attractive, but individuals of other genders, too. 

I ""came out"" to my husband as bisexual, and he's perfectly fine with it, nothing in our relationship has changed. I've also told a few close friends. But now I'm thinking, am I really? I know it seems kind of silly to feel the need to define it, but I guess I'm just posting here to get an opinion. I don't know how else to ask, and this sounds like a stupid way to ask, but does it ""sound"" like I would be pansexual? ",pansexual
Help me discover how to identify.,"I currently identify as pansexual. I used to consider myself bi, but I changed to pan because I realized I loved for someone's personality not their looks ( or genitalia for that matter, ) but after reading the posts here, I am truly questioning who I am. I love for personality but also love both sexes for their own individual emotional quirks. I don't really find myself physically attracted to either sex. Am I a bi who judges personality, or a pan who isn't really gender blind? Help.
",pansexual
Happy pan cake day everybody :),,pansexual
Pansexual Heteroromantic,"So, only recently, nearly a year ago, I've come to realize I'm pansexual. I'm a 23 year old man. I feel sexual attraction to a lot of different gender people, be it female, male, trans M2F or F2M, androgynous or gender-fluid... But I've also come to realize I'm a heteroromantic. When it comes to dating, I think I'd date only women. And what kinda scares me is does that mean I can actually call myself pansexual? I mean, because of heteroromanticism, I don't feel the need to come out to anybody, I don't share the ""pride"" in pansexuality that I see in this subreddit, sexuality for me is just something that's....there.

So, do you think I can call myself as pansexual? And do you think I wouldn't be shunned by the LGBT community, as I've seen a lot of hate and bickering and shaming inside the LGBT community (my sister is bi and has gotten hate from both straight people and distrust from lesbians).",pansexual
Don't Know What I'm Doing,"So, I'm pretty sure that I'm pansexual. But for some reason, I've been feeling very uncomfortable whenever I think about it lately. I don't know why; it's not something I feel bad about. Does anyone else ever feel like this?",pansexual
Hey r/pansexual! I've created a new subreddit that showcases the positive sides of LGBTQQIA life. Having a rough go of it? Come check us out!,"I've created a new LGBT subreddit that focuses on the positive aspects of life in the LGBT community. I've found myself being very negative about LGBT events and life recently - and for good reason. But I know I'm not the only one. I wanted to create a space where we can escape from the hatred and hurtfulness that we sometimes encounter in our daily lives. I would like for [LGBTBliss](http://www.reddit.com/r/lgbtbliss) to provide just that.

A place where we can post stories, news articles, experiences, pictures, and whatever else that may put a smile on our faces, if just for a few minutes. I literally just started it, so I need all the visibility I can get to really get this subreddit going. If you think this is something you would enjoy participating in, please start posting away.

Thanks in advance, y'all!",pansexual
Argh I don't know what I am anymore.,"About 2 years ago I identified as a gay woman. I was in a psychiatric hospital (yeah I know, sounds like I'm crazy, but yeah, depression can really fuck you up). I met this girl who was transitioning to a guy but was still a girl, so we ended up having a thing, which ended badly. 

I met another girl who was in the process of becoming bigender, and I was attracted to her. We had a short-lived relationship. I then fell for my best guy friend later, and suddenly realized that I wasn't so gay anymore. 

Then, I didn't know what I was, but after the relationship ended, I went back to identifying as gay, thinking that because the relationship ended, I must be gay.

Fast forward to me having sex with my best girl friend, and I quite enjoyed it. I was torn between which gender I enjoyed more during sex. I was very confused tat that point, and stopped identifying as gay. I didn't have any clue as to what I was at that point, and I know I shouldn't worry so much about labels, but once I have one I feel much more comfortable with myself for some reason.

Now I'm dating a guy whos is mentally female. All I know now is that I'm not straight. What am I? I have no clue now. I think I might be pan, but I'm not sure. 

Please help me clear my own confusion about myself. I'm so lost in identification.",pansexual
Difficulty explaining identity to others,"Recently, people assume I'm bisexual even after I have explained that I identify as pansexual. I don't want to be rude and don't quite know how to correct people when they make this mistake. 
At the same time, I worry that I don't do a good enough job of explaining what pansexuality is to others. Any advice? ",pansexual
"BBC Radio 4 - Woman's Hour, Pansexuality; about 30mins in",,pansexual
Pretty open minded considering this was 1977,,pansexual
Does this rule me out from pansexuality?,"I'm not sexually attracted to most transgenders, specifically those that go the route of sex reassignment (it mostly turns me off except for cute feminine boys that cross-dress without actually looking like a real female, but just because they play one of my kinks).

I'm also not ""gender-blind"" as I do behave sexually and romantically differently with people that fall in male, female or somewhere in between or plainly outside of that between. I acknowledge the existence of more than just two genders (or even the lack of it) for some individuals, but my mind has a hard time grasping the concept and instead sees fluidity between the traditional male/female identities (or a suppression/denial for picking one).

HOWEVER, I am attracted to androgynous and even intersex people, as long as the mix doesn't clash too much (mostly bodily hair, build, breast development, musculature, etc.)

For me, people's personality plays a bigger role than physical appearance, although it may play a role as an extra plus/bonus, and definitively the gender shapes the relationship, especially when it gets more intimate.

&gt; Bottom of the line: I'm in a polyamorous relationship and one of them is intersex, previously identifying as female but now identifying as male, and it isn't bothering me at all because I fell in love with her/him for the personality and as our relationship escalates I feel I want to express that love physically. **Yet, I wouldn't date a transvestite/transsexual because my mind detects there's something wrong in them (conflict, which I avoid because I'm full of it as is).**

I'm sorry if I worded things and they came out slightly disrespectful for any of you, but that's simply how I'm wired. No real disrespect is meant but transsexual people isn't my cup of tea~",pansexual
Help me find out who I am,I definitely am attracted to both guys and girls so for a long time I thought I was bisexual but now I've developed a crush on a friend who is a transgender guy. So I've been thinking I might be pansexual? All my serious love-interests so far have been male. Is it possible to be a pansexual with a preference for guys? Or is it just a 'phase'  ,pansexual
Pansexual with preferences?,"Can a pansexual person still have physical preferences in a partner? Like race, hair color, tall or short? Or would that be considered a different sexual preference? I'm confused.",pansexual
How do I explain pansexuality and non-binary to my friend?,"How do I explain to my friend pan sexuality, mainly, non-binary folk. What do I say as a comparison, like, pie or cake. I don't know what the word for that is, but what do I say, I've already said I'm 'basically bisexual, but it's a bit more complicated' and let him know that, yes, I plan on dating men, and women.",pansexual
"never search ""pansexual"" on twitter..","you have no idea how many people think ""so pansexuals are attracted to cookware??"" or any other version of that is funny/extremely original. ",pansexual
"I deleted my other post by accident; Is this bad, I can't tell?","This is because my other post was accidentally deleted because I'm on my ipad, and Steve jobs is terrible human being (No one comment on this part by the way)

It is school holidays, I'm 13 M in primary school. Yeah, sexuality shouldn't be a high priority. However, I am going to go to my (M) friend, and say ""I'm bi"", less bluntly, but that's the basis. Coming out, basically. ""Why is this in the Pansexual, you devious youngster?"" Well, I know I am pansexual, however, I don't think, being a 13 year old Christian, my friend would see me quite the same, liking ""Non-Binary"" people (in addition to the 2 binary genders), he's not immature, but I can't know how he reacts. Should I explain the gender-queer thing and other (agender, ect) which is possibly the thing that will confuse him most, or should I wait till he's mature enough to not go ""Eww"". I am not saying he's stupid, he's quite clever, I'm saying, maybe I should soften the burn, then reveal it all. He's 13, and we're usually like that, and him not having any personal relation with non-binary people, he's stuck with stereotypes to go off. So should I trust him to understand? He has 2 Grandmas (homosexual, not trans*) after all, and he has never talked ill of them, nor have I. He knows I'm understanding, but I still am not sure.

TL;DR: Should I say I'm bi to my understanding Christian friend (who isn't preachy, mind you. He knows I'm atheist), or should I use bisexuality as a stepping stone (however, that could give bisexuality a bad name), and say I'm pansexual later.",pansexual
Looking for someone to relate to [rant/curiosity],"This post is going up at 5 in the morning, my time, so chances are it won't be seen, but if I don't write it now, I'll forget. Also, I apologize for any ugly wording; I have not slept yet, even though I really need to.

Anyway, hi. I'm a polyamorous pansexual, and I've found that I get crushes effortlessly. I just open my heart too easily, I suppose. I'm a 21-year-old guy, and I've had eight crushes in the past seven years, six of which have only developed in the last four years. And I guess I'm looking for somebody else who's experienced this. I feel like most people only have one or two crushes by my age, and then they actually find somebody who likes them back and they get together, at least for a while. And I simply find the people I'm close to attractive, because they're awesome people.

I do this spiral where they become close friends, then I become romantically interested in them, then physically interested. This happens with all of my friends, when we start hanging out more often. It hasn't really proven... problematic, but it has taken a toll on me, emotionally. Because I get feelings for them, and due to my need to be honest, I tell them, and the feelings, so far, are never reciprocated.

I know I'm only 21, I know there are plenty of fish in the sea, and I've told myself that hundreds of times. I just want somebody to actually like me back for once.

I dunno. I'm not trying to present a sob story here, nor am I looking for a solution. I just feel like there's something wrong with me, like I'm pathetic for letting my heart out there so much. And maybe there is, and maybe I am. But I'm curious to see if there's anybody else who has had this issue.

Thanks in advance!",pansexual
"Actually not so sure anymore... [Rant, maybe]","I'm using a blank throwaway because my girlfriend knows my reddit account. I need to sort this out independent of her, because I think I might actually be gay.

Ok. I'm a male in my early 20s. Quite a few months ago, after the end of a long term relationship, I started questioning and researching, and eventually came to the philosophically satisfying conclusion that I am pansexual. It felt great! I came out to a lot of my friends on an individual basis, got out, met people, dated around, and even had a pretty fun thing with some polyamorous folks for a bit. It was mind-opening. I was attracted to everyone I chose to be with regardless of gender, and the split was fairly even, though I didn't actually date any of them long term. I felt freed.

Then I met a girl. She's perfect in nearly every way. We drunkenly bonded over the same fandoms, have a lot of similar hobbies, our personalities mesh, her parents are cool, and we are able to quell each others' anxieties just by being around each other. She's really incredible. Even the sex is mind-blowingly good. We got to the point of calling each other ""girlfriend"" and ""boyfriend"" pretty quickly. Lately, though, one thing had been eating away at me with no logical explanation: Her gender.

It's killing me. Pansexuality seemed so perfect. I'm a humanist, I'm a therapist, I love people, and I love to find the good in people. But for some reason it doesn't feel right. I'm sexually attracted to her. I even REALLY like her. She's quickly become my best friend. I can rely on her, and open up to her...

But I'm feel so attached to the idea of dating a boy, almost obsessively. I shouldn't be so focused on that if I'm really pansexual, right? I don't really know what to do. I've even talked to her about it (crying, breaking down after an already shitty day), and her holding me even made me feel better. But I can't shake the feeling that I might not be as equally attracted as I thought.

Has anyone here had a similar experience? How did you handle it? Is it just that I haven't had a boyfriend yet? Maybe after one relationship I'll be able to go back to not caring. Or maybe I am just homoflexible. I don't know.

tl;dr: Male, thought I was pansexual and got a girlfriend, but I think I might actually be just gay. Not sure what to do.",pansexual
A question of definition,"Hi I some time ago began questioning my sexuality.  After reading and learning a lot I think I have come to the conclusion that pan-sexuality fits the best, I think.  The only thing that doesn't seem to fit with me about it is this idea of ""gender blind"".

I don't 'feel' gender blind mostly because what i find attractive about a woman isn't the same qualities that if find attractive in a man, and even more so in people of non-gender binaries.  Now I understand that people don't belong in boxes, but I was hoping someone might help me find a better term for how i feel.

Thank you so much for the help
TL;DR: is pansexual the right term if I love each unique gender for its own unique reasons? ",pansexual
"Aaand I would like to thank reddit for creating this beautiful subreddit. (A story, a rant, and some venting, with a lot of parenthesis)","So I identify myself as a pensexual; however, it was a few months ago that I found an accurate label for my sexuality (not to mention a very *slight* struggle to come to terms with it). After talking to an online friend, whom is knowledgeable about such matters, I was able to accept myself for who I am (this may sound like a big struggle, but really I wasn't that insecure, more like unsure). After that, I kind of blew off my sexuality as I didn't think I would feel lonely or anything, since a majority of my friends are LGBTQ. Alas, over time, I found myself to feel quite lonely and ""unique"" (don't take this as arrogance, it's more like ""unique"" in the sense of isolation, as there wasn't anyone i could relate too). So after talking to the previously mentioned friend, she mentioned Reddit, to which I cringed. I confess that I am a refugee from 4chan and that I looked down upon reddit for, well, being Reddit. When I learned from CGPGrey that Reddit had subreddits and such, I began to see how diverse reddit is and so, I find myself here right now, reading posts from r/pansexual, feeling less alone and happy to know there is a community I can really connect with. I guess that ends my rant (h-hope someone reads my first post)",pansexual
Non-binary social network PURPL would like input from the pansexual community before launching site.,,pansexual
"Identify as Pans, but say Bi?","Hey all just a bit stressed and curious how everyone handles these situations. 

So, I personally identify myself as pans, but I've come to find many people don't really know what pans is. Since, I figured Bi was a close enough sexuality that's more easily known I've just been telling people who ask that I'm Bi. But in that I've come to find just how stressful that is. Not only because it would be easier to just say I'm pans without having to explain myself, but I feel so ostracized by a significant amount of people when I say I'm Bi. Gays usually try to sway me to be fully gay and a lot of women find that bisexuality is untrustworthy or something. 

I don't know it's all just incredibly stressful and I'm not really sure how to handle things. I feel like it makes it really hard to be in a relationship unless I just start lying and telling gays I'm gay and women I'm straight. Because if saying I'm Bi is so hard to compute I don't understand how anyone outside of other pans are gonna fully understand.   ",pansexual
Proud to be Pansexual,,pansexual
Christmas coming out,"So i came out to my dad today. We've had long talks before about really deep topics and now I am closer to him now than I ever was, so I decided to tell him that I am pansexual. I knew he was an open minded person because he has told me his views on several things. I started out beating around the bush, reminding him of when I was ally, then i finally mustered up the strength to tell him that I identified most with pansexuality. It didn't come as a surprise to him because he said that there was some ""gay gene"" on his side of the family. My aunt (his sister) is a closeted bisexual, his cousin is a closeted lesbian, and he himself is very fluid in his sexuality, so much so that he didn't care to label it. I was so surprised and so happy to know that I wasn't alone :). To wrap this up he just told me to go with the flow and to never change who I am for anybody. Before I really got to know my dad, inside and out, I thought both my parents were strict african christians (they're still african if anyone was wondering), but it turns out it was just my mom. My dad had completely different views that he never brought up for the sake of keeping the peace between him and my mom. I'm planning on coming out to my mom before I go to college (so in about 2 years). I know seeing her reaction will be tough but as long as i have my dad and my siblings behind me I will be okay. All in all, my Dad's overwhelming acceptance was the best Christmas gift I've gotten and I felt like sharing a part of the experience with you guys :) 

P.S: any tips for coming out to a very anti-gay strict christian mother?
(so anti gay that she hates Ellen Degeneres. Who could hate Ellen!)",pansexual
Do I count?,Can I still identify as pansexual if I have a preference for women and can't really see myself being with a cis man(I am a trans girl and have an aversion to penises) but do not preclude the possibility?,pansexual
"Deadpool's writer, Gerry Duggan, states that Deadpool is Pansexual (well, ""omnisexual,"" but whatever)",,pansexual
A little bit of a vent/rant.,"So I'm going out with this amazing guy who is pretty much perfect for me in almost every single way... someone better for me (at least in this point of my life) probably doesn't exist. I've been with him for 10 months, we lost our virginities to each other and I love him with all of my heart.

But sometimes I long for a girlfriend... like really, really long for one. I don't want two relationships and I don't want to leave my boyfriend but it's just something I never really had despite always being attracted to girls and not always sure if I was attracted to guys.

I don't think it helps that everyone assumes I'm straight and treats me as such (for instance asking me if I'd have sex with guy a or guy b if I weren't with my boyfriend) even though my boyfriend is literally the first guy I've ever felt romantically attracted to. Even if I tell people that the majority seem to still see me as straight. It's also still sounds weird saying I have a boyfriend or calling him 'my boyfriend'...

I'm not looking for advice but if anyone has any I'd be willing to hear it. Or if anyone has a similar story then that'd be grand to hear too. :)",pansexual
Just came out on (f)acebook!!!! Heart racing!!!! Venting!!!,"I came out to my immediate family just over a year ago, which was the scariest thing I'd ever done, even though everyone reacted well, and me and my long-time bf have an open relationship now, which is brilliant.

But every time I try to flirt with a woman, naturally the topic of ""are you seeing anyone"" comes up and I can't lie and I can't just wordvomit my life story over her, and they just keep assuming I'm straight &amp; taken, and I'm just SO good goddamn TIRED of having to find a subtle way to indicate everything!!!
So fuck it! 
Here goes!
Eek!!!!
Also, stealing a brilliant idea from a fellow redditor: to make up for feels-ing all over y'all, have a picture of some pretty ladies kissing I found on the internet! 
(If the link works. This is actually my first post.)
AHHHHGGGGGGGG!!!!!
(not so) STEALTH EDIT: [ladies!] (http://imgur.com/m2X2VzN)",pansexual
I made a new sub pan4pan! Aka shameless plug : )!,,pansexual
Question of sexual terminology issuing the lack of distinction to a specified age.,"As a pansexual I was curious about something, in particular. When it comes to age, for the most part, I don't differentiate. I don't mind the idea of making love to any age of woman, or feminine body. however an old masculine body just gives me the creeps. (hahaha! XD). I don't preference gender on many levels. However, I'm interested in knowing what it means to be attracted to all age ranges. any terminology that is used for this? or is this just a ""degree"" (if there is such a thing) of ""pansexuality"".

  *edit*** And sorry, that topic head makes absolutely no sense... I must have been drunk &gt;&lt;...",pansexual
I took the Kinsey Scale Test... this was my result.,,pansexual
Mmm... alligators... (x-post r/tumblr),,pansexual
"[Rant]You're dating a dude, so you're not bi!","First off I just told you, I'm not bisexual I'm pansexual, completely different. Also, just because I'm dating someone who is male does not mean I'm straight. Also just because I'm not a lesbian doesn't mean I haven't gone through a lot of the same shit others in the LGBT community has. I haven't gone through the same amount but I've still gone through shit. Jesus.",pansexual
How do you explain pansexuality to people? What analogies do you use?,"As someone who doesn't feel the need to hide the fact that I'm pansexual, who is masculine/'straight-acting' and often hangs out at gay bars/clubs, the sexuality question often comes up and I always answer honestly (that I'm pansexual). This then leads to follow up questions about what pansexuality means/is.

I usually go with the explanation that pansexuality is like 'gender blindness', and that while do I have a physical type (feminine looking, but not necicessily fem-acting), personality is the primary influencing factor in my attraction to people (at least in a meaningful respect).

Most people can grasp this concept, and while I will attempt to further explain if needed, I don't give much credence to the scepticism posed by those who cant. Although, as someone who likes to communicate ideas and promote understanding I would be very much interested in hearing the explanations or analogies others have found effective in explaining pansexuality to others.

Any and all opinions would be appreciated!",pansexual
Am I alone?,"sorry i know its wierd to come here and vent but I just felt like I needed to. I identify as a pan, and I now know what I am and stuff wasn't always that way though, actually its more of a recent development.

Have you ever felt that you are the only person on this planet that was meant to not find love, that your a great person but love is just something you just can't have? everytime you find someone you like and you try to make something of it it never works out either they don't like you in that way, or even worse you can't find a way to say what you feel? I've heard the whole speal about how you'll find it someday and what not but what if it never happens... sorry if I bored you or brought your mood down... just venting I guess -_-",pansexual
felt like saying heyyyy:3,"howdy!

some of you may know me from me complaining about my parents, but here i am just to introduce myself:3

HI! 

http://imgur.com/a/Pgikw
thats me hahaah


anyway, hi!

im on ask.fm if anyone wants to check me out: http://ask.fm/banana42823


love you, dolls:3",pansexual
Removing the sexual lamination,"Hi everyone,
I guess ill touch upon the title a little more; as it currently stands I feel like I'm on a sexual adventure (mostly theoritical to be fair) and the more i explore, the more ridiculous sexual barriers seem. Most of my exploration has been to see what human contact can swell sexual emotion in me and different sorts of pornography. With this I have yet to find a genre that is impossible to cum to, but some are more exciting than others. My current greatest interest is a feminine looking she-male with a huge cock. In terms of relationships, Mind-mates and explorers are the key to my sunken heart.

Anyways, i was wondering if it was common for people to discover their sexuality in a systemic way or is it usually more fluid? And is there any advice to meet open people with which to more intimately explore pan-sexuality and relationships. ",pansexual
Are all these labels and bickering really necessary?,"I don't know what sexuality I am, and that's just the way I want it to be because I love people for who they are, not what they are (I'm sure you guys can relate), but if people could just stop arguing over what the true definition of their sexuality is in order to prove what they identify with, it would solve a lot of bullshit. YOU decide who you are, not a dictionary. You know who you are and who you love and nothing else has the power to confirm or deny that. 

I think one of the big problems in this world is that people are too infatuated with who other people's love, and then it's easy to sit and criticize them- maybe because you disagree, or maybe because they don't match up to the definition you found during a Wikipedia binge- and I'm pretty sure that most of you know the feeling of being criticized about who you love. 

So yeah, this is my new rant against the world. Fuck labels man really. Next I think I'll go release the marine life from SeaWorld...

“People are too complicated to have simple labels.” 
― Philip Pullman



",pansexual
pan pride mani!,,pansexual
How did you realise you're pan and not bi?,"This is probably an over-asked question on here, but please hear me out. I get the whole pansexuality thing and what's about, I also know the difference between bi and pan, pansexuality is about liking people regardless of gender or liking more then 2 genders, but not many people seem to be not a woman or not a man. So how did you know you're pan without actually having met someone who isn't male or female? Or am I asking the wrong question?

Thanks :)",pansexual
META: Pansexuality v. Demisexuality,"Wondering if we can't talk about terminology a little. A lot of people treat pansexualuty as equivalent to demisexuality but pansexuality, to me, is different. 

**Pansexuality:** experiencing sexual attraction to people of all genders. 

**Demisexuality:** experiencing sexual attraction only if there is a close, personal bond to the person. 

* *How are they different?*

Demisexuals may be hetero/homo sexual and pansexuals might not be demisexuals.

I think it helps to break apart the concept of attraction into sexual attraction and romantic attraction. Sexual attraction has to do with who excites you sexual, who you feel sexual desire towards, while romantic attraction has to do with people who you want intimate, romantic relationships with, people who you fall in love with, etc. A pansexual might be panromantic or even aromantic, and maybe hetero/homoromantic. A demisexual may be panromantic, but they might also be hetero/homo romantic and can be any kind of sexual; homo/hetero/pan. Demisexuality usually excludes aromantic as an option, though it's not impossible. An asexual might be panromantic as well. And none of these definitions are the absolute definition, nor are these different terms sufficiently all encompassing. 

* *Why bring this up?*

I'm pansexual, but I'm not demisexual nor totally panromantic. Many of you are, and that's great! Many of you, maybe even most of you, also seem to be demisexual, pansexual, and panromantic - fantastic! But because I'm not demisexual, and panromantic doesn't quite cover me, the phrase *""hearts not parts""* doesn't work for me. If it works for you, great! Embrace it. But please don't define all pansexuals as being the same because we're not. I'm not. And that excludes me. 

I am pansexual. I find people of all different kinds of genders sexy, but not everyone in the world. And while I feel attracted to people of all kinda of genders, the attraction changes depending on their gender presentation. And then there's other obvious personal preferences which, while not as strong, certainly influence who I am attracted to. I am attracted to masculine type people in a different way than feminine type people, and differently attracted to men than women, and non-binary people are different still. There are some people who I am just not attracted to, regardless of who they are. The parts, gender, gender expression, and a whole bunch of things all factor into my sexual and romantic attraction, and I don't feel equal attraction towards every variation even if I am open to any variation in principle. I'm just not wholly limited by gender like someone who is monosexual (homo/hetero), or even bisexuals.

So that's what I wanted to talk about. You're not obligated to change anything or the way you use words or define things, I just thought if give my perspective and see how if anyone else feels the same. It might seem pedantic, but it's how I feel. Thanks for hearing me out. ",pansexual
Hi everybody,"To mercifully spare you a wall of text, I'm just going to link to [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/pansexual/comments/1o0rnf/recently_realised_im_pansexual/ccqtq4h) comment and share a little bit more about my feelings ~two weeks into this new perspective on my sexuality.

One thing I noticed was how offensive some things really are. For example, my little brother has this ""sassy voice"" he uses when he wants to mock something effeminate. A few years ago I might have found it funny, and a month ago I might have thought it was a bad talentless joke, but now? Well, its not funny now. Its quite offensive, backwards, and downright mean. And unfortunately I realize I'm looking into a mirror of my own past.

Speaking of looking back on my past, I realized that I have this habit of shaving my head when I felt ""too effeminate"", like this was making me ""dirty"" and I had to purge it to ""purify"" myself. Well since coming to terms with my sexuality those feelings have went away. Come to think of it, that probably came from some negative reenforcement I received as small child about that sort of thing. Besides I look pretty goofy bald anyway.

Another thing I learned which is a bit tangential, but ""in private"" mode on the iOS version of Chrome is pretty terrible at not tracking you, so don't use it. 

",pansexual
"Nobody to talk to, need help telling SO?","Throwaway, just because he knows my main account &amp; looks at it regularly.

I'm a 21 year old female &amp; I've been living with my boyfriend for over a year now. 
When we began this relationship, I told him I was straight. I always had an inkling that I liked girls as well, but I didn't think much of it. Regardless, I still never felt right about calling myself bisexual.

Ever since we moved here, I've lost contact with my old friends because they're so far away and in 14+ months, I've yet to make new ones. So I've had a lot of time to be alone with my thoughts and I came to the conclusion that it really doesn't matter to me what a person identifies as. Male, Female, Trans, etc. I love it all. I'm just not sure how to convey this to my boyfriend because I'm a bit afraid. He's spoken badly about an ex-girlfriend of his who cheated with another girl, so he's a bit touchy. What do I say ? I'm terribly awkward and unsure of how to bring it up. :(

I've love to maybe make like-minded friends who can help. 

Please &amp; thank you in advance. (:",pansexual
So I came out to my parents...,"Sorry if this is typed badly im on an iPod...

So I came out to my parents a few weeks ago and basicLly theyve been making Fun of me ever since... They keep trying to convince me im not because I can't be Christian and ""bisexual""(as they call it) and all kindsa shit about how they'll love me Jo matter what but I'm making a bad decision and obviously I can't love Jesus and the same gender so I can't be Christian... 
Ugh it's just awful I can't be a religion or a sexuLity without it being a huge deal.-. A few days after I came out I tried to kill myself after the way they were treating me but obviously It didn't work....


I hTe this and I know now that my parents will never take menseripuslg or respect me ever again... That on top of them not trusting menanywY and the emotional abuse has just put me in this spiral that's slowly draining my soul...

Sorry to put this o to guys but y'all know better thanNtone whYits like to go through this....",pansexual
Recently realised I'm pansexual.,"Over the past few years I was never really sure about who I was. I kept saying that I was straight because, to tell the truth, I didn't really know how I felt about my own sexuality and have always been scared of saying anything other then that.

I knew that I wasn't straight but never felt that I was gay either. Back then I didn't know about pansexuality so being bisexual was the only thing that seemed to fit with my sexuality. But even bisexual didn't feel like the right way to put it.

A couple of weeks ago a friend of mine at college was writing an article about gender discrimination. We got talking about it and he later asked me how I identified myself. It took quite a bit of courage but I knew that he was one of the easiest people to talk to I would be able to find so I told him how I felt about my sexuality. He told me that I was probably pansexual.

It's taken a little while for me to understand myself but now I'm happier then I have been in a long time. It finally feels like I know who I am and I don't have to hide from myself.",pansexual
"Favorite response to ""You're not really pansexual, you're bi and just splitting hairs and dividing the community.""",,pansexual
How does one deal with parental rejection?,"Backstory:
&gt;I recently discovered that I am pansexual, yet have never mentioned a word to anyone (especially my family).
&gt;When I discovered that there was a community at my school GSA (Gay Straight Alliance) -as they also support pansexuals/bisexuals-, I contemplated joining to hopefully met others ""like me"". 
&gt;At some point in a conversation with my mother, I struggled answering the question ""what club do you want to join"". When I finally responded and said GSA, my mother laughed and said ""Why would you want to join such nonsense, focus on your academics"". It hurt when she said that but I simply didn't reply. Later on in the conversation she stated ""You know men aren't all bad, just because I had an abusive relationship doesn't mean you need to like girls"".
&gt;This statement pissed me off leading me to say ""it's not that I have a choice, I like both males &amp; female people"". After hours of silence I tried convincing her about the club, yet she ignored me stating its a waste of time &amp; shouldn't follow me when I apply to university.
&gt;I have always had a strong relationship with my mother, and hoped in the distant future that she would accept my sexuality... Yet I feel as if I have been completely rejected, by the person I trust the most in the world.

**TL;DR** = Teenager rejected by their closest person in the world (their mother) for ""coming out"". 

----

**So.. pansexuals redditors, how did you deal with rejection? &amp; any advice on how to deal?**",pansexual
Accidental pan color nails,,pansexual
Sooo im new here..,"well. uhm hi.

Im Anna. 

pansexuality has always caught my eye, as something beautiful, and the way that things are supposed to be. Only after learning more about it did i discover that i am, in fact, pansexual..... but im scared to really tell anyone, as i feel i wouldnt be able to accurately describe what it is, like ill leave something out and misguide them, or worse, freak someone out.

so im coming here in hopes that you guys can help me with what im supposed to tell other people when they ask........ and maybe even telling my ultra-christian parents.

id appreciate an email, babylungs42@gmail.com, but if youd rather comment or message me here, thats chillin too.

Thank you SOOOO much! &lt;3
 ",pansexual
This is the blog I used to come out as pansexual earlier this year,,pansexual
"I made this to come out, I'm going to post it on facebook one of these days...",,pansexual
Question about coming out-ish...,"Hey, guys and gals and everyone inbetween,

I have a question about not necessarily coming out as a public event or statement, but just getting out... to those around me that i'd be interested in, I guess?

Here's a bit of a wall-of-life-story-text. I spent my first 4 years of college (on my 5th now) known as the male half of that adorable high school couple who got engaged, will be together forever, etc. Well, the engagement didn't work out for school/career reasons, and we broke up. Soon after, I started noticing that I was developing crushes on lots of people, and gender didn't seem to matter. So I came to a pretty well thought-out conclusion that I am pansexual.

The problem is, my community, and my entire circle of friends, and especially the guys I like know me as long-term-rock-solid-straight-relationship-guy. Which makes it kind of hard to (I guess) open the door to dating them without just walking up awkwardly and saying ""Hey, so... I'm not straight anymore, wanna go out?""

So my question is, how do I approach the topic or make it happen if I'm interested in some one of my same sex given my public identity? I've never liked too much facebook attention, and I don't feel like everyone around me needs to know until I decide to make a relationship public, so I don't really want to make a big facebook profile change or have a coming out announcement or anything like that if I can help it.

Thanks for any advice you can give. It's all new territory to me, so navigating non-heteronormative social structure has proven more difficult than I expected.",pansexual
Gf made me a bracelet :-),,pansexual
Can you guys tell me a little about the ways in which we bisexual-identified people be shitty to you guys? (serious question),"Hey! I'm sort of half writing a thing and half trying to get my head around some of the ways in which the bisexual community and the pansexual community tend to butt heads with each other. I feel pretty confident that I know the things that the pansexual community do and say that piss off the bisexual community, but as a person who feels that ""bisexual"" fits me better than ""pansexual"", I'm probably pretty blind to things that that the bisexual community (myself included) do and say that annoy the pansexual community.

I am really not trying to start an argument and I just want to hear some of your experiences. I'm really sorry in advance if this starts any fights between people!

So, what things have bisexual people done or said that have annoyed you as a pansexual person?",pansexual
Check out these pan and bi pride shirts and bracelets! It's rare to find pan pride stuff for sale. (x-post from r/bisexual),,pansexual
Kickstarter for a TV pilot featuring both a pansexual and a non-labeled character in the main cast,,pansexual
i have no one else to talk to...,"so ever since early highschool, i realized that gender means nothing to me, but the term bisexual never really 'fit'.  whether boy or girl, i figured that if i liked someone, they're parts shouldn't matter. i finally learned the term pansexual, and now i feel like i sort of fit in. like i kind of belong. i don't know how to explain this to my mom, being that as a 22 yr old i shouldve 'known what i liked years ago' and i don't want her to think i just want attention ... wish me luck :/",pansexual
"Increasing focus on lgbt+ issues and identities, as well as advances in neuroscience and psychology has a good chance to change the way we view love, sexuality and relationships. Realistically, how long do you think it will be till the pansexual ideal becomes the prevalent polysexual identity?","I've noticed more and more people chiming in on their pansexual identity, holding the 'bisexual' moniker only because it's more widely understood and it's made me wonder: How long will it take our current understanding of love, sexuality and relationships to evolve to something more accurate, succinct and more suited to our changing society? The global pool of knowledge on it seems to be a mishmash of old-world hangups, religious doctrine, misinformed storytelling, superstitious beliefs, independently reached conclusions, pseudoscience, and out-dated research. Eventually something more sensical and accurate will push through and become the dominant belief (hopefully not the current maze that is lgbt+). My quesetion is, when do you think that'll happen? And what do you think that future will look like?

I have no data to support to my claim of change beyond what I've mentally noted over the 3 years I've spent on reddit and the logical assumption that, because of the internet (and reddit in particular), more young lgbt+ kids and young adults are discovering the pansexual idea and finding that it fits their tendencies more accurately than the bisexual identity. Factors like bisexual invisibility and denial, and thus living in a monosexual world, contribute to making it difficult to find proper guidance. There is still more than enough infighting among the lgbt+ populace over identity, membership, stereotypes and other assumptions to agree that, looking at the big picture, we're a huge unorganized mess of small communities.

Or maybe you don't agree. Personally I think we could do with a more unified and easily understood structure that better represents what we the human race, through science, psychology and philosophy, know about love and sex. Tell me what you think.",pansexual
"But seriously, does anyone from okcupid know what googles is?!",,pansexual
Made some octopi at work today :) (x-post form /r/ainbow),,pansexual
So I just found out about pansexuality,and I've never been happier I've never had a way to describe me and my sexuality and how I identify my gender   ,pansexual
From me to you,"I have all the respect in the world for people who can come out and be completely honest and forthright about who they are. But my respect for those of us that identify as anything other than homosexual or heterosexual and still come out is even more. I recognize this is a difficult process for anyone, but I have found people are more accepting of individuals who identify as homosexual than of those who identify as pansexual, asexual, bisexual or any other label. It's unfortunate our society stresses individuals to explain how and why they identify the way they do. Is it anyone's business how I define myself? If I have chosen to share with you my sexual identity, I'd like to assume you are familiar with my personality and the other ways I define myself. If I say I'm a geek, should I be expected to explain to an extent that is frustrating? Maybe you just can't understand my love for Star Trek. I don't are to turn you into a Trekkie, so what is the purpose in exhausting the topic? Acceptance. I always thought patience was the hardest virtue to learn. It's key to acceptance. I can never expect someone else to accept who I am if I don't accept them in return. So for everyone who is also frustrated with the attitude of many in the general public, gay an straight alike, remember you know who you are more than anyone else. I offer you my empathy and all the kind words I can muster. ",pansexual
[x-posted to /r/ainbow] Looking for people to take part in a short survey on LGB people's experiences in the workplace,"Hi! My boyfriend is doing a masters degree and for his dissertation he needs people to fill in a short survey online. It is about our experiences in the workplace - if you have a job, please please take part :)

http://survey.gold.ac.uk/workplace_orientation_diversity

This is a self post which receives no karma, please upvote for visibility.",pansexual
"""Do you really think you should fall in love with someone’s genitals over their soul?""",,pansexual
Have there been any depictions in TV or movies of a pansexual that disappointed/upset you?,I'm directing a feature film this spring that revolves around a pan woman and would love to hear about the good and bad experiences anyone's had when it comes to representation of our lesser-known community!,pansexual
What was the moment when you realized you were pansexual?,"This has probably been asked before, but I love hearing people's stories. :)",pansexual
[Discussion Thread] Pansexual Philosophy - What does it mean to you? Why? How did you reach your conclusion? What wisdom would you pass on to others? What do you think everyone else is doing wrong? Why?,"Hi! Philosophy is a big part of my life. I regularly listen to podcasts, take time to think about things thoroughly and talk with others about it so how about a subreddit discussion on our favorite topic?

---------------

Of course most of us have the common and very general idea that love is independent of gender, and sexuality isn't limited by procreation, religion, or sometimes even your own personal beliefs (ie: those confusing early years..). But have you ever thought deeper on it? Or maybe went off the deep end and thought of where love and sex IS limited?

Half joking and half in ignorance, people ask if pansexuality means you want to marry inanimate objects or fuck horses. Have you ever wondered this from a serious point of view? ""Love ALL the people!"" is a sentiment I'm sure you've all declared. Keep in mind that 'people' includes those under the age of 18 and over the age of 70. In some places in the world, dolphins have also been recognized as non-human people. Recognizing other/all animals as conscious and sentient beings is also currently a hot topic. Regardless of that, considering the relationship between the words (and ideas) of 'persons' and 'personality' and the criteria that determine your attraction to a 'person', where do you draw the line? Why?

------------

I think this stuff is important. It's important to know who you are and why you do things. Carrying on in ignorance, while sometimes inevitable (and acceptable) for some people, is overall detrimental to all in society if NO ONE takes the time to think about it. It also prevents us from graduating from old ways of thinking and evolving into more advanced societies. It doesn't help anyone if only the people that do it (philosophers) learn new things.

To help get your thinking juices flowing, here are some interesting podcasts on topics that would relate to us. To listen to the podcast, click the link to go to the page then right click on the Direct Download link and click Save As, and then you can listen to it on your mp3 player of choice.

http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/sabine_doring_on_emotion

http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/simon-may-on-love

http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/angie_hobbs_on_plato_on_erotic_love

http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/paul_snowdon_on_persons_and_animals

http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/christopher_shields_on_personal_identity

http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/alexander_nehamas_on_friendship

http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/mark_vernon_on_friendship

And then a bunch on morality: [In the 21st Century.](http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/susan_neiman_on_morality_in_the_21st_century) [And the brain.](http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/david-eagleman-on-morality-and-the-brain) [Neuroscience and morality.](http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/patricia-churchland-on-what-neuroscience-can-teach-us-about-morality-originally-on-bioethics-bites) [Mind and Morality](http://philosophybites.libsyn.com/liane-young-on-mind-and-morality) 

----------------------

I should also add, I encourage you all to even talk about taboo subjects like love/sex/friendship with non-humans and people (humans) under the age of 18. Why it's wrong, why it could be right, or in some cases right but also wrong,  how one relates to the other...etc. I'm advocating nothing, however. These things are interesting because, for one, the age barrier varies from country to country. In older times (and even in some places in the world today) the common understanding was that sexual maturity meant ready to be married and have children. This brings up another good point; Now we seem to favor development over the urgency to procreate. How much do you think this has changed us? When did this sort of thing start happening? Our changing ideas of relationships brings in a whole different matter besides just procreation. Anyway, discuss!",pansexual
Wasn't sure if this had been posted here but I'm sure this is one benefit my boyfriend loves about being with me,,pansexual
"I'm part of a collab channel on Youtube dedicated to pansexuality and queerness. It's called AskaPansexual, and I would love it if you guys checked it out.",I hope this is allowed. I'm posting it here because I'm very proud to be a part of it. ,pansexual
"Pansexuals, how does physical appearance affect the level of sexual attraction you feel for a person?","I'd say, for me, sexual attraction is a blend of some parts physical and non-physical factors. I wouldn't exclude anyone based on gender or particular physical traits. I have a bit of a gut feeling that determines my physical attraction to a person. The sum of all of their physical traits, rather than checking items off a list of traits I find appealing. Once I get to know a person, their non-physical qualities tend to affect my physical perception of them. Ex: I become more sexually attracted to a geeky person with a warm laugh or I find a loud, rude person to be very unattractive.

How does physical appearance affect the level of sexual attraction you feel for a person? Is it minimal (only basic hygiene required), or is it significant (need to be physically attracted to feel sexual attraction)? 

This post assumes the possibility of being physically and/or sexually attracted to any gender.",pansexual
Can we discuss dealing with opposite sex crushes in the Queer community? (xpost from r/bisexual),"To all the bi/pan guys and gals out there, what do you do when you start crushing on someone of the opposite sex in the queer community? I am a bi guy and I am crushing hard on a lady who although far from it, I feel like she saved my life (we went hiking and I was not prepared at all for the sub zero temperatures and lack of food and a whole bunch of stuff. She gave me clothes, food, and helped me discover a love of hiking). She has a heart of gold and appreciation of the stars and just even more qualities that make my heart go a flutter. However, she identifies as a lesbian, although she does just throw option of being with a man, she just prefers girls. I am the same way so I get it. But damn it just burns. I have noticed that I have an unfortunate reoccuring habit of falling for lesbian women. THEY ARE JUST SO AWESOME lol. I know I am not alone in this but I would love to hear how other people deal with this type of thing. ",pansexual
How to start a coming out conversation with people who don't know what pansexuality is?,"I can't just tell my parents(who are accepting no matter what) that I'm pansexual, because they don't know what that is. However, I feel like trying to explain it before telling them would be confusing.",pansexual
What is the difference between pansexuality and bisexuality?,"I thought I knew where I stood on the whole pan vs bi argument, but recent posts here have got me all confused again.

What exactly is the definition of pansexuality, the one that the majority of people who identify with it tend to mean? Same question for the definition of bisexuality.

Are they mutually exclusive terms? Can someone be both bi and pan, is one a subset of the other, or are they separate standalone sexualities?

That's the part I'm most confused on. From what I've read, I feel like both the term bisexuality and the term pansexuality describe me, but I also feel like I might be misunderstanding the definition of one or both of the terms. I've heard different things about the definition from /r/bisexuality and on this subreddit. Maybe I'll cross-post for variety of answers.",pansexual
"""I don't believe pansexuality is a thing. You're actually bi.""","I can't begin to count the people who have told me that pansexuality is a thing, and how I'm actually bisexual and I just don't realize it.  I try to explain the differences, and they are completely closed off.  Oddly enough, they're usually bisexual.

Has anybody else had this experience?",pansexual
"All of a sudden, I want women like crazy. It's a huge change for me, but no one around me can relate to that. :(","Crossposting this on /r/bisexual, /r/bibros, and /r/pansexual.

I'm a 35 years old cis male, and most of my sex life has been with cisgender men. I'm in an open marriage with a wonderful man who used to identify as bi but who now identifies as gay. I'm pansexual however, and recently my attraction to women has become a lot stronger than it used to be. I now find boobs to be incredibly distracting, and I'm even catching myself checking out women's asses; something that I've never really experienced. I was traveling in Montreal a couple of weeks ago (I live two provinces away), and I ended up having awesome sex with one of my female friends with whom there had been sexual tension for quite some time. The experience was really intense, and I was looking at her in a way that I had never looked at a woman before - I was brimming with lust.

Here's the thing. I feel lonely and alienated right now. I feel something is changing with my sexuality, and it's impacting me in a deep way (and I actually love this turn of events), but I have nobody around me who can relate to that. It's not that I can't talk about what's happening to me; I'm pretty open about this with my husband and my friends. But there's nobody around me to say “Oh my god! I so know what you mean! I totally went through that!” I need somebody to understand, with whom I can share that experience and bond with over that, but there's no one. :(

Also, I never had the opportunity to really explore my heterosexuality. It's sort of ironic, because I've definitely explored a lot of other things most people have never done. But I never had a lot of sex with women, and now I want it bad. I want somebody female with whom I can bond and get it on all the time like crazy. I no longer want heterosexual sex to be something that happens once in a blue moon when I get really lucky - I want to gorge myself in it. I want some heterosexual abundance. ;) But I don't know how to make that happen, and to be honest, I'm a lot more shy with women than with guys (with whom my strategy tends to be “nice shoes, want a blowjob?”). So I'm left hanging for now.

I don't really know what's the point to this post. I think I just needed to get this off my chest.

Tl;dr – I'm a pansexual guy who has mostly been with men. All of a sudden, I want women like crazy and this is affecting me in a deep way, but I have no one around me who can relate. I also question my ability to get what I need.",pansexual
Pansexual get-to-know eachother,"I thought, as we don't seem to have one yet, that we could create a thing like this for everyone to post so we can get to know each other more, bond over common differences etc, and perhaps let a few feelings off our chests by giving a little description of our situation or more likely how we became pansexual :D
________________

Um, I thought I'd start it to give some people confidence (and so I don't have to post another comment later!) I won't go into sob story mode, only name, age and discovery of pan XD

___________
Name - Will

Age - 17

Discovered pansexuality when - This is a rather funny story :o I guess looking back I was always pan, I mean I only wanted to befriend rather than date people, I came from Essex, anyone from England knows what Essex is like - people losing their virginity at 12 average! I myself never had a relationship, romantic or sexual due to a feeling which I now realise was my pansexuality: I could not when the maturity level of relationships at that time centered around sexual desire and physical attraction. 

I also grew/grow up in a family of abusive, homophobic and racist extremist who thought anything non-hetero was against nature and an abomination, and went as far as forcing my brother to break up with his girlfriend because she was chinese! Parents eh? :P

May last year I met someone on steam who contacted me after a game and we befriended, we even found out we had  been on the same forum a few years before XD Needless to say, he was pansexual and although this doesn't seem like a long enough time to some, we fell in love after a week or two. I was far from looking for a relationship, especially with a man as I thought my self heterosexual, but I am not suprised, it is far easier to fall in love pansexually it seems when you have never seen the man's face at that point, the physical really had no factor in it! 

I was tolerant of sexualities and differences no matter my upbringing, which lead me to, after a confusing moment with myself, accepting my pansexuality, now we're still together and it will be our 1 year aniversary soon :D 

I only have to wait another year after that before I can leave my parents (who yes found out and no they didn't accept me, they're abandoning me the moment they legally can when I'm 18 :P) and live with him. the end hopefully :o

________________________________________
I'm sorry if that was too much/not enough, hopefully it was enough to get other people posting! :D

UPDATE:
Yeah. Boyfriend dumped me, couldn't handle the depression (he didn't really understand it) and then perhaps there was a girl involved who he started dating the next day.. I'd rather not think about that :P If you want I'll answer any questions about it.",pansexual
Just came out to my mom! :),"I'm so excited right now, and I'd just like to share my excitement with you all.  This subreddit has helped me a lot in both finding out who I am, and gaining the confidence to actually come out today to my mom!  I feel like so much weight was just lifted off of my shoulders, since I've been freaking out about coming out to her for a while now.  I'm just happy that I finally did it and she accepts me for who I am.  :)

Good luck to anyone else in the process of coming out! ♥",pansexual
sooo I came out yesterday,"i came out to my aunt as a pansexual, I love my aunt she is just the best most understanding person ever, she is very open and that's why I knew that I could come out to her. I'm still very scared to come out to anyone else in my family. 
(if you want the story/ questions I'll post it if enough people ask)",pansexual
What's with everyone and labels lately?,"What is everyone's obsession with labels?

I tend to come out as bisexual when people require a label from me because it doesn't require too much explanation and it is close enough...

And I guess if you put a gun to my head and made me pick one, I'd go with pansexual, even though I wouldn't use that publicly because I'd have to explain it...

But usually when someone asks me my sexual orientation I say ""Yeeeaaah.... that's a little bit of a gray area. I like who I like.""

I don't have many preferences. I like who I like on an individual basis. I don't have a ""type."" I'd be 100% willing to give anyone a chance assuming they meet 3 criteria: Have a nice face; be capable of intelligent conversation; don't be fat (I'm super skinny. It's almost a necessary preference.)

And it works. I don't need to come here and ask people to label me. Because fuck labels, I don't need pigeonholed. And you don't either!

I've seen so many posts with people saying they are confused about their orientation or that they think they might be one thing or another... but really, who cares?! If you like someone, you know you do. What's there to be confused about?

Like who you like; fuck labels.",pansexual
Confused gay cub,"All of my life i've never found myself attracted to women at all, and always towards men, however recently i've grown more towards women, and trans but mostly masculine trans and the thicker set of women. I am currently engaged to an amazing guy who is Pansexual and we are polyamorous. With these new feelings I find myself confused on who I am, after identifying as gay for my life and I am unsure if these feelings and attraction is just curiosity or discovering my pansexuality.

I first began to have these feelings before my current boyfriend with my previous one, after trying role playing a few times and he would roll play trans, and I did not find myself turned off to him or the sex. After going to a few furry events and an encounter with a FTM I found myself curious on the thought of a woman but no real interest at the time.

The past few months however I have noticed myself growing more interested in women and transgender and no drop in interest in men. How do I know if this is just curiosity or pansexuality? 

TL;DR I don't know if its curiosity or pansexuality",pansexual
"Came out to my Mum, Dad and brother yesterday.","Mum just nodded and said ""that's fine"", later telling me ""I will love and be proud of you whatever you are"". 

Dad said ""some things in life you can't choose"", and totally got it, which I was amazed by. As a 21 year-old man, I was (probably understandably) most worried about what Dad would say, but he was completely fine with it.

My brother said he completely respects and supports me, and was the first person I've talked to who actually knew what pansexuality was without me having to explain it!

Needless to say, I am very, very happy with life right now. Hope you are all well. :)",pansexual
Doing a project on pansexuality and would like some help,"Hi r/ Pansexual. I posted this onto r/LGBT, but figured it would do better here. I'm doing a project where I need to interview people of a sexual minority and I picked pansexuals (more specifically people who don't identify as gay/straight/bi etc.) If you're interested in helping me, the link will take you to the post where I outline everything better. http://www.reddit.com/r/lgbt/comments/1b2k0j/doing_a_project_on_pansexuality_and_would_like/  
  
Thanks in advance :)",pansexual
Coming Out as Pansexual by AbsolutColours,,pansexual
"This is my ""love knows no gender tattoo."" I do agree that love is love",,pansexual
"It's taken 20 years and an anguishing past few weeks, but I finally came to a wonderful conclusion tonight.",,pansexual
"Things I think we should teach each other. I am sharing my own thoughts, nothing more. ","There are two things in life we need to pass on to the next generations. 1st - to be honest and to speak their minds openly. 2nd - to be opened minded to respect the difference of the world around them. This will help their mind to develop and will allow them to enjoy the world around them. 

We have the power to change the world with our own lives no matter how big or how small the impact may be. It is our job to set an example of tolerance and open mindedness. Without this the world will collapse and human society will be no better than a bag of rubbish rotting on top of hill on a hot sunny day. If you do anything in a day let it be a kind act, an honest act or an act where you tell the truth no matter how hard it is for the other person to hear.",pansexual
Looking for some help figuring out my thoughts,"Hey everyone, I have some questions about myself and my sexual identification. As a forefront, I apologize for the use of labels or anything of that variety that may come across as offensive to people. I just learned about pansexuality and I'm still being educated about it. My girlfriend came out to me about being her pansexual this past sunday and it has been a bit of a roller coaster ride since then. At first I felt confused and hurt, but after talking to her, doing a ton of thinking, and becoming somewhat educated on the subject, I realized that pansexuality was something that's very interesting to me. I have only ever been in relationships with women and have only had sexual contact with them too, aside from a few occurrences when I was very, very young. When I was reflecting on myself, I realized that I was open to the idea of being romantically and mentally attracted to anyone and everyone. That being said, I haven't felt a romantic or mental attraction to another male. Also, when it comes to the idea of being sexually intimate with another male, I get hesitant. Not a complete, 100% ""No I'd never do that,"" but more of a ""Maybe with the right person, I'd consider it."" This being said, when I see a good looking man, I recognize his handsomeness and I sometimes feel a slight sexual attraction due to it. Due to my hesitance about sexual relations with another man, I'm not sure if that fits the sexual attraction part of pansexuality. I have no idea on what this 'makes' me and I figured that this was the place to go. Am I somewhat pansexual, something else, or just completely over-thinking this entire thing? I suppose I just would like some help figuring out my thoughts. Thanks for listening everyone!

TL;DR: I believe that I have the potential for romantic relationships towards people of all gender identities and biological sexes. However, I'm not entirely sure I'm 100% comfortable with sexual relationships with another man.",pansexual
Am I pansexual?,"For a long time, I've identified myself as bisexual. Though I do seem to favor girls, I no doubt am also attracted to guys. However, I recently learned about pansexuality, and the more I read up on it the more it sound more like me. However, I'm not completely sure if it's accurate for me, because there are some definite differences in my attractions to genders.

The best way to describe my sexuality would be that I like girls, and anything that could pass for a girl would do. While with girls I am not picky whatsoever, and am attracted to girls of all races and body sizes and even girls that look manly/androgynous, with guys, I am extremely picky. The guy must look noticeably feminine. They can still be obviously a boy, but those feminine features are a must. They must also have a slender, feminine frame, despite the fact that I've dated girls with some weight on them. They can't be taller than me, despite the fact that I have no problem dating girls that are taller than me. They need to be someone I can dominate, despite having no such desires for domination towards women. Muscles on a guy are a huge turn off for me, despite muscles on a girl being a huge turn on. Also, I love it when they have medium to long hair. The more the guy looks like a girl the better, it seems. I also seem to be extremely attracted to androgynous people, no matter what their actual sex. 

Then there's the matter of transvestites/cross-dressers/anything else that would qualify as a trap. LOVE THEM. Some of my biggest sexual fantasies involve traps. Transvestites who look convincingly female, with breasts, but still possessing a penis, are probably the thing I'm most attracted to. Cross-dressers also really get me going, but only when they're convincing. A guy in a dress that's obviously a guy in a dress doesn't do anything for me. Manly looking transvestites also don't do it for me.

When it comes to the matter of dating someone who used to be a different gender, but has made the switch completely, I have no issues with this. If a woman I had been dating for months suddenly told me she used to be a man, it wouldn't phase me for a second. I also obviously don't mind if they're still in the transition. Doesn't matter not one bit.

I think about covers it all. So, basically, I'll date anyone. It doesn't matter what sex you were born as or what gender you identify as, that doesn't matter to me. If I'm attracted to you, I'll date you, no matter how complicated it gets from there. This is what makes me believe I am pansexual. However, when it comes to attraction, I seem to be, for the most part, attracted to women, or anyone close enough. I've never been attracted to anyone that didn't have strong feminine facial qualities. Would this be considered pansexual?

*Note: Apparently the word ""trap"" is derogatory. I'm not going to change it in my post, because I can't think of any other term that encompasses that whole spectrum of biological males that look and dress female. However, I will promise to try to avoid using it in the future, and I hope you all know I don't mean it in a bad way! Also, apparently ""used to be a ____"" is also derogatory. I have a trans friend who uses the term all the time, and she has stated that she doesn't see anything wrong with it, and that it's just people being needlessly sensitive. She equated it to how I don't care about being called the n word while many of my race do, and urged me to treat it the same way. So that's exactly what I do, I avoid using it around people that I know will be offended (meaning ya'll), but that's about it. I won't apologize for that one, or change it.",pansexual
I have a question which I can't seem to get a damn answer to.,"Okay throwaway just because I have friends in real life who know my reddit who don't know what I'm about to say.

I am attracted to two specific types: females and male to female transexuals. I am a man. 

Some people have said I am straight, some people say I am gay. 

I realize that sexuality is not black and white, obviously. But what the fuck am I? Yes, I get the whole thing how male to female transexuals identify as women. Therefore I am straight. 

Its just that I don't feel *straight*, on grounds that if I were just straight I'd be attracted to just biological women. I'm just confused, I don't know what to call my sexual preferences. 

What am I? Am I pansexual? ",pansexual
How do I come out?,"How should I come out as pan to my family? I'm not sure how they'll take it to be honest. I'm not expecting it to be too bad, but still.

Also what are some of your coming out stories? :)",pansexual
My take on life. ,"I have been thinking about happiness and what it means. I have come to this conclusion.

We make our own happiness and for each of us the recipe is different. It is up to us to find the right ingredients to make it and when that is achieved we can do anything we want. The ingredients may change as we get older and that is fine. The important thing in life is to be happy because when you are happy you can achieve anything you want to. ",pansexual
Pansexual vs. Soul-sexual?,"When asked about my orientation, I used to always use bi.  After some ""growing up"", I would explain my orientation (to those I knew and were comfortable with) as ""soul-sexual""; meaning I was attracted by a person's *insides* (their personality/soul etc) and not what happened to be on the outside.  Now, I am married to a woman ( my soul mate that happened to be in a ""woman's body"", and since I have no plans or desires to be with anyone but her, I generally refer to myself as lesbian to save time/confusion.  

I have since run into the term Pansexual and wonder if this the universally accepted ""label"" for me?  Not that I'm into labels *per se*, but I find I am intrigued by this concept as a whole.",pansexual
"Applied for a Job, Pansexual was an option on the equality form. A Proud Day","I applied for a job and on the Equality Monitor Form, under sexuality Pansexual was an option. I didn't have to click other then write it in, or click bisexual, because thats kinda the closest. It also had a section on trans-history. It was a wonderfully progressive form.",pansexual
"I really, really, really don't care about appearances.","I need to rant a bit and I figured this subreddit would probably understand best. 

I don't care what a person looks like. And I never have. In high school all my friends would talk about the guys they found attractive and gush about someone being super hot and all the stereotypical high school girl talk. And I always just nodded along and occasionally threw out a passive agreement. But when it came to my turn to explain my ""type"" or gush on someone I thought was hot, I never had anything to offer. 

I would usually respond honestly with ""Looks don't matter to me."" And my friends would often find this arrogant of me. I never meant it as such and I never cared that they did like how people looked. It just wasn't my thing. 

For a while I faked it. I would force myself to remember a celebrities name to mention if I needed to or I'd pretend to be enthusiastic about their opinions. But I didn't like it. The celebrities I chose were always based on the character they played and if I liked the personality of that character. 

And it always came back to personality. When I mentioned some stranger being cute, it was because their outfit or overall style gave the idea of a certain personality type that I usually got along with or made friends with. 

When I dated (which was before I realized I liked more than just guys) I dated geeky, unattractive boys. And I'm not talking about the geeky guys that people now find awkwardly cute or the guys that fake geekyness. No I dated the ones people really found awkward/very unattractive. And it really bugged me that in those times, they let looks get in the way of liking someone.

But really, I don't care about looks. You ask me my type and I'll describe a personality. You ask me for a style that I like on people and I'll describe the stereotypical style that goes with the personality I just described. If you ask me if that person over there is cute, I'll give you an answer. But if you let me spend 5 minutes with them, I can confirm how ""cute"" I really find them.

Thanks for letting me rant. Hopefully someone here will understand and share my feelings.

TL;DR See title :)",pansexual
My friend just came out to his parents in a rather poetic letter...,"Pansexual friend is too introverted to talk face-to-face, and when parents found some conversations with his boyfriend, (long-distance). and began to suspect, he wrote them this letter, including calling them out about how they've treated him over the years. Thought Reddit might enjoy it

&gt;
[Teacher] suggested I write you a letter explaining everything because of my inability to talk in person, she said she would tell you, and I want to point out that I cannot physically tell you as much as I want to, confidence is not a factor that can be removed simply because of family blood.
&gt;
To come straight to the point, I’m pansexual, if you don’t know what that means it is the fact gender does not matter to me, this is not homosexuality, or even bisexuality; they are based upon an attraction to physical gender. I simply realise that love is not something to be chosen so pathetically as by appearance, whether by emotion, our own subconscious, or by God; we fall in love to a person and no creed, gender, race or colour can change that love. Some scholars say that pansexuality is the closest of all those orientations we have to experiencing God’s love, for what is closer to God’s unconditional, all encompassing love for us than a disregard for gender, thought or appearance as factors to your ability to love? 
I never had a girlfriend because I refused to be so petty as to enter relationships for the sake of a relationship - there are three things relationships look for; either that, sexual desire, or love. I look neither for the former not be so sinful too seek the intermediary, and love is not something to find or seize, it develops - if God wills it. I met [boyfriend], made sure, so sure that he was who he said he was. I spent months talking, asking for proof before I accepted he was who he was, including him video calling to show his appearance, phoning up and researching friends of his to make sure they are who he said they were, researching his school/college, making sure the friends went there too, making sure what they said about him matched what he said, I point out if you are still concerned I can sit down and call him with you, he can enter a video, show his passport, school documents, even bring his mother and grandmother into the video to say who he is, I am not seeing him for 2 years, and when I do I am bringing 6 other friends plus their families if they want to visit Canada as well in case all of that other evidence was somehow a lie – what more can I do to prove it to you?
&gt;
I admit after a while we fell in love, and I would be offended if you claimed it was not so – I prayed for hours and hours on end asking God if it was love, if it was in his plan, if he wanted me to accept this or to abstain, if it was good in his eyes etc. And I am certain, more certain of anything in my life (but that I want to give it all to God) that this is what God wills, God gives us not what we want, but what we need – and I have learnt so much from this, God has opened my eyes to so much of his plans through this. I had been praying to God for months before, sick with worry, I was unsure about how love was a reason for why he gave us free will, why he sent Jesus, the final link for me understanding God was to understand why, and the answer was love, but what is this ‘love’? I asked - I didn’t understand love, never being in love, and because of that I prayed for him to show me so that I could understand truly the love behind all his actions. And that is what he did, I am so much stronger in my convictions of God because I can relate, maybe only a fraction of his infinite love, but a fraction is enough for me to appreciate the glory of God.
&gt;
You may now ask why I didn’t tell you, why I held the information back? I am scared of you. Scared of your intolerance – and while my teachers assured me that you don’t mind – that in the end ‘when it comes down to their son, the true nature of parents are revealed’. But you may forgive me for being unsure when for 16 years you have mentioned non-heterosexual relations with distain, bitterness and even anger. You are traditional in your Christian mindset and I appreciate that, but I am scared you will see who I am as ‘one of those liberals’ whose term you spit out with hatred, or at least it seems to be so every time. I am scared of your proud attitude, and while it is ok to be so; you do believe that what you do is right, holy even, while all other choices are ‘wrong’, morally in some cases you claim.
That is what leads me to my main fear, that you control my life. You argue (and I agree) that a lack of concern leads only to problems for the child, including dangers, yet realise please that freedom is not synonymous with this lack of apprehension, or even love! No one I know yet one girl (who ironically her parents you described as being ‘dangerous, leaving her in town alone at night’, which is perhaps a nod to the point that not all forms of obsessive control mean love and care…that you do not need to be controlling to love me) has parents so obsessive or controlling, many being far more driven for their work (not put off it as I am by a lack of choice, driven to seek relaxation and developing a lazy attitude) or far happier and in far better relationships with their parents because of such freedom given to them. I am truly sorry that I lied to you, I tried not to as much as possible believe me please, for example simply refusing to tell you my ‘girlfriend’s’ name rather than lie again and create a web of deceit. Yet no matter how hard I try to be a noble and moral Christian I am subject to sin like any other, and fear is a great motivator for vice.
&gt;
I am profusely sorry for the next paragraph, but it is time to call you out for things done. With tears in my eyes I type these words, because it hurts me greatly to imagine the pain they may bring, yet also the sadness at the fear that you may ignore them. I do not love you anymore. I appreciate your great and good intentions, but they have left me with nothing but a lack of love which I never had filled until now, which again, out of your good intentions you have tried to destroy by cutting me from the man I love.
And that is a perfect example. The best intentions come to naught unless the actions they are offered through are themselves good. Every person I have known has turned to me - some with firsthand experience - and called what I suffer abuse. I kept saying “No, my parents love me, everything they do is of good intention”, but now I have to accept that abusive love is still abuse, no matter how loving. I haven’t said these things to you because you won’t listen, and I can’t say them now face to face because I physically can’t!
Mom, Dad, maybe you are blind, but I’m mentally a wreck. Teachers tell me, friends tell me, the councillor tells me this. I am an emotional failure. The only people I ever loved – you – have controlled my life, and done so out of just intentions, leaving me with no way to do anything or complain at the treatment without a deep painful feeling of guilt, creating a self hatred which is so bad that I take blame for all problems in my life; I now have a guilt complex which is deeply upsetting for all around me, [boyfriend] and [cousin] and my friends all separately sat me down, all disconnected occurrences, and told me I had this. I myself denied it, claiming it was my entire fault and not any others! Because how could someone as pathetic as you make me feel, blaming me for everything, be anything but the cause of all problems? I know you won’t believe me, claim I am hyperbolising, overreacting, or even just over thinking... I genuinely believe I am pathetic, so much so that I hurt myself to punish, to atone, for all my sins; this self flagellantism which scars me not physically but emotionally (which I would call worse as all but the most horrible injuries heal across all humans, we have a fairly constant metabolism, while mental scars are not only hidden, but may not heal as assuredly), for example I have cut myself off from others, having no friends until recently because I legitimately feel I am so worthless no one loves me, and that if they did, I did not deserve them – I mean who is noble that does not feel unconditional love to his parents? An idea you won’t stop forcing on my mind like a cancer, gnawing away at my confidence and fuelling this self hatred. 
&gt;
I have no confidence to the point I cannot say these things to you, because when I open up you shout me down every single time. It is why as I said I lie sometimes, because how can one stay to the truth when you hate it more than the lies? But back to my original point; I don’t love you anymore. You have destroyed my confidence, made me self loathing, given me a guilt complex, the talking to myself as you do (also perhaps a substitute for a lack of friends, yet then why do I still do it when I now have them? Does it matter? Both conclusions fall at your feet), severe introversy, OCD (and do not dare to claim that you think I am not, I know my body, I know the obsession, the constant reversals, on and off the lights go, ten minutes arranging pencils on a desk, an hour shutting a door and opening it. I hide it from you, but does that make it not real? It seems your controlling attitude has rubbed off), perhaps even insomnia if I am to believe the councillors hypothesis on that lack of sleep. Frankly, and I am sorry you hate swearing; I never swear usually (surely the use of curses only shows you how much this affects me?), but you have frankly fucked up my mind and personality to the point [cousin] and the councillor both think I should be on medication. A notion I reject entirely, the idea of repressing who I am rather than fighting to overcome them as [boyfriend] agrees... but what I intended to say was that they are both deeply stressed, how can I feel that [cousin], my cousin, is so hurt because of the way I am? That the two people I did once love – you two – go and do this to me? You wonder why I cannot bring myself to love you; I cannot trust or be close to anyone – [boyfriend] suffers because of it, I couldn’t even trust him! I do now, but 6 months, 6 months! 6 months of paranoia, terrified fear that he would hurt me like you have, like everyone I had loved has, because you screwed with my mind so badly that I cannot love properly. If you don’t believe me, ask him, ask [cousin], ask anyone who knows my dark thoughts and has seen my introversy.
I only have friends thanks to [boyfriend], he gave me confidence to start talking, I couldn’t talk in calls with him if someone else was there, and even now I am very quiet. Instead of the restraining order you threatened us with, you could thank him for fixing a problem you refused to fix. I wouldn’t be at a friend’s house now hiding, waiting for you to read this and have time to think, if it weren’t for him. Yet still! Still I am not fixed, still I am too shy, too nervous, too scared.
I am infuriated by my introversy, you cannot understand the pain, it is almost imprisonment, incarcerated within my own mind, my voice padlocked and closed to my screaming thoughts. They are yearning hysterically to be free, to be voiced to others. It is agony to be too scared to say hello to someone, do you know the feeling? It is the feeling when you want to do something, say something, but can’t. You have cowed me, granting me this curse, one that [boyfriend] helps me break, and you try to stop him?! But then again… Every kingdom divided against itself is brought to desolation; and every city or house divided against itself shall not stand, why would you seek to undo what you have done?
&gt;
There are thousands of other problems I have, which reduce me daily to tears at school, at home; behind closed doors as again I cannot show you my pain. But I will not mention them in such detail. To mention them would only achieve quilting you, and I aim to be no hypocrite.
I hate to say Freud was right, as I said earlier I always rejected the idea my emotional scars were your fault, claiming it was me; that I simply couldn’t handle life, that I was childish and would get over them; but [boyfriend], [cousin], my teachers, my friends, my councillor.. they all showed me that I have only gotten worse, that these pains have only deepened over the years, they made me, even having to force me to sit down and stop blaming myself, that there is a cause for hang ups. And no matter how delicately I sweeten what you do with positive imagery, I cannot deny what you do! If anything, the fact I do just proves the point that I am too self loathing, submissive, with guilt complexes and the fear of disappointing you.
&gt;
There is no hate in these words, no slow or tempered anger. Only sadness at the loss of love that could be between us, and perhaps, disappointment - yet that last emotion is in quantum superposition, it could be or could not, that all depends on whether you reject and ignore these words or try to understand how you have hurt me, and how I wish for reconciliation, but more importantly how I am in love with [boyfriend]. diligamus nos.
&gt;",pansexual
"Confused enough to resort to the word ""confused""","I've always had a limited understanding of different ""orientations"" (I put quotation marks because IMO no one really has absolute control where their ship may sail) but this seems the closest to reason. And if that sentence made no sense, I'll just jump to the question:

Is it still pan if it's the capacity to fall in love, build an incredible attachment and companionship with anyone, but still have particular *sexual* attraction to one sex?",pansexual
"On coming out, facing pan/bi-phobia, and trying to find community.",,pansexual
Just curious...Is anyone still around and posting in this  subreddit?,"I just just found it, and it looks like there haven't been new threads for months, but I'm going to be so sad if it's dead. 
Can we revive it? 

EDIT: If so..., lemme introduce myself, and let's make friends!
I'm Amanda Lee :) There's lots to know about me, but some basics would be that I am pansexual; hence why I am here. I'm 22. I like cats, books, tea, photography, vinyl records, and intellectual conversation. Oh, and smiling and laughing...that too!
",pansexual
As a pansexual doctor who fan I lol'd hard,,pansexual
College age or younger? Please complete this survey regarding two important upcoming Supreme Court cases. We need your help with an amicus brief. crosspost from /ainbow,"This March, the Supreme Court of the United States will hear arguments in two critical cases impacting the LGBTQ community - US v Windsor and Hollingsworth v Perry (Prop 8).  The Court is being asked to consider two questions, whether or not the Defense of Marriage Act (DOMA) violates the US Constitution's Equal Protection Clause and also whether or not the Constitution provides same-sex couples with a fundamental right to marry.  If you are not familiar with these cases, please visit these sites to learn more:

http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hollingsworth_v._Perry

http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_v._Windsor

We are writing an amicus - or ""friend of the court"" - brief, which will include a collection of personal stories and analysis explaining exactly how the denial of marriage equality and DOMA affect the LGBTQ community and especially LGBTQ youth and young adults. We are particularly interested in learning how the inability to marry has affected you! 

This is an amazing opportunity - at the most pivotal time in the movement for LGBTQ equality - to share your personal story with this country's highest court.  Fill out the survey to tell the Supreme Court Justices how these laws have affected you!

[Click here to fill out the survey](https://docs.google.com/spreadsheet/viewform?formkey=dGF3Z2VnWlhRc3E2aDEyYnVoU2VzdVE6MQ#gid=0)

Please respond to this survey and help us help you!  We need these stories as soon as possible as the deadline to submit this brief approaching!  Please include your name or how you like to be identified should we choose to publish your story! If you wish to remain anonymous, let us know. 

If you have any questions, concerns, or comments, please email amicusbrief2013@gmail.com.  

Thank you very much for taking the time to complete this survey.

Sincerely,

Margaret Riley and  Brian Kaufman,
Emory University School of Law,
Juris Doctor Candidates, Class of 2014

Kathryn Brightbill and Nick Vargo,
University of Florida College of Law,
Juris Doctor Candidates, Class of 2014",pansexual
Soldarity Action: Justice for Noxolo Nogwaza (Amnesty International Write for Rights Campaign) ,,pansexual
"My friend made me a bracelet, thought I'd share it. ",,pansexual
Holiday Shopping Snowman Prank!,,pansexual
I just came out,"I came out to my dad recently. He thought for a moment and replied with ""Tis good to drink from many cups.""",pansexual
Should we get flags besides our flairs?,Do you think that would be a good idea? This post is mainly directed at the mod.,pansexual
I made a pansexual flag desktop background. Resolution: 1440x900,,pansexual
"""The Rest Of The Alphabet"" video project",,pansexual
"An ornament I bought from an organization that helps Ugandan women. I admit it, I squeed a little!",,pansexual
Come out come out wherever you are (xpost),,pansexual
"To anyone who is coming out to their family or friends this Christmas, best of luck to you. ",,pansexual
When I was bored in class... thought you lovelies would appreciate the colors,,pansexual
"Why I Love Labels, Especially Pansexual!",,pansexual
Bi vs Pan: at some point a word needs definite definition (Posted in both /pansexual and /bisexual),"Now, I don't like the idea of trying to push anyone into a definition they aren't comfortable with but, as the title says, words do need to be defined. Yes, green can mean many different shades, but it doesn't mean red. Even if you want it to, green can only be green. Having done quite a bit of reading lately, many people seem to think that bi and pan are the same, or nearly. 

As I understand the term, bisexual would mean that one is attracted to men and woman. Nothing else, just those two. This could include people that were born (fe)male and later had surgery to become fe(male), but wouldn't include those who do not identify as either a man or a woman. To those who ask why I would limit it like that, I say that *I* didn't, that is what the word means. That isn't a bad thing, or a good thing, it is just a definition. Honestly, I'm glad that that *is* the definition, since I believe there are many people that would and do happily fall under that definition. When I was younger, I identified as bi, because it was all I knew that corresponded to my attractions. I would probably have said that I was only capable of being attracted to the standard male and female definitions. Now I know differently, but there are people that still feel that way. They deserve to have that recognized, and not be forced into a label that doesn't describe them.

There is another word, pansexual, that means one has the potential to be attracted both emotionally and physically, to anyone of any gender identification. I'm glad that word exists too, because the definition of bisexual doesn't fit for many people. Those who feel that bisexual is too confining, or narrow, or just not right, they deserve their own word. I don't understand why people keep trying to say that pan=bi=pan when clearly the need for both exists. 

I'm 99% sure I'm pan. 99% because there are some who say that pan means that gender and sex are irrelevant to attraction, and I can't say that. I have been attracted to at least one person of every gender variant I've had the priviledge to meet, at least partially *because* of their gender. I love women, and I love men, and I love everything between and beside them. That having been said, there are those who *don't* care about, or even really see the point *in* caring about gender/physical sex. They are pan. So am I. Though there is that 1% that says to me ""but you ***do*** see and care about gender, so you aren't pan"" I say, yes I do, and that is ok. Pan is a much more fluid term than bi, and I'm glad to have found it. 

Sorry about the way of text, but I had to say all this to someone. ",pansexual
Question for those in monogamous relationships,"I am in a committed 1.5 year relationship with a man who I love with all my heart.  However, I still have a very obnoxious sexual attraction towards women. My boyfriend knows about it and has suggested inviting someone into the bedroom to ""relieve my tension"" so to speak. However, I don't know if this is really the best way to deal with it.
Has anyone else ran into this problem, and how do you deal with it?",pansexual
I am a teacher and would like others opinions.,"I am pansexual and I feel that sex education in schools does not cover the whole view on relationships and sexuality. We just barely cover hetro sex in school and even that is done with holding back. I am a teacher and want the children to understand the world around them. I recently found out this year that I am pansexual, I assumed I was bisexual as I had no other way of describing myself. I had only ever heard of straight, bi and gay relationships. 

I want to know should we be talking about all sexualities and life styles in school?",pansexual
"Hey, help!",I've heard of pansexual and bisexual and all of these other terms but I recently came across another term on lgbt and was wondering if someone here could help me out! Have you heard of polysexual?,pansexual
I came out today.,"My whole life my family has been incredibly open about sexuality. My 'biological' parents [One mother is my birth mother the other was introduced to me at a young age] always encouraged me to be open to everyone and love everyone especially my brother as he came out to being gay when we were very young. I have always associated myself with Bisexuality because I love men and I love women, after giving it some thought I've realized that I am attracted to any and everyone. No matter the gender they associate with. I came out to my friends and family on my facebook and I am hoping for happy feedback seeing my friend base is full of all types of people.  Just thought I'd share my excitement.",pansexual
"Uh, um, hello. Didn't know this community existed!","Hello there everyone. 

For a long time I identified as bisexual, simply because I didn't know what pansexual WAS or that it existed. Now I often get the ""so.. you fuck pans?"" joke, but that's okay. My friends mostly get it.

I've only ever been identified as my correct sexuality once by someone who knew me (who hadn't known my sexuality for sure). Does anyone else come across this?",pansexual
Just prepared this punny fb cover for when I'm ready :),,pansexual
True Love. (Not sure if this belongs here),,pansexual
I feel bad that ID-ing as pan stresses some folks out - we non-monosexuals have to stick together.,,pansexual
First Out Pansexual Politician - Why Should I Care?,,pansexual
Finally bought a Pan pride bracelet from helixchainmaille on esty. So happy with it!,,pansexual
Gary Oldman provides a short list of the sorts of people I can find attractive,,pansexual
"I was browsing for ""pan pride"" items and this was one of the top results.",,pansexual
Is anyone else... ,"Equally attracted to the “square boobs” on buff guys and the “circular boobs” that girls have? Assuming they are roughly the same size, that is.",pansexual
My cousin made me this lanyard when I still identified as bisexual and didn't know pansexuality existed. Psychic cousin much?,,pansexual
I was designing buttons for myself and I got stuck on this one. I thought you might like it =),,pansexual
How Fluid Sexuality Fits into the LGBTQ Spectrum,,pansexual
For National Coming Out Day :),,pansexual
"Picked these randomly on a quick walk on my lunch 
break, pretty satisfied with the resulting 
combination :)",,pansexual
meeting other pans ,"I never in my life met another pansexual but i really want to meet some people who are ""the same"" as me.
Unfortunately i""m living in a small town and haven't found anybody openly gay here jet. So I had the idea to make some kind of pan meeting in seattle or vancouver.
Would anybody participate? :3",pansexual
Coming out to yourself before coming out to the world,,pansexual
Pansexuality and stereotypes... ugh. (x-post from r/ainbow),,pansexual
I have some hangups with labels but I must find other people who experience one love. (5),"I have been perplexed about my sexuality lately, so please hear me out. I am a 25 year, openly gay, cis-male. Before coming out when I was 18, I had (and enjoyed ) multiple sexual experiences with both male identified and female identified people. I never considered myself bi when coming out due to what I perceived as a taboo in the LGBTQ culture surrounding bisexuals. This past year I dated a Trans-male and had no qualms about his gender identity. I am not asking if this group would label me as pansexual, because that decision falls solely upon myself. I must confess that I carry a lot of guilt surrounding my sexuality, this guilt does not come from my Heterosexual friends, this guilt comes from within the LGBTQ community (primarily other gay cismales). I am in search of other like minded individuals because I understand the importance of a strong support group. 

TLDR: I have dated all genders and gender identities and am looking for people with similar experiences and a lots of internet hugs! ",pansexual
What keeps you (the bisexuals in this subreddit) from identifying as pansexual? [Crossposted],,pansexual
Struggling with identity.,"Hello all!

I've been struggling a bit in the last couple of weeks with my identity in many. I'm a woman and recently I have started to discover the joys of dressing in an androgynous way. I still love being femme some days, but I  feel like dressing in more unisex clothes a lot recently.

I've also fine tuned my sexuality a little bit. I still identify as pansexual, but I'm definitely starting to lean towards women and androgynous people. The catch? I'm in a long term relationship with a heterosexual man who I love and am definitely attracted to, and I could see us getting married and staying together. On one hand I'm a little worried that I'm going to ""miss out"" on experiences, but I definitely am not willing to give up such a great relationship to do it.

I'm sort of conflicted, because I don't know how much of this is the cis white able-bodied middle-class straight-passing female saying ""I want to be oppressed too!"", and how much is me actually feeling a bit lost. I'm going to my first queer collective meeting today, so hopefully that will help.

Damn I had a proper goal of what advice I was after but I don't remember what it was anymore. Any kind words are appreciated though!",pansexual
"Hi, we are having a discussion on the differences between bisexuality and pansexuality, and would love to get the perspective of some pansexual people.",,pansexual
"I saw this in r/transgender, but I think it's a stronger message here",,pansexual
It's funny..,"You would think being in one of the hot beds for queer relations, that finding someone an omni would like, and that liked the omni back would be easy.

I want to give up, but dammit I want some love too.",pansexual
Questions about identifying as pansexual,"I don't really identify as anything in particular right now. If I *had* to label what I identify as something right now, I would probably say I feel closest to Pansexual. However, I'm still very confused as to what exactly it is.

From what I understand, if you're bisexual, you are attracted to 2 genders, Male and Female. But if you're pansexual, you can be attracted to people of all gender identities.

And I know within bisexuality it does not have to be a 50/50 split of attraction, you can like one gender more than the other and still identify as bi. Does this also apply to the pansexual identity? If I prefer those who identify as female, but can still honestly see myself falling in love with someone from any other gender identity in the future if they were the right person for me, does that still fall under the umbrella of pansexuality?

And I've heard it being a term to describe that people are attracted to the person only, not their physical appearance at all, but...physical appearance is very important to me. If I'm not physically attracted to you, then a relationship just won't work no matter how compatible we are personality-wise.

Basically this is a big wall of text to find out whether I would encounter problems with people disagreeing if I openly used the term pansexual to describe my identity right now.",pansexual
pansexuality IS the spectrum,,pansexual
Through the Bifocal Lens,,pansexual
"Mary Gonzalez, Texas State Representative, Identifies As Pansexual In New Interview",,pansexual
First pansexual politician?,,pansexual
"People don't seem to get that I'm not being smarmy when I say ""I'm not gay, but my girlfriend is.""","Er, AFAB here btw, for context.",pansexual
"/r/pansexual has existed for over a year now, and I want to say thank you to this wonderful community!","We've been growing steadily from a handful of users, to 1,157 as I write this post. Our traffic was the highest ever last month, with 6,881 pageviews and it looks like we'e on track for yet another great month.

We're a small, very focused subreddit, with not a ton of posts - but every post gets amazing, very quality response with some truly heartfelt information, love, and advice shared among everyone.

Watching this community grow has been a joy, and I'm always delighted to see the heart which people share here.

Thank all of you for being part of such a great sub community.

Now here's to another year! Share the love!

Sincerely,

Erik",pansexual
Anyone familiar with panromantic?,"I've heard this term only a few times but when I look into it it seems to fit me perfectly. I'm not into sex but rather the romantic sensual stuff of a romantic relationship. (I also fit the demisexual mold quite well but people haven't heard that a lot either.)

But I rarely hear panromantic used by anyone else. Are people not familiar with the term or do a lot of people just choose not to identify as it? What is your definition of panromantic?",pansexual
Another question on the definition of pansexual. ,"In [this thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/bisexual/comments/xq9sk/im_new_here_and_can_i_rant_a_small_bit/c5ooonc) I found someone who claimed that you can be both monosexual and pansexual at the same time. This completely bends my brain as I had thought that the terms were mutually exclusive. Is there any way that you can be mono **and** pan?? As you can see the thread didn't turn out that well as I couldn't visualise what it was /u/emusan/ was on about and they got frustrated  with me :-/

Is there anyone here who identifies as monosexual **and** pansexual?? If so please describe your attractions to me as I just can't imagine it. ",pansexual
I'm going on my first date with a third! I'm so excited!,"So, I'm a poly bisexual female and recently, I've discussed the possibility of adding a third with my SO, a male, and he was totally open to the idea. I've really wanted to try a serious relationship with a woman, so I focused my attention on bi and gay girls, and I found one! 

I'm so excited. She's my age, my type, and she has a boyfriend who's ok with her having a girlfriend. It's just one big pile of (potential) love!

So, any advice as to date location, etc., would be fantastic! And this subreddit helped me discover that I'm poly, so I figured that I would share this awesome news with you guys! :D",pansexual
Queer Love Kanjis for all!!! (crosspost from bisexual),,pansexual
DAE find it sad that being pan tends to limit your dating pool rather than expanding it?,"So few people seem to ""get"" pansexuality, it's hard to find somebody who's cool with it.

And I have to add being polyamorous on top of that... ALL I WANT TO DO IS LOVE ERRBODY WHY CAN'T THEY UNNERSTAND?~",pansexual
"A request to all LGBT redditors and their allies to send in secrets for an awareness banner. (Please upvote to help get this to the front page, so more people can see this)","
Next year I am organizing a Gay Pride festival for my town, it will only be the second that our small town has seen. I was hoping to make our festival a very eye opening experience by making somewhat of a ""post secret"" wall of the secrets of LGBT from all over the world. I tried contacting post secret to see if they would be willing to send copies of any LGBT related secrets and I have yet to hear back. That's when I thought, why not ask the reddit community to send in their own personal secrets to me? these would be used to make a collage of secrets to raise awareness for the LGBT community. The idea is that I will have more cards out in front of this collage at the festival and people attending can write and submit secrets for the collage so that it can continue to grow each year. It would mean a lot if all of you would send in a secret, or experience to me for this project and for the celebration of pride. I will also be posting this request in r/ainbow. I would be happy to post the address to send secrets to upon the request of enough users.",pansexual
Let's just all get wallet-sized versions of this.,,pansexual
"So, I Recently Came Out and Told my Parents...","I guess it all depends on whether not your family is okay with people who aren't heterosexual, but I can say that the conversation could've gone worse. My mum was pretty accepting and asked a few questions like these: ""So, you're Bisexual? You're not sure of which gender you prefer?""
My dad said this: ""She's not there yet; she's just confused of what she's more attracted to - she'll come around.""
My sister asked: ""How was Narnia?""
Of course, other than scoff at my sister, I made sure to firmly explain that, &gt; no, I am not confused and I'll never be ""physically"" attracted to people based on their looks. I've known this for a while now and know you deserve the right to know. I stressed the ""not confused"" part. Several times, because my dad seems to think it's just a phase, even if I told him no.
Coming out was probably the most terrifying moment of my life, but my mum acknowledged the fact that I was brave to do so. My mum and sister support me, and understood; my dad looks a bit less happy about it.

My point is this: coming out is scary, and depending of your family's relationship and beliefs, it can be the worst thing. I've seen that, in my little time on Reddit, that there are quite a few people who don't know how to come out as per se, but my advice is this: if you know they will reject you, make sure you're not dependent of them (in other words, make sure you've moved out.) If they're open to that and are comfortable around people like that, you can tell them! Just don't say ""I think I might be pansexual."" The words ""think"" and ""might"" trigger a thought: *It's just a phase.* Be sure to explain to them what a pansexual is, and make sure they don't think you're physically attracted to pans! This is exactly what I said:

&gt; Please listen to what I have to say, and please take me seriously. I'm a pansexual - I'm not physically attracted to pans. I look past physical appearance and am more attracted to the person *within* the body, so that's why whenever someone asks me if this guy is hot I say *Yes, in their own way, but I'm the wrong person to ask,* because I'm not attracted to someone's looks. I am not bisexual: bisexuals also take into note the *physical* appearance, whereas I do not. I would not care if my lifetime partner was male, female or transvestite. I thought you guys should know, so that you wouldn't be surprised if one day I came home with a girlfriend instead of a boyfriend.

My mum's jaw dropped and she even snuffed her cigarette out. My dad looked... a little ill-at-ease, but he's homophobic so I think this was a shock to him. My sister teased me, which tells me she's okay with it.

I expect lots of questions from my family now regarding my sexuality, but it feels nice to have that off my shoulders. I feel free.

It's the most frightening thing, coming out, but it's liberating.",pansexual
Newly-discovered pansexual. Parents weird about it. Have a boyfriend and things are complicated.,"So a while ago I discovered that beautiful blog, [25 Things about My Sexuality](http://25thingsaboutmysexuality.blogspot.com/). One of my friends was really into it, told me to post, and was rather shocked by how depressing and unsexy my entry was.

But my own sad little contribution got me to thinking about the role I had thought I was to fulfill. Sure, you can like boys and girls, sure, you'll go to college, but you'll have a family no matter the mom:dad ratio, have a job and keep your spouse content. Congratulations on your sexual freedom! The menu has expanded to Choice A and Choice B.

I feel that most of you at some point came to the conclusion that even this massive accomplishment (look! A SAME-SEX COUPLE FILLING A TRADITIONAL ROLE. GADZOOKS) still feels a bit restrained.

So, parents. They have long suspected me to to be a lesbian. Until I got a boyfriend I was faced with frequent supportive talks and casual references to the GSA. Rare, mocking, and casual references. Doesn't mean my mother doesn't burn my gay porn and drag queen posters as she finds them, and my father checks my closed door every hour to make sure I'm not ""napping"" (see, ""jilling off"").

Sex is funny where I come from, but if you admit to enjoying it, Christ, you get the book thrown at you.

And I'm in Seattle! Luck of the draw.

I'm eighteen and unemployed, not to mention a bit of a financial dipstick, (charities are drugs) making moving out no realistic option. Boyfriend thinks I'm a lesbian trapped in a straight girl's body. I do like the dick, I must say, but I also quite admire the feminine physique.

And everything in-between.

With my latest self-realization, I've come into a hard place, one of a strong desire to experiment but a crippling shyness that overrides even normal small talk, and the firm belief that even kissing another person outside of my rather vanilla coexistence with my brawny beau is an absolute taboo.

Maybe if there were some equality in this relationship, it would be better, but as is, he is strictly hetero, rather inexperienced, and only likes to see me with women. This guy is a good deal of my world, so it's not like I'm anywhere near leaving him for a couple of failed encounters and missed opportunities.

I might be lamenting over nothing. There's also a bit of fear with my family, who are less than democratic on matters of sexual freedom when it doesn't involve cheating on one's wife.

My goal is to, some day, share a passionate kiss with a female impersonator. My best friend is dating a crossdresser and loves it. I've put sweet chapstick on my guy. And maybe plucked five eyebrow hairs before he ~~runs crying~~ makes a dignified exit. It's a bit demoralizing.

Any advice for someone just peeking out of the bud?",pansexual
Love this saying...,,pansexual
"I wrote a blog post about defying the need to label sexuality, and I thought it would fit in here quite well, what do you think?",,pansexual
How many of you are trans* or outside of the gender binary?,It seems like a lot of the people I know who identify as pansexual are trans or genderqueer. I'm curious as to how you guys identify. Are you cis or trans or genderfluid or what? ,pansexual
Pop Shot: What Does It Mean To Be Pansexual?,,pansexual
"Came out as ""bi"" today to my coworkers. Not sure if I should feel proud for coming out, or ashamed for not being honest about my sexual orientation.","I casually mentioned ""this girl I used to date,"" and then, at the eyebrow-raises, explained that I'm bisexual. One part of me feels really self-satisfied for not pretending to be straight. But the reason I don't identify as bi is because I feel like it's somewhat binarist and my attraction is gender-blind, not dependent on a gender binary that I disagree with. 

But, on the other hand, I live in the south, and I was surprised people handled hearing that I'm bi as well as they did. Explaining pansexuality (and therefore things like trans people and the gender binary) would probably have not gone as well.",pansexual
I'M PANSEXUAL!?  lol,,pansexual
"DAE tell people that you're bisexual rather than pan, to avoid having to try and educate them?","I run into this problem a lot. After so many times trying to explain to people what pansexuality is, (and the accompanying issues, like gender identity, etc) I've given up, and usually just tell most people I'm bisexual, unless I know they come with a set of knowledge pertaining to sexual/gender identity.

I find this really cheapens my own identity for the sake of easy interaction, but I just get tired. Anyone else have this problem?",pansexual
When someone tells me there's plenty of guys to date.,,pansexual
I am Pansexual and my girlfriend is Trans (male to female). Does anyone have any advice on coming-out? ,"We have been dating for 4 years. I used to always think I was bisexual (since 7th grade). As time went on I got to know other bisexuals, but I always knew there was something different about them in comparison to me. I went on a hunt to find out what it could possibly be. I did research into different sexual orientations and things of that nature and learned of Pansexual. After I read it, I knew that's exactly what I am. 

Soon after figuring that out I started dating my ""boyfriend"". I never told ""him"" that I was pansexual. I didn't think ""he"" would like it. Two years into our relationship she told me she was transgender and that she will soon be transitioning. She thought that I would leave her for sure, but she didn't know I was pansexual. This event really put my pansexuality to the test. I told her right away that there would be no heartbreak because I love her, no matter what. 

Very soon she would like to start transitioning. Obviously, I can't keep my sexual orientation a secret from my family much longer. My girlfriend told her mother in December and she flipped out and basically disowned both of us... :( I really don't want this to happen again. My parents and family are much more reasonable than her, but I still can't be sure how they will react. Please, I need all the advice I can get. I don't want to lose my family. They mean so much to me.

Edit: I told my sister two weeks ago. She was totally ok with it. She has the same worries as me about the rest of the family. All of them are religious (I am an atheist and they know this already). Some are more religious than others. My uncle, for example, will not let his children watch Ellen because he thinks it will ""turn them gay"" ???? So I already know he will not be ok with it. My grandparents, however, are ok with gay people and ok with gay marriage. I am hoping that I will at least come out of all of this with some allies.

Edit: I just told my cousin last night. She is from a very religious family, but she is also the relative that I am closest with, so I had to. She was completely accepting!! She says that she disagrees with her father that it is a choice. She is going to help me come out the rest of the family when that time comes. I am so happy. :D It is really helpful to have allies with you when you come out to other people I've realized.",pansexual
I'm a little bit in love with the pride flag,"Do any of you have some links to wear I can buy some awesome jewelry or anything like that? I found an adorable friendship bracelet on etsy but I feel like it's a bit weird to pay $2.20 shipping for a $3 item and so the only thing to do is to buy more stuff, right? Right?

I have two shirts lined up from redbubble as well, and I don't think too many people will recognise it (I'm still a little bit in the closet at home) which is good.

Do you people have anything interesting?",pansexual
Anyone else have trouble explaining this to their SO?,"When I first started hanging out with my current boyfriend, I told him I was a lesbian. At the time, I'd never heard the word pansexual, and didn't have a clue what it meant. I had been dating his roommate before that, so he didn't exactly believe me about being gay...
I wound up explaining to him that, at the time, I considered myself bi because I think both men and women physically atractive ( but not sexually) but I would rather look at a women.
Now, the part I have trouble explaining to him is that I'm not sexually attracted to anyone (in general). I didn't ever plan on having sex actually, the idea didn't hold any interest for me. So even though I think women look better than men, I would rather avoid seeing naked women. 
He can't grasp this concept. It gets even harder for him to understand when I try to explain that I don't find him physically attractive, or didn't. 
After falling in love with him, I don't have eyes for anyone else. I now think he's the most beautiful person I have ever seen, and I am sexually attracted to him. Only him.
He still seems to have this idea that I'm a lesbian, and since we both like red-heads he makes a lot of jokes about finding a cute red-head for us...which bothers me quie a b",pansexual
Just some pansexual pride.,,pansexual
Something a friend made.,,pansexual
"Didn't like any of the symbols on google images, so I made one in MS Paint. The only real difference is the heart instead of an arrow :)",,pansexual
"I know this is asked a lot, but would I be considered pansexual?","I am much more sexually attracted to men, but I am also somewhat sexually attracted to women. Personality and romantically, it is equal. I have never been in a relationship with a woman, but I can see myself in a relationship with any gender.

When people ask me about my sexual orientation, I say I consider myself pansexual but that I prefer men physically about 75% of the time. I don't generally like to deal with labels, but I'm curious about what you guys think. Sorry if it's a stupid question, but would I be considered pansexual? 

Edit: I have been in relationships with men before. 

Edit: male, female, intersex, transgender, bigender. Gender identity doesn't matter to me. ",pansexual
"Introducing /r/BiGoneMild! It's not about appearance, it's about the many faces of Bi / Pan. Come check us out!",,pansexual
"I would like to know if you've been in this kind of situation before, (read description) and if so, what did you do? ","Reddit, I don't like to call myself bisexual. I prefer to not give this a name. The way I see it, is that I'm going to fall in love with the person that they are (so their sex doesn't/shouldn't matter, in my case). I have not explained this of myself to anyone, because well, they've never questioned it haha. To make it clear, I am a 14 year old girl as is the young lady that I am talking about.[I hope my fellow Redditors do not find me to young/immature to be discussing this, or to be on this website. I feel as if I am though] Anyways, she has a boyfriend - and is straight as far as I know - but does not seem to be ""In Love"" with him. There have been times when I feel as if she feels the way I do about her, about me. She has been extremely suggestive to me about...well you know. Though I know I love her, I won't take a part in doing things with her if I got the chance, because it wouldn't be fair or just for her little boyfriend. I want to tell her how I feel, but I am afraid if I do, I may ruin our friendship. What do you think I should do? TL;DR - I'm a young girl in love with my straight friend, with a boyfriend. 
(I originally posted this in r/askreddit. They suggested I post here to get your opinion) ",pansexual
(xpost from r/bisexual) Are there any nonmonosexual symbols?,,pansexual
Hey /r/pansexual I have a question.,"I would like to know if I would be described as pansexual. Okay, well personally I am attracted more to someone's personalities than gender. I do sometimes feel like I feel a little more attracted to females sexually, but romantically it is completely equal. (male, female, transgender, bigender) I could see myself having a lasting relationship with any gender. I dunno this sort of feels like a dumb question for me to ask, but would I be considered a pansexual?",pansexual
"r/pan, I am so confused and torn. And I feel horrible.","Throwaway here. Hey r/pansexual, I was hoping that this was the right place to come to. I've recently discovered a new attraction towards transgenders, ftm. I find myself a little grossed out by a (whisper) penis, and just don't enjoy sex at all with a guy. 
Maybe I should start out with a little background.
I am 17, and a girl. Yes, I know this is young, but I've been told by many that I am far mature for my age. I've been in a relationship with a boy for over half a year, but for the past.. roughly 5 months, there has been little to no sexual activity involved - on my part. I know he's getting frustrated, and frankly so am I as I am not attracted to what is in his pants. He's a lovely individual, and I love every part of him, except for anything in bed. I've never experienced anything with a woman before, except for this somewhat odd makeout session with a girl when I was way younger, and I don't quite remember it. ANYWAYS, so I'm in this relationship where I love the guy but don't in bed, and finding myself more and more attracted to a woman.. dressed up as a man? Does that make sense? I'm so confused. Don't get me wrong, I think guys are .. nice-looking and whatnot, but I just don't *feel* it. 
Also, if I am.. something other than what I thought I was, and I'm not attracted to my boyfriend.. what the hell do I do there? He's absolutely amazing in pretty much everything, so how could I break up with him? 
Sorry for the messy format and whatnot. I just *really* want answers for what I'm feeling. Also, thanks for much to read this mess. ",pansexual
Hi /r/pansexual I wonder if you'd like to join us over on /r/bisexual on this this question: Is there a real difference between Bisexual and Pansexual?,,pansexual
I just feel the need to share my moment of win with someone.,"Alright, let's set the scene shall we? I'm a pansexual teenage girl who lives in the bible belt. My school is full of judgemental bigots and I have to deal with haters fairly often. So, here's what happened today; I was walking from one school building from another, when the local group of inbreds decided to cat-call me. I was called a dyke 7 times in under 10 seconds. (New record! Woo!) My moment of win came when I turned to them and said ""Well, I'm sorry that you're jealous that I get more pussy than you guys! It's not like I can help it!"" The looks on their faces made my entire week, and I think that it has actually made me more comfortable with being who I am! :) So have any of you had moments like this? ",pansexual
Just a cute little pansexual kitten c;,,pansexual
Am I Pansexual?,"Okay, here goes. I am a thirteen year old female and have always wondered what I am in sexuality wise. When I get older, I want to have a relationship with someone. But I'm the sort of person that really doesn't care about looks/gender. I would fall in love with someone based on how they treat me and on their personality. I wouldn't mind dating a man or woman or any other gender identity there is, as long as they love me I'm willing to love them. But the problem is - I wouldn't really like to have a sexual relationship with a female. Maybe if I dated a female one day, I'd just learn to get used to it, but being friends with gay men for a long time has made the vagina a disturbing thought for me - Even though I have one. I wish I didn't sometimes. But basically, am I pansexual if I wouldn't mind having a relationship with any one as long as they love me, even if I'm not sexually attracted to the female genitalia?",pansexual
"Check this out, awesome stuff to express your pansexuality! other orientations also included",,pansexual
All We Want...,,pansexual
I really don't like the colors for our pride flag.,,pansexual
On the importance of sexual relations,"I feel as though I only have sex with people because I can see that it makes them happy. I am a biological male with effeminate tendencies. It always trips me out that I don't pounce on every sexy thang I see, because of how men are supposed to act. But honestly, I could do without the act, and just kiss and cuddle to infinity. DAE?",pansexual
Pride bracelet c: (previously on r/ainbow) ,,pansexual
choosing the heterosexual norm? ,"throw away account time. 
I came out as a lesbian almost a decade ago, having given up on fighting my attraction to women. I had dated all different types of cis-males ranging from effeminate to metro to tough-guy masculine. I was genuinely attracted to all of them. I began dating women, and found myself attracted to a variety of body projections there as well, from butch to fem to feminist to straight. I honestly believed that I was a lesbian in the strictest terms, but it became clear to me after some time that it was not the case. Now I'm in a heterosexual relationship. We're monogamous and committed, and honestly I really love him. He is a great person inside and out.
My fear is that my strong sexual desires and attractions to a large variety of people is going to cause me enough stress that I won't be able to remain in the relationship no matter how well it's going. I am sexually and emotionally satisfied, but, to put it bluntly, I'm thrilled to be getting the cock, but I desperately miss the pussy. I'm not going to ask for an open relationship because I don't want him sleeping with anyone else, so it would be completely unfair and he deserves my devotion. To be honest, I only ever get stressed about it when I consider 1) that I might be ""giving in to societal pressure"" or 2) never having another lady on my face again. It's more anxiety driven than anything else. Does anyone else struggle with this when their partner turns out to be... ""normal""?


edit: I think the word desperate is too harsh... I'm not desperate for anything, even pussy. :)",pansexual
Different flag / symbolism?,"While I know some people rather like the flag/colors representing pansexuality, I personally do not. I've taken to the color green as being representative of my own pansexuality. Would anyone else happen to share my viewpoint on the colors?",pansexual
I'm a tad bit confused,"I'm attracted to all genders. Like, someone's gender doesn't matter at all to me when I find someone attractive, but I'm still attracted to their physical appearance although personality is a bigger factor (of course). I never really understood what it meant to be pansexual so I thought it was just being attracted to someone's peronality rather than appearance.
for example, I find some traits unattractive like super muscular bodybuilders, but some traits attractive like people with dyed hair (like pink) so would that just make me polysexual since I'm not attracted to everyone?

So,  even though I still find certain people physically attractive, would that make me pansexual?",pansexual
Why are pansexuals attracted to personality over appearance?,"Sometimes when I say I'm pansexual I hear, ""But you discriminate based on looks, you aren't pansexual!""

I've never understood why pansexuality meant something more specific than other sexualities. When I say pansexual I simply mean I'm attracted to all genders, why does it also have to mean that I don't have preferences? If I were say, a heterosexual female, I'd still be considered heterosexual if I preferred men with facial hair. Why can't I be pansexual but prefer partners that look a certain way?

Similarly, what does gender-blind mean? I know that could be its own post, but I see it as being connected to this topic so I figured asking it here made sense.

Also, I know not everyone thinks that way about pansexuality. I just want those that do to explain it to me.",pansexual
What does pansexual mean to you?,"I've recently been told that my definition of pansexual is ""wrong"". I don't think that it is, and I think that words that get used as identity labels mean a lot of different things to different people, and that that is normal and good. Just because we identify with the same word doesn't mean our sexualities are the same because, well, **nobody's** sexuality is exactly the same as anyone else's.  

So I was wondering, what does the label 'pansexual' mean to the people of /r/pansexual?
No links to dictionary definitions please, I am looking for information on people's individual relationships with the word. 

Here's mine:

I am not of binary gender and I am not comfortable with a term which implies that the gender is binary, which is why I use the term pansexual instead. I don't think that I am ""gender blind"" as I definitely find certain gender expressions more attractive than others (eg androgyny). But physical sex and gender identity are not things which affect whether I might be attracted to someone, and so pansexual works well for me I think. ",pansexual
How I conceptualise sexuality,,pansexual
I kinda get the feeling...,"That mono sexuality isn't really the way it's supposed to work.

Well, sexually perhaps, you know to further the species and stuff, but not for recreation(which is most sex) or romantically. I don't deny the exist of heterosexuality at all, or find it morally questionable, but I just wonder, how is it that you can be so, limited, in those whom you can love?

I find it odd that there are so many people to love anywhere on the spectrum, but that it's only normal to find it in one. What is [/r/pansexuals](/r/pansexuals) take on it? Also, I'm kind of posting because this sub-reddit is criminally inactive.",pansexual
Best way to come out to family?,"I've known that I'm pansexual for awhile, and most of my friends know i am, but my family doesn't know and i just don't know the right way to come out to them. Anything helpful would be nice. c: ",pansexual
Just feeling...confused.,"Hello, all.
Where to begin? I guess I should state that I'm nearly 18, and in September, I started to seriously question my sexuality. 
I had struggled with my sexuality all through middle school, but my family is strictly Christian and against any sort of homosexuality, so I blocked it out of my mind and told myself my desires for a girl were sinful and that I could make myself not feel that way.
I still consider myself a Christian, but I really won't go into why I'm cool with LGBTQ. It's not what I came here for.
So, when I began to realize that I may not be straight, I deeply searched myself and thought I had discovered that I was bisexual, and came out to only a couple of close friends. I accepted that I would have to keep quiet about my sexuality to my family, knowing I would be out of the house sometime in my twenties. In December I learned of the term ""pansexual"" and what it meant. I didn't particularly think much of it until I really thought about the people I feel attracted to.
I like people who identify as men. I like people who identify as women. I like people who identify as neither. I like people who identify as both. I like people who identify as something else entirely. I like transgenders and transexuals.
I can't say anything except that I feel utterly confused. Am I jumping to quickly to say that I'm this or that? Should I ignore labels completely and just love? It's been something weighing heavily on my mind and I suppose I just needed to tell somebody who would actually understands. My friends are open-minded, but I'm quite sure they would question my confusion.
Thanks for reading, friends, I'm sorry if it's a little messy.",pansexual
"Standard 'fairly sure I am, please confirm for me' post","So I'm an owner of ovaries and have known for a while that I can be sexually attracted to both men and woman. I first realized while sitting in a history class nine years ago when a curvacious classmate walked up to turn in an assignment and I ended up distractedly captivated by the sway of her hips. Without questioning myself even for a moment I just blinked and went *Oh, so I guess I'm bi then. That's cool.*

Moving on a few years, I obtained my very first real life boyfriend. I was never sexually attracted to his body, however, I was extremely attracted to his intellect and wit. We had almost everything in common. We both loved gaming, reading, writing, the same sort of movies et cetera blah blah. Through these common interests I became attracted to him in a sexual way. I suppose I was beginning to get off on brain power.

Things didn't work out and eventually I end up with my now current girlfriend, a fellow gamer/redditor/artist. This woman actually does get my gears going in both a sexual and intellectual way. I realized through her that I am attracted to a little something inbetween being in that I like small breasts on women. Along with that for males I seem to prefer to ogle over twinkish individuals.

I know the general definition of pansexual deems males, females and transgendered as the grounds for liking... but I sort of feel like the original depiction of Jack Harkness from Doctor Who. Human, alien, whatever it doesn't really matter so long as there is some sort of sentient bond. I'm the sorta person who gets off Liara because of the whole Asari mind-sex thing (Er, dorked out there for a second, my apologies.) Anyway, I suppose that's where I get my slight confusion. Just not sure if Pansexual is the apt term for me.

tl;dr I find myself sexually attracted to people through common interests and intellect. I also seem to like gender neutral looks in a person. Am I pansexual?",pansexual
"Genderfluid, and wondering what I am.","***This post mirrored, with appropriate modifications, to /r/Bisexual, /r/LGBT***

I have a rather unique situation really and I do have a few questions to ask.

* Some days I feel more feminine than others, and with this comes the associated feminine urges. Of course this tends to rise and fall with how I feel, is that normal? Does this make me Pansexual or just some other way? *I certainly don't wish to begin identifying as Pan without being somewhat validated by others of that nature, I don't wish to offend.*

* Sometimes I simply feel so feminine I dig into leftover Halloween makeup or use sharpies, whichever is at hand, to ""beautify"" myself. Now rationally speaking I consider this self-entertainment for extreme boredom, I am an unemployed full-time college student, but I wonder if I should experiment with REAL makeup full-time, not just putting on some makeup when I'm in my room alone. If so, I'd like to know which types of makeup I should wear and such. I do have my ears pierced. (I am a guy, but to be honest some days I'd just -like- to try looking a little girly or softer if you know what I mean)

* I've considered transitioning between genders, but I feel like that I'm fine with what I am so long as I can simply find a way to openly express how I feel like both genders at times. I'm 23 now, but I've felt this way since I was at least 16 or 17, before then I simply was a bit of a homo/biphobe...and totally denying what I was hardcore. Currently I feel like I'm not going to transition...I wouldn't have any support for it anyway from my family and to be honest, it seems more trouble than it's worth.

* I am a virgin, but that doesn't mean I'm *just curious,* I've made my decision for now, and I'm asking these questions in order to help myself refine how I should express what I am to others so I can make what I am perfectly clear. I haven't exactly ""Come out"" yet...I don't plan to, I believe that someone's sexual orientation is not something that needs to be discussed with anyone other than friends or people you are romantically interested in. This doesn't mean I won't tell people who come up to ask me what my orientation is if I find them interesting.* At the current time I claim myself as Bi, but sometimes I wonder if I don't fit into the Pansexual grid somewhere.*

* I live in a Bible Belt state, Texas, so please keep this in mind when making your suggestions, What might be perfectly fine in So. Cal. might not go unnoticed here, and draw unwanted hateful attention. I don't wish to be flaming and flamboyant about it, I just want it to be subtly obvious to other LGBT parties so they can at least approach me comfortably if they really seem interested in me. 

* I tend to be a little fickle, I certainly don't find myself developing crushes on random people, usually I only ever crush on someone if I've met them, and befriended them a bit at least. I don't have to make full on biffles or anything, but seriously it's been a bit of a problem with me, especially when I'm online...I find myself falling for friends and that makes for some very awkward losses of friends. I certainly sometimes get a little *too affectionate* with friends I feel close to, and that has made for some very awkward situations as well. x3

* I once got to know a pan online, and believe it or not I simply naturally looked up to her. She transitioned across the genders too, but I couldn't help but feel respect once I found out and I naturally quickly befriended her. Of course the previous point kicked in too, I did kinda crush on her, but I was able to talk it out with her with no serious loss of standing. it's not like I chased her much anyway...I'd learned to control my crushes by this time. This person is really the one who helped me to realize what I am. Before I was kind of in denial thinking ""Maybe it's a phase"".",pansexual
Well at least they didn't say pans... ,,pansexual
Am I bi or pan? ,"I figure you guys must get this question all the time, but I don't really know wether I'm bi or pan. I'm a cisgendered female, and from what I've heard is pansexuals don't believe in or pick partners based on the gender binary. I don't endorse the gender binary, and I don't consider sex or gender in attraction, so does that mean I'm pan? Are people who chose the label of bisexual just close-minded? I really don't care what label I turn out to fit, it won't change anything, but I'm just a little confused about which one is actually applicable. ",pansexual
Going too far? How do I know?,"I am a middle aged genderqueer. I'd qualify myself as bigendered but I am fairly pansexual. I'd qualify myself as having a good sense of self, even though in winters I tend to get a little morose. I have no major neurological disorders and other than ADHD the sole reason for me not working is largely due to fairly frequent migraines, and the odd cluster headache. 

I live near the Hague, in the Netherlands.

I have always had a extraordinary, once in a hundred sexual urge. I never bothered people with it and kept it to myself. In fact I as never outgoing and since I was married with a fairly interesting and quite pretty Goth for a decade I never looked outside marriage.

Since my divorce I am steadily coming apart. It's not that I care much about it - but I keep abandoning restraints and inhibitions one after another.  I am now in my 40s and most people who know me refer to me as a slut, and extremely kinky. What I find is that as I alienate some people (and these people have been falling away from my life in a steady stream) I become more narcistic about my lifestyle. Being judged angers me, even though it makes sense that people might find some things I do objectionable. 

Before I met my ex I could feel lonely. These days I mostly don't. It sometimes worries me that I am painting myself ever further in a corner. Not working (and not having a lot of spending cash) aggravates this - if I had a steady or bigger income I would not be having my reservations (or worries) at all - but I feel I am becoming more isolated. 

A good friend made the comment today ""do you realize how fucked up you are? I mean it's cool how liberated you are, but don't you ever have doubts?"" and I realize I don't. I am getting better at not giving a flying fuck what people think.  

This may not be as practical in the long run.

At a rational level I fear that ten years from now I might in fact find myself abandoned and utterly alone, and sexually less compelling than I am right now. Already finding playmates for my endeavors is becoming more challenging, and the quality of the playmates is becoming more casual, more dehumanizing, more disinterested in ""me"" as a human being, but only interested in how well I give head or how well I let myself get used, sexually, or how well I am able to like being whipped or sexually degraded. And many of my playmates are, well, not the brightest of the litter. And I like my playmates smart more than anything else!

I mean it's fun, but once this ends, what the hell will I be left with?

I walk off the beaten path. I walk apart from tradition, established morality, norms, normalcy and convention.  I do have amazing experiences here, far away from the established roads and familiar avenues, but I sometimes worry that I am losing touch so far from the normal, everyday, stable is making me 'weirder and weirder'. To a degree at some point I won't be able to connect with everyday life any more.

I am starting to loathe things. Everyday, bourgeois, conventionality. I can be so direct, tactless. I can be brutally honest and am losing my subtlety. And I sometimes pick fights, out of sheer obstinacy. And I am so good at expressing myself, people rather avoid any confrontations with me. 

The best solution would be having someone (M/F) that I really connect with, someone just as fundamentally artistic, and liberated and wild and fucked up as myself. Someone of my age bracket and my own pansexual interests and my own level of iconoclastic irreverence and rebellious recalcitrance that would like being with me, for a range of reasons. 

But that in itself will be far from easy.

Anyone has any suggestions? Next week I won't worry about this.. but yanno. Now I am worried.",pansexual
"I thought I was bisexual, but I could be wrong? Help?","Im a male bisexual who is both romantically and sexually attracted to men and women. This is something ive accepted. What I have a hard time understanding is what my sexuality ACTUALLY is. You see I'm very much romantically/sexually attracted to MTF trans. After hrt. Like completly transitioned, yet still pre-op. Does this make me pan? I'm not attracted to FTM persons in any way (still got mad support though!) I suppose I could be attracted romantically to any of the many genders, but only sexually attracted to gay/bi men, women, and mtf persons",pansexual
Coming out ... huh?!,,pansexual
Could I get some information? ,"Hiya, I identify within the gender binary as a trans woman. I have a roommate who identifies as pansexual. She's attempted to explain it in the past as finding the ""spiritual energy"" of someone attractive. Not the body. While I find that confusing I have come to understand that as, ""finding the person attractive and not the body."" 

I understand that is different from what she describes, but, speaking as someone who is at best skeptical about ""spiritual energy"" that helps me wrap my head around it. That being said, I hope that is not offensive. 

Now, my question is, and I'm trying to word it carefully, her friendship matters to me. Her support does as well. Yet she often several things I find offensive about my identity as a trans woman. Discussions surrounding the gender binary, trying to convince me to be comfortable as I am, male-bodied, and stating that I should not attempt to fit myself within it. I want to fit myself within it because, well, that is who I am. It's who I want to be and it's how I feel. I'm trying to find ways where I can meet her where she is coming from and I am struggling. Could you please help me? Perhaps I don't have the vocabulary or perhaps I'm way off base. I don't know. 

p.s. if you find anything offensive or ignorant in this posting, please educate me. I want to be kind. 
",pansexual
Does gender identity divide bisexuality and pansexuality?,"Hello, r/pansexual!

I've considered myself bisexual for a little more than a year now. Recently my SO came out to me as bigendered (a subset of transgendered in which the gender identity switches). Now I'm a little bit confused about the difference between bisexuality and pansexuality.

I've never been close to an intersex individual, so biologically, I can only attest to the fact that I like both males and females. However, I certainly like my SO's male and female identities. Furthermore, I am almost exclusively attracted to someone's personality before their appearance, so it's plausible that I could be attracted to someone who is intersex.

Would this be considered bisexuality or pansexuality? I was under the impression that bisexuality included only cisgendered males and females, but my SO thought that it would include any biological males or females, regardless of gender identity.

And please don't worry about telling me not to fret about labels. :) It doesn't matter to me whether I'm bisexual or pansexual. It's a curiosity thing, nothing more.

Thanks, guys!

Edit: Thanks again for all the answers! I guess I was confused because I thought that, as the sidebar here says, pansexuals find ""gender and sex"" irrelevant or insignificant while bisexuals found sex insignificant but not gender. There seem to be a lot of differing opinions on that! I should clarify that besides simply switching between male and female identities, my SO does also have in-between times which don't put me off at all, so I'm definitely okay outside the gender binary. So... I guess maybe I'd identify as pansexual now. :)",pansexual
I feel like I'm a bad pansexual,"I feel like I'm a bad pansexual because while I feel like I could make love to anyone, I feel like I could only be in a romantic relationship with either a woman or another trans* person. Am I a bad pan for feeling this way?",pansexual
Does pansexual themed jewelry exist? I'd like to get something that lets people know I don't give a shit what team you play for.,,pansexual
"I'm Pansexual, but call myself Bisexual","I am pansexual and to people in the community I identify as pansexual, but to everyone else it's just easier to say Bisexual. It gets tiring to explain what pansexual means especially if a person believes in only two genders (and biological sexes). I wish it was easier but I guess nothing is ever easy. Does anyone else fell this way or experience anything similar? ",pansexual
Is sex a mandatory/necessary requirement for attraction/love?,"So the Omni/Pan thread prompted an odd thought for me and I wanted to see what other folks were thinking on a forwardly possible subject.

Is sex mandatory/necessary for you to be attracted to/love another entity. In other words, in theory if an AI were developed that had a sufficiently attractive personality, would/could you fall in love with it, even though you'd never be able to have intercourse?",pansexual
"Would you say, Omni-pan?","I have identified as Pansexual for years, simply due to the fact that I have attraction to people outside the Male/Female biological binaries.
But recently I have started to say ""Omni-pan"" instead, Because I know I'm not a true pansexual.

To me a pansexual is gender-blind, They don't care what's in your pants.
But I do, Sometimes  gender defines the role I wish to take in the relationship, in other cases, there are certain genders I rule out entirely.

But I'm still open to bi-gender, gender-nuteral, Trans, Intersex and cross-gendered partners, So I didn't feel comfortable saying I was Bi.

**Does anyone here think it's insulting for me to use the term ""Omni-pan""?**

**Does it even make sense to use that as a label?**


**What might work better to describe me** 

(I'm the type of person who likes having a word to wrap up my sexuality)",pansexual
I think I may be losing my best friend because of my.. orientation(?) and it terrifies me.,"Hey folks. So as I've previous discussed I just recently figured out that I pursue relationships in a ""slightly"" different manner than most people that I know.

As part of my accepting this, I shared this fact with several people that are close to me, and that I knew I could trust. One of them is my best friend. Lately he's been growing distant, or at least it's felt that way to me. I know it's related to what I've revealed, and my responses to his teasing me.

I don't honestly know what to do, I really care for this guy. Not in the I want to have a shag with him kind of way (if he was willing it'd be one thing, but we've clearly discussed it and he's not an I respect that) but he's been like a brother to me. 

I'm so terrified of losing him I don't know what to do.

Sorry not certain why I'm posting this, just feeling down I guess, I feel horrible and just need to vent in a forum where I'm not exactly known.",pansexual
"DAE feel like ”pansexual” is the most appropriate label for you, but dislike the actual word itself?","Frankly I almost never use the term publicly, I'll just tell people ""I love everybody!""",pansexual
"New to accepting this part of my life, just looking to vent/rant.","So I'm kind of new at this whole pansexual thing. Erhm, sorry that sounds really flippant and I don't mean it to be. I just figured out on the 23rd that I was bi or so I thought. After talking to a friend who found out that I queue off of an interests mind, rather than their looks, he explained what pansexuality was.

It kind of hit me like a ton of bricks. But it makes sense, it falls in line with the philosophy I've been crafting for the last 15 or so years, and so here I am. Sorry if this is a bad topic to get into this in, I couldn't figure out how to make a new one and didn't have a link to contribute.

I have run into one spot of trouble already, but I can get past it. I'd just really like to know that I'm not alone out here.",pansexual
Do you feel like you experience attraction fundamentally different than most people? Lets share our experiences! ,"Personally, I've always found myself attracted to personalities more than raw physicality. When I'm out with friends in a social setting, and a buddy says ""Hey, that girl is hot!"", I can certainly decide if someone is physically attractive or not, but I never feel true attraction to someone until I get at least a glimpse of their personality, or get to know them.

When I tell my friends, ""I guess, she's cute, but I'd have to get to know her first!"" I'm always met with friendly laughter. In the same vein, if someone physically attractive ends up having a horrible personality, I really find no attraction to them anymore.

I think this is a fundamental difference in perception of attraction. What are some of your experiences, /r/pansexual?",pansexual
"Pansexuality - No, I'm not attracted to pans.",,pansexual
Pansexuality on Wikipedia,,pansexual
"Don't know my sexuality, can someone help?","Recently I read about what it means to be pansexual. I thought about it for a while and thought I was pansexual. Although, I am not transgender (Male). If I was truly in love with someone, their gender wouldn't matter to me. In my 'book', love is love. As of now, I have a girlfriend. Although, I'm fairly open to dating a guy or a transgender. I'm really confused where I stand on sexual orientation. Can someone give me some help? Thank you to all that do, I truly appreciate your help. :)",pansexual
